
The Jurassic Branch
Michael Crichton


Dragons hate dirty, clean skin, fur, and food.
Bad smell, bad appearance, bad taste, bad sound, bad smell, bad


poison; That's why the designer didn't spare his imagination to come up with more."


Linus, 1797


"Don't waste the new life."


Irwin Cargoff, 1972
introduction
"InGen said."


In the late 20th century, gold entered the mainstream in a dramatic way:
He was angry and furious to fix the situation quickly. Behind the company
They have tried - with some evidence - to update it and the results are very good.
He is very educated.

Biotechnology promises a radical change in human life. Earlier this year,
Automatic energy and computers will have a significant impact on our daily lives. in
In the words of one analyst, biotechnology will change every aspect of life: us.
Health, nutrition, fitness, fitness, fitness. Nothing happened.
again. It will change the world.

But the biotechnology revolution differs from conventional science in three important ways.
scenery.

First, the distance is great. The United States entered the space age through a scientific program.
High School, Los Alamos. It entered the computer age through the efforts of many people.
Companies. But biotechnology programs now have more than 2,000
emitted exclusively in the United States. Fifty companies spend $5 billion a year on this
clean.

Second, there is a lack of good, rigorous research. Used to make pearl truffles
The benefits of coconut water may include strengthening the hair follicles and strengthening the hair follicles
Your reaction will always feel like a story, but it’s not. Yes, the
Biotechnology is being used in a variety of game-changing fields.
such as toiletries and cosmetics;
New technology is powerful.

Third, the process is not managed. No one cares. No federal law is required. Nothing there.
Government regulations, in the United States or anywhere else in the world. And for reasons
From biotech to pharmaceuticals to agriculture to artificial ice, smart policy is complicated.

But what is surprising is the lack of an intelligent search engine. fluent
Fortunately, all scientists working in the field of the human body are also involved.
Biotechnology. There is no judgment. Everyone has a role.


The marketing of invasive biology is the most controversial issue in history.
Science, and ​ended with great success. Four hundred years of Galilee;
Science functions as an open and honest inquiry into religion. scientists
They keep going, and they are persecuted in many ways
Politics is competition. Scientists consistently agree with the research and continue
They like the idea of ​​trying their hand and seeing themselves in a job
It is for everyone’s benefit. And in many ways, science
It’s very important.

In 1953, two English researchers, James Watson and Francis Crook,
They described the structure and function of DNA as the key to the human spirit.
Decades of experience working to understand trends in education. He's waiting patiently.
whose gifts went to the best of people.

However, that didn’t happen. Thirty years later, almost entirely Watson and Crick.
My family is in another company. Molecular Genetic Research
It used to be a multi-million dollar business and then we could get
1953. After April 1976 onwards.

They met Robert Swanson, Robert Swanson, the legend.
Enter Herber Boyer, a biochemist at the University of California, Berkeley. The two men agreed .
He found a commercial company that used Boyer’s technology to calculate satellite positions. Their new company,
Genentech quickly became one of the largest and most successful genetic engineering companies.


It's like everyone wants to get rich. Recommend for beginners
Almost weekly, specialists are also called in to conduct genetic research. In 1986, there were 362 employees.
Of these, 64 are members of professional academies and sit on audit committees of biotechnology companies. The number
The number of those working for government or service firms is much higher.

It’s important to note that this shift in perspective is important. In the past, it was perfectly
Scientists have developed theories about this phenomenon. They were looking for money as a weapon.
Not necessary, just convenient for consumers. And hold workshops, even in remote locations.
Bell or IBM labs are some of the owners. Thus, the person
Clean scientists refer to the work of expert scientists and
In every way. Privacy policies protect academic scientists from fraud.
The professional consensus is that when there is a debate about technological issues, experts disagree on
They are there to talk about people’s problems.

But it’s not true right now. There are few insect biologists and not much research
Entities for which there is no transaction. The old days are over. Historical research continues;
He was angrier than ever. But it was done discreetly, quickly and cheaply.


At this stage of the process, you may not need to incorporate a company as large as Universal.
A Palo Alto Genetic Technologies Inc. It will be worth it. It is also not surprising that genes
The problem won’t go away. Unfortunately, Inghan’s trial was confidential; What is
The first case occurred in Central America, with ur 20
People were there to see it. As a result, only a few survived.

At the same time, when Gene Technologies International filed for Chapter 11 liquidation in
The San Francisco ordinance of October 5, 1989, which the people ignored. fluent
It turns out it was all a fluke: InGen is the third small US biotech company to go bankrupt.
year, the seventh since 1986.
Japanese financial institutions, such as Hamaguri and Dansaka, are companies that
In this case, you cannot give feedback. To avoid misleading information, Daniel Russ, Kuwan, Swan, and
Ross, a lieutenant with Ingen, also supported the Japanese workers. small
The voice of the vice president of Costa Rica was heard from downstairs. So it's no surprise.
within a month, Ingen’s problems were solved with great enthusiasm and cooperation.

The States Parties to the Convention, as well as the education authorities concerned, have signed
This is an eternal debate, and ​no one talks about what happened, but many
"InGen incident" The people involved in the "InGen incident" didn't report it, and ​may be talking about this topic
The incident occurred over two days in August 1989 on a beach in the northwest.
Costa Rica.


The Jurassic Branch
initial:
The raptor quote


It fell onto the sheets and stained the walls of the hospital.
She screams into the car, skidding across the hard surface. Roberta Carter says nothing, and
He stared out the window. From the hospital we couldn’t see the ocean or the ocean in the distance.
He approached from the right. This is not what he expected when he arrived at the fishing village
Bahja Anasco, in western Costa Rica, is two months into her medical training.
Bobby Carter looks forward to sunshine and laughter after two years of domestic violence
Emergency medical care in Chicago.

He was in Bahja Anasco for three weeks. And it rains every day.

Everything about it was good. Bahja Anasko enjoyed being alone and making friends.
subject. Costa Rica has the top 20 healthcare facilities in the world, and ​​they are the best.
In the west, the hospital is well equipped and well maintained. Husband, Manuel
Arag6n, was wise and kind. Bob can use a variety of drugs.
What he did in Chicago.

But snow! The rain never stops!


Manuel shaved his head in high school. "Listen," he said.

« Honey, | Listen, said Bob.

"No. Listen."

And then he heard it, another sound mixed with the water, a long, loud and .
Since the beginning: helicopter music. They weren’t good enough,” he said.
It comes back to moments like this.

But the news gets worse, and the helicopter goes down in the air.
She screamed, stood up and turned around. He saw a helicopter hovering over the water.
pass the fishing boats, then walk to the other side of the trees, and turn
beach.

He was looking for a place to sit.

A giant Sikorsky bird with black wings and the words “InGen .
value." This is called the process of creating a new object
Mountains by the sea. The resort is said to be luxurious and comfortable; quite
People were working in construction, and he took two
anniversary. Bob can remember American holidays with boats and
Tennis court where guests can play games and drink
The real life of the city.

Bobby wonders what went so far across the island for a helicopter to land here.
weather. In the air, he saw the pilot cheering as the helicopter took off.
The sand on the beach. The masked men rushed over and opened the door. fluent
She heard music in Spanish and Manuel nodded.

They called the doctor.


Two black runners hold a hat nearby and a white man shouts. clean
The man is wearing a red robe. A black strip appears on the back of a Mets baseball logo. "There was a
Doctor here? He said, standing up.

"I'm Dr. Carter," he said. It was raining heavily and covering his head and neck. What is
The black man stopped. He was wearing pants and a T-shirt. was
He has a stethoscope, and the man is breathing black air.

"Ed Regis. We have a sick child here, doctor."

"Then you better take it to St. Joseph," he said. St. Joseph left in just twenty minutes.
With the wind.

"Maybe, but we can't cross mountains right now. You need to heal here."

Bobby stands by the injured man as he is rushed to the hospital. With a small one, no.
Who are over the age of eighteen. She lifted her black dress and saw a large cock.
and the other with his feet.

"what happened?"

"Too much blood," Ed growled. "He was falling. A piece of furniture hit him."

The dark-haired boy, who was running around looked devastated.

Manuel stood in the hospital doors, holding his hand. The people won that night.
And he put it on the table in the middle of the room. Manuel embarks on a journey up the mountain, and
Bobby turned to the baby and looked at his body. Suddenly, he could see
If it's not good. the child will surely die.

A large piece of metal wrapped around his leg and pierced his back. at the door of misery;
The meat was dirty. In the background, an animal runs around with its bones in the middle. second
The flap is incised through the femoral and tibial bones to expose the lumbar spine.
Under the wings. His first thought was that his leg was broken.

"Tell me about the problem again," he said.

"|I don't see it," Eddie said. "They said Coke killed him."

"He was probably shot," said Bobby Carter, looking around the room. as
Most palliative care physicians can accurately recall the patients they have seen
year after year. And he saw two men. One of them was a two-year-old boy who fell.
with a Rottweiler. Other people learned about the circus and built
The Bengal tiger. Both disasters had their own reasons. It has decades of Bengal roots.


"Born?" Ed said. "No, no. Kiss on the cheek, trust me." Eddie smiled and said. fluent
He shrugged, acting like nothing was wrong. He asks Bobby why. If they do
Government employees, who have no experience in interior design, must be constantly at risk.

Need collagen? Manuel said.

"Yes," he said. "You'll think about it later."

He bent down and traced the slit with his finger. When the ground is dry.
There is something in Jagan’s body. But not too bad, just a few things.
The flower represents the laurel, a kind of pearl, the flower of death and life. heart
I haven’t heard that.

How long has it been?

"One hour."

Again, he saw the face of Ed Regis. He was one of those people who were scared and worried. and
Not as a product manager. He’s like a leader. In fact, it has
background.

Bobby Carter returned from a party. So he didn't think he
This is a mechanical problem. It just doesn’t matter. The spinal cord is intact and there is no obstruction.
that has pain. Anything wrong with a vehicle is a factory defect - almost always
He gets into a few things. But there is no one here. However, the man was a gentleman.
He was rubbing -licking- on her back, and ​also on her neck.

She was like the real Molly. On the other hand, most bodies are relatively homogeneous, which means
cruelty to animals. He looked over his head, his hands -

sleeve.

She felt like a star when she saw the picture of the boy. Both have access to
Fingers and thumbs and fingers. He worked in Chicago for a long time until
What this means.

"Okay," he said. "Wait outside."

"why?" Eddie said scared. He didn't like that.

"Do you want me to help or not?" He said, opening the door and closing it.
forward. He didn’t know what was going on, but he didn’t like it. Manuel paused. "|Translator
To take a bath?

"Yes," he said. He reached out to the younger Olympus. It took a long time.
It changes its brightness from a sad scene to adjust the brightness. It’s like a real thing, he said.
The boy exclaimed as he put his camera down and smiled. His mouth twitches.
His mouth is open.

“Raptor,” he said. "It's a Raptor…."

As a result, Manuel actually recoiled in shock.

"What does that mean?" Bobby said.

Manuel shook his head. “I didn’t know Drs.

"I don't?" You sound like Spanish. "Then go with him."

"Yes doctor." He gritted his teeth. "It smells bad." And he cut himself.

Bobby looked again at the red circle on his shoulder. He grabbed it and held it.
Top of the tree. It was like a hurricane. ...

The injured boy's eyes widened. "Raptor," he said.

Manuel said in a frightened tone, "It's over."

"What's going on?"

"fierce."

"What is a raptor?" "fluent

It means hippie.

Bobby rolled his eyes. Costa Ricans aren’t friendly, but I’ve heard some rumors.
hupia speakers in the ancient east. It is said that the ancient angels were
The kids understand. According to their beliefs, hippies lived in the mountains of
Costa Rica, but they live on small islands off the coast.

Manuel turns around, talking and smiling. "It's not good stuff that doesn't smell good," he said.
said. "He's a sweetheart."

Bobby was about to tell him to get back to work when the injured boy opened his eyes and sat up.
On the table. Manuel shouted in shock. The wounded boy sighed and hung his head.


He’s looking left and right with big brown eyes. What is
Suddenly, his body began to relax and he hit Bobby, but he was still fine.
From table to floor. He hugged her again. There was blood everywhere. Ed opened his mouth.
door, “What happened?” And when Joel saw it, he turned back.
hand to mouth. Bobby reached over the boat to grab the boy's mouth, but
He did, she knew he didn't, and she was shocked and devastated.

She ran for the door, but Manuel grabbed her by the throat and pulled her away.
back. "No," he said. "Hopia walks."

"Manuel, for God's sake-"

"I don't." He looked at her angrily. "No, you don't understand that."

Bobby saw his body and knew it wasn't right; nothing
He could be resurrected. Manuel called the men, they went home and
The body is finished. Eddie sat up and wiped his mouth with the back of his hand, ​whispering, "I believe you."
Do what you know best.
He turned and went into the house.

"Better," Manuel said.

Bobby shakes the boy's hand. She got dressed in her clothes, in
What causes the damage caused by the enemy. He hoped she wasn't dead.
Construction accidents; He was pressed against her, exposing his shoulder in her defense.
"Where did you come from on this island?" he asked.

"At sea. Probably a hundred and twenty miles offshore," "Far from home."
She said.

Manuel looked at the helicopter. "I hope he doesn't come back."

Well, you guessed it, there are pictures too. But when he returned to the table, he said
that his camera was there.


Then it rained that night. Alone in his room outside the hospital, Bobby sat.
in his native Spanish. The boy says "raptor", and ​continues
Manuel’s opponents, I think, are Spaniards. In fact, it was shown in
dictionary. It means "beast" or "terrible".

It gave him joy. The definition does not adequately describe the word hippie.
Of course, he didn’t open the door. And not one of them was plucked from the tree. is
Was the child trying to warn him?

A noise was heard near the house. Southern Woman posted it in the 2018 months.
project, and ​Elena Morales, a community assistant, is in charge. Bobby was in the hospital.
And he motioned for Elena to leave immediately.

"Ilina..."

"SJ doctor?"

"Do you know what a raptor looks like?"

Elena was black and in her thirties, a strong, ruthless woman. in
At night, under the stars, he looked up at the sky and said, "Rapper?"

"Yeah, you know the word?"

"SJ." Elena shook her head. "It was just ... someone came in at night and shot a dog."

Who cheated?

"Whether."

"A hippie?"

His whole body changed. "No, doctor."

"why not?"

"Don't talk about Hoopia right now," Elena snapped, shaking her head in frustration.
A working woman. "We can't say that right now."

"But the fact that he takes it out and takes it to his servants?"

"Come on and get out?" Elena said, confused. "No, doctor. It's nothing like that. It's normal."
This is a new costume.
I went to the hospital. "I'll call you when I do, doctor. | Wait another hour, no more than two."


Bobby looked up at the stars and listened to the waves crashing into the ocean. in
In the darkness he saw the lights of fishing boats on the sea. Everything else is
She is real, quiet, and ​loves to talk about vampires and babies.

Bobby returns home and learns that Manuel said no
Translation in Spanish. Annoyed, she flipped through the Little English Dictionary and said:
Check out the post there:


raptor \ the [Dr. of L. Ponder's Report, Fr. Raptus]: feathers of birds.


The first post


In the first row of the second column, there is little evidence of
The first mathematical concept will be obvious.


Well done Malcolm
soon
paradise


Mike Bowman watches through his headset as he drives a Land Ruver in Cabo Blanc
Island habitat, West Costa Rica. It was a beautiful morning in July, and
The trail is beautiful: you kick the rock, you see the mountain and the grass
Atlantic Ocean. According to the picture, Cape Blanco is an undiscovered, paradise-like place.
Looking around, Boman finds that the party is back on track.

Bowman, a 36-year-old from Dallas, came to Costa Rica with
His wife and daughter are going on vacation in a couple of weeks. The road is indeed his wife; Every week.
Ellen has her nose to the ground about Costa Rica’s beautiful national parks and how beautiful they are.
Tina could see them. And when they arrived, he told Ellen he had something to see.
She writes outdoors in San Jose. It was the first time that Mike Bohmer had done anything serious and
Experience Health is the cheapest in Costa Rica, and ​we buy out all private hospitals


Yes, they always argued and Mike realized he betrayed her and vice versa. And he put his feet on the ground.
Even the Playstation controller. Anyway, well, Ellen is thirteen and
She was a very beautiful woman. Hell, she was a princess her age in Russia and
It’s been ten years. But Ellen is confused and upset. And so the
Like last year, he was desperate to hold his breath.

That, and ​everything.

The Land Rover had fallen into a ditch and was covered in mud. Sitting down next to him, Elena said, "Mike."
Are you sure it’s okay? We didn’t see each other for hours.

"There was another car 15 minutes away," he recalled. Remember that blue car?

"I'm going the other way..."


"Dude, you just want a break," he said, "and that's what you're going to get."

Elena shook her head with a smile. "| I hope you're right."

"Yes, sir | I want it clean" Christina said from the backseat. He was eight years old.

"Trust me, I'm fine." He smiled a little. "And that's it? Look at the way you look. That's
Beautiful."

"Okay," Tony said.

Ellen left the room, looked in the mirror, and rolled her eyes. fluent
He took a deep breath and left the room.

The track started to slide and Mike Baumer stayed in control on the bike. A little scared.
A red light flashes down the road and this one yells, "Careful! Careful!" And he went out and walked away.
Issue.

"What does it mean?" Elin asked. brain?

"It's probably a myth," Bowman said.

"Can you ask?" Tina said, taking off her hat and revealing some animals.
Of course, she says she’s doing it because she works at school.

"|I don't know," Mike shrugged.

Tina looked at the pictures in the book. "|Don't think of it as a joke," he said.
"| I think it's a different language." And they saw many animals running on their way.

"Okay," he said cheerfully. “As the book says, 'Sea of ​​White Clouds .
A variety of animals roam here, including raccoons and three-toed sloths.
and Quavatamide.' "Do you think we'll see a three-legged warrior, sir?"

"|We will."

"really?"

"Just look in the mirror."

"It was very scary."

The trail winds its way up the mountain to the sea.


Mike Bowman felt like a star when they hit the beach: Two miles clean
sand, running. You park the Land Rover on very wet grass.
water, and ​canned food. Ellen changed into her costume and said, "Yes | No".
You know how I feel.

"Good morning my love." Yes, he thought it was a bit short, but he learned not to.
What is.

Tina was already walking on the beach.

“Don’t forget you have to be in your daytime clothes,” Ellen said.

"Later," Tina shrugged. "I'll go see if there's any news."

Ellen Bowman looked at the water, the trees. "Do you think it's okay?"

"There's no one here for miles," Mike said.

"What about snakes?"

"Oh by God," Mike Bowman said. "There are no water regulations."

"Okay, then..."

"Amiel," he said. "Deer are thirsty for blood. They're human. We can't trust them
The body is warm. Ninety degrees outside. When the snake comes out, cover it. believe
I. There's not a deer on the beach." He saw his daughter running towards the beach
A black line on a white background. "Let him go." Let him go.

He put his hand on his wife’s shoulder.


Tina continued to the end, then collapsed to the ground in frustration.
Walk on water. The sea was rough and there was no water. sit.
For a moment, she held her breath, then turned back to her parents and the car to look at him.
where he lived.

Her mother waved her hand and called her back. Tina nervously crossed her arms, wishing she hadn't.
understand. Tina didn’t want to let go. He will not return, nor will he listen to his voice.
My mom talks about losing weight. She wanted to stay here and maybe see a black man.

Tina had seen Lazy two days earlier at the San Jose Zoo. Like a Muppet
like, and ​it seems like no big deal. In any case, it cannot be easy; He could easily run away with her.


Now, hearing from her mother, Tina decides to go back in time and come back.
water, in the shade of a tree. On one side of the island, mango trees bloom
The soil on the roots of mangroves traps soil. I was left in the dust.
and remove the overgrowth. He saw some bird feet on the ground. in Costa Rica.
His sheep knew. According to the report, there are three times as many tigers in Costa Rica as there were in the 1990s.
Throughout the United States and Canada.

Of course, there are some birds that are too small to
saw. Other roads were steep and muddy. Tina looks at them.
Just then he heard a rustle, and then another rustle through the trees.

Can he forgive those who have not committed adultery? Tina didn’t think so, but she didn’t say so. Kurt came over.
Maybe a shark. He waited patiently, breathlessly, to hear the voice again, finally.
He saw above the word a few feet away a body emerge from the tall trees.
And he tried.

Tina held her breath. A new pet on your list! The dog stood up on his hind legs and studied.
He shook his head and nodded. It looks like this, thick, black and
Red spots on the legs. The tip of the nose traveling through the air becomes small bubbles.
The butterfly raised its head and looked around.

Tina thought it was weird. It’s like a big fish. He raised his hand and shook it.
under their hands.

Laughter is not fear. He walked towards her barefoot. It was very difficult.
It is larger than a dog, and it moves its head like a dog when it walks. Tina thinks so.
You know the truth.

He noticed that the wandering bird had left behind three bird droppings. infant
He approaches Tiny. He covered his body, not wanting to scare the little creature. heart
She was surprised at his approachability, but then remembered it was a public forum. All this
The wildlife in the park is known for being wild. Maybe these three did. very good
He hopes to give her some food. Unfortunately, he couldn’t. Suddenly, Tina turned around.
his hands, clenched, to show that he had no food.

The butterfly screamed, raised its head and flew away.

"I'm sorry," Tiny said. "I have nothing."

And, unexpectedly, the hair ran down his outstretched hand. Tina can imagine.
Her slender fingers touched the flesh of his hand, and ​she felt an animalistic sensation.
Put it down.

The clown waved his hand.


«|I just wanted to see you,» said Ellen Bowman, shielding her eyes from the sun. "That's it. Just look."
you."

"That's great," Mike said as he brought the food from the hotel. I was
It's not good for a rotten chicken and a basket full of meat. Not if Ellen has a haircut.
fluent.

"Do you think he didn't leave a bottle?" Illen said.

"No, ma'am. | No."

"| Here I do," Elena said.

"|I think that's what you want," Mike Bomer said.

"| It's over."

"Okay, what's going on?"

"| I just want to see, that's all," Ellen said.

Then, on the other side of the ocean, through the storm, they heard their daughter screaming. heart
I will cry.


Bontarinas
"I don't think it's right now," Dr. said. Smith. Cross, losing oxygen atoms.


He snuggled into Tina and fell asleep. Mike Bowman was sitting on the edge of the bed next to his daughter. Mike thought.
Sincerely Drs. cross; She is fluent in English, having studied medicine


colleges in London and Baltimore. Dr. Cruz supports the church and convent of Santa Marja
The new hospital in Puntarenas was neither easy nor easy.

But still, Mike Bohmer is concerned. There is no such thing.
His daughter was very sick and away from home.

When Mike first met Tina, she was very shy. All right
There was blood, covered in small beads, each the size of a stick. And there was
In his hands, like tears.

He drove into the ditch. Suddenly, his hand started to turn red and shake.
Mike doesn’t forget the car that drove around town from time to time, a four-door Land Rover.
He was walking along the dirt roads in the mountains, his daughter screaming in terror, and
Pain, and ​his hands turned red and purple. He reaches the end of the park first.
His lips pressed against hers, and ​Tina began to relax. . . .

"Will you be okay now?" Ellen said, looking at the oxygen mask.

«| Trust me,” says Dr. Cross. “| He gave her another dose and she got better."
Quite right. And you can see that the needle holding hand is very fine smoke.

"As for the parts..." said Mike Bowman.

"We don't have an official name yet," the doctor said. "| I personally don't know anything like that."
But you see them disappearing. It’s already hard to get rid of them. happiness |
He took pictures for reference. and | He washed his hands to get some
Raw milk – one for testing here, one sent to the lab in San Jose, and ​ one more shipped
He will rest if he needs to. Do you have the picture he gave you?”

"Yeah," Mike Bowman said. A picture Tina drew of a response from the doctor.
On questions of concern to parents.

Is this the animal that ate it? Dr. said. Cruz when he saw the wire.

"Yeah," Mike Bowman said. "He said the bat was soft, like a cat or a raccoon."

"|I don't know what that is," the doctor said. "He wrote it on the back of his hand..."

"It's a problem," Mike Baumer said. "He said he was walking on his hind legs."

Dr. Cruz yelled. He looked at the picture for a moment. "| I'm not an expert. I asked the doctor."
Gittier joins us here. He is a member of the Biol¢Juco de Carrara, the
of the sea. "You could train me a dog."

No one in Cape Blanc? Booman asked. "That's when you forget."

"Too bad, no," Dr. said. Smith. Cross. “Cabo Blanco doesn’t have permanent teachers.
He worked there for a while. You may have been one of the first people to visit this beach in the 1990s.
Months. But | I hope you see Drs. Gutiérrez has a lot of talent.

Dr. Gutierrez described himself as well-built with a beard and khaki pants. The fear was
If you are an American citizen. He stood in front of Bowman and declared, “Mr.
And Ms. Bowman, like you, we want to hear from you. He later explained that it was a hole in the ground.
biologist who has been working for fifteen years in Costa Rica. Marty Gutierrez
He looked at Tina, held his hands up, scanning each piece of paper.
light, then crush them with tweezers. Moments later, Gutierrez appeared,
He scratches his head as if understanding something. Then he looked at the old bears and
He asks more about the creature, and ​Cruz tells him that it was grown in a lab.

He then turned to Mike Bowman and his wife, who loved him. "I think Tina will be fine."
| “I just want to clarify a few things,” he said, taking notes in a group. "they
Daughter says she was bitten by a one-legged shark that was walking
Dining in the ocean instead of freshwater?

"Well, yeah."

"So the director made a plan?"

"Tina said she was screaming and screaming."

"Like a dog, you say?"

"Whether."

"It looks good," Dr. said. Smith. Gutierrez, "| Check out this work." It counted for one in six thousand.
There are many kinds of insects in the world, and many kinds of birds that live everywhere. In these animals,
There are only four in Latin America. And according to reports, the creature may be one.
In fourth. "| I'm pretty sure this mushroom is Basiliscus amoratus , a species of green mushroom found here.


Costa Rica and Honduras as well. When they stand on their backs, they sometimes look like
feet."

Are they poisonous?

"No, Miss Bowman, no." Gutierrez analyzed the fight with his right
Allergic reactions. “According to the literature, fourteen percent of positive
Dragons, he says, and ​it seems your wife is one of them.

"She was crying, saying she was so upset."

"That's it," Gutierrez said. "Thyroid glands contain serotonin, which controls equity
pain." Crusoe smiled. "Did his body burn with histamine?

"Yes," Cruz said. "rush."

"Serotonin," Gutierrez said. "It's not a question."

Ellen Bowman, however, was undaunted. "But why did he catch the dog in the first place?"

“The dirt is very difficult to clean up,” Gutierrez said. “The farmers are screaming in the woods.
schedule. and sometimes | She heard a dog attacking a child in her house in Amaloy.
50 miles from where you live. That’s how the problem happened. I don’t know how your wife got so much
bite. What are you doing next?”

"It's okay. He said he stayed because he didn't want to scare you."

"I'm fine," Gutierrez said, sounding surprised. He shook his head. "Okay. | I don't think we should say
Which actually happened. Wild animals are not wise.

"What about the beard?" Illen said. "| Always think last. . . ."

"No, no," said Dr. Smith. Gutierrez. "Heaven forbid the reporter, Mrs. Bowman. Your daughter is
He is allergic to a tattoo. There’s nothing else.”

Mike Boman showed Gutierrez the photo he had taken of Tina. Gutierrez shook his head. "am
It treats it like a joke," she said. "Sometimes it's gross, for sure.
Its tail is very long, and it can hold its prey only three fingers long.
It’s very long and very long. But even if this is another option that could work
That’s what we’re talking about.

"But Tina says words are important," Ellen Boman said. "And that's
He had three legs."

"This is a great artist," Mike Bowman said.

"It's true," Gutierrez said, laughing. "But | remember your daughter is being sent."
the amoratus basilisk is the most common, and ​ it is said to be a highly intelligent species of hunchback. This is a great opportunity to learn about
The treatment lasted twelve hours. It should be fine in the morning.


In the current laboratory, near St. Mary’s Hospital, Drs.
Gutierrez sees the predator of the American cat as a monster.
lizard. Serum investigations were immediately positive, although an initial history of
It represents some of the unknown functions of the body. but
The night technician was at work and placed the water samples in the trays.
fridge.

The next day, the day’s staff searched the store for evidence of the missing items.
The patients. It was observed that Bowman, CHRISTINA L. was to attend on Saturday, the .
The authors have collected samples of solids. At the end of the day, it was observed that a sample containing
It turns out it was developed from the laboratory at the University of St. Joseph,… got a diagnosis.
from the ground and set him on his way.


"Go ahead. Say thank you Dr. Cruz," Ellen Bowman said, pulling Tina forward.

"Thank you, Dr. Cruz," Tina said. "I'm fine now." He reached out and grabbed the ground.
Family doctor. So he said, "You have another dragon."

At that time Drs. Cruz was stunned; Then he laughed. "That's it, Tina. Yes | all work
Hospital at night, in the morning | Change my clothes.

"But not your tie?" "I don't.

This is my dress.

Ellen Bowman said, "Mike told you he was watching."

"STRAIGHT." Dr. Cruz smiled and patted the girl’s head roughly. “You can be happy with anything
Welcome to Costa Rica, Tina.


"will."

The Bowman family began traveling when Drs. Cross: “Listen, Tina, remember.
The child who sucks you?

"Good."

"think?"

"Good."

Do you have any legs?

"Whether."

How many hands does it have?

"Three," he said.

"How do you know?"

« Yes | See," he said. "However, all seabirds associate the ocean with
He held out his hand, three fingers crossed. "And good
He also performed this sign on the ground.

"Did the dog make a mark like the bird?"

"Uh-huh," Tiny said. "He walks like a bird too. He moves his head up and down."
He took a few sips and shook his head.

When the Boers left, Drs. Cruz decides to give Gutierrez the word,
Biological Station.

"|He must have wanted to take the girl's word for it," Gutierrez said. "|We did some research
ego. | I don’t think it’s the sweet potatoes. discipline."

"What can we do?"

"No," said Gutiérrez, "we are not in a hurry. However, have you heard a
Is there anyone else sick in the hospital?

"No, why?"

"Tell me, my friend, if you will."


beach;


Marty Gutierrez sat on the beach, watching the early morning sun in the sky until dark.
It shone on the water of the bay, its light reaching below the treeline;
It sits among the mangroves along the coast of Cape Blanca. He can decide how it will be
She stayed at the American woman’s place for two days.

Though in reality, as he tells Bowmans, spiders do more damage.
Gutierrez had never heard of a shark attack. And he didn’t.
All were admitted to the hospital with a stroke. Also, the root of the right-hand function
Larger than Uncle Basil, when he came to the Carrara gate, he saw Fit
There is an official book, but it is not available on any other website about the history of the Basilica. Then he saw
International Bioscience Server, a database based in the United States, but without a website
You’ll take too many medications, or be hospitalized for pneumonia.

She then called the midwife, Amalo, who saw a 9-day-old baby.
She was sitting on her back, her lap holding a cock, hers.
You could say it’s a myth. Then his leg spread to the baby.
He was about to die. The boy says the bird is black with blue eyes. This is what it means
The child is often in front of the woman.

"Okay," Gutierrez said.

"No, just like everyone else," said the doctor, ​adding that he heard another gasp.
Description: A baby in V squez, a small coastal village, screams in his sleep. and
The other is at the Sotrero Gate. This has all happened in the last couple of months. all
Surrounded by sleeping babies and children.

The new monster made Gutierrez wonder if there was an old one.
Living things don’t know. This takes place in Costa Rica. Only seventy-five.
Millions of miles short, the country is smaller than the state of Maine. However, in
Thanks to its vast geography, Costa Rica has many unique features: Sandy beaches.
the Atlantic and the Pacific, four ranges of mountains, whose summits are twelve thousand feet;
And the fire worked; desert, cloud forest, arid, temperate, and desert


Green ground. This complex ecosystem is home to many species of plants and animals.
Costa Rica has three times more horse-owned livestock than any other country in North America. must
A big variety of plants. There are five different types of dogs.

In recent years, new and unexpected discoveries have been made all the time.
For a bad reason. Costa Rica is losing forests as wild animals lose habitat;
They moved to different places and sometimes changed their lives.

So a new thing was created. But he’s happy with what’s new.
A new gynecological disease. Animals carry bacterial diseases, many
It can spread from person to person. Those problems include cervical spinal cord injury, or CSE, and
This resulted in a range of diseases in humans and horses. Gutierrez realized the importance of
To see this new light, if possible, look for disease.

He sat on the beach, watching the sunset and enjoying it. Maybe Tina is too good.
See a new body that may not exist. For now, Gutierrez isn’t finished. This morning was
He picked up a windmill, spray painted it, and proudly sailed out to sea.
But time is running out. Then he had to climb the slope of the desert;
He didn’t want to go into the dark.

Gutierrez got up and started walking to the beach. In the distance, something black.
shouted the person walking through the door of the Black Princess. Gutierrez converted
When it enters the water. If there’s one word, there’s probably another
In the woods, black bears sneak up on people.

But this animal ran freely, walked slowly, and stopped.
He stayed on his feet a lot. There is something on the entrance of the cave. As Gutierrez
He stepped closer, eating bread. The head and body are separated from the tail.
Even in the distance, Gutteridge could see patches of smoke on the ground.

Gutierrez fell to the ground and the deputies were shot. A roaring bull, I know.
Those who live in areas with limited resources are less well off. He didn't even notice when the first train stopped
he shouted as he walked away. As the second train emerged from the tunnel,
Furious and confused, he dropped all his food and fled into the woods.

Gutierrez got back up and walked to the front. He did not recognize his friend; What is
The dose of tranquility was too small to give him anything but a few minutes of relief. It’s almost over.
He wonders what to do with the new money. Gutierrez himself wrote the first draft of the book, but
Others had to return to the United States for better treatment.
course. Who should send it? The teacher was Edward H. Simpson.
New York, professor of veterinary medicine at Columbia University, New York. A good man is
With white hair, Simpson was a world leader in hair styling. bridge,
Marty decides to send his clothes to Drs. Samson.


New York


Dr. Ricard Ston, Director, Columbia University Medical Laboratory
However, the Center admitted yesterday that they had an unexpectedly high rate. in
In the late 20th century, the laboratory occupied the entire fourth floor of the public health building
In the lab, the research team worked to eradicate the yellow fever virus.
Malaria and malaria. But medical and research services are well established in Nairobi and the suburbs.
PoloCon puts TDL in a less prominent position than it once was. is now part of the equation
As a result, there are only two full-time employees, and the men enjoy the
An analysis of the epidemiology of New Yorkers produced. Written Laboratory Work
It didn’t look that morning.

"Oh, it's so easy," the dental lab technician said and continued.
Dunne's sign. “It’s a remote and undiscovered part of Costa Rica.” It's really beautiful.
receipt. "It's all yours, Dr. Stone."

Richard Stone walked around the lab, surveying the newcomers. "It's something Eddie
The Simpson trial?

"Yes," he said. "But | I don't know why you sent me a butterfly."


“His secretary called us,” Stone said. Simpson spends months in Borneo, and
Because the patient had problems with the procedure, she contacted our laboratory for
He caught her. Let’s see what we’ve got, do it.

The white plastic cylinder holds about half a liter and has a metal stopper.
Punishment and punishment. It is called “International Biological Park” and
The graphics and audio are in four languages ​​and the language is designed for
The cylinder to unlock the ruthless leaders of the world.

The reporters did so, and ​when Richard Stone turned on the main light, he could see the flames.
There are still gases. The powder is pumped through the air compressors into the glass and
Mask. The lab then analyzed sewage samples from Venezuela
Pilchichi, Japanese hepatitis B, Kayasanur thu virus, Langat virus, Mayaro. so
Make the sky.

There were sounds of gas and white smoke. The cylinder turned black.
cold. Inside, he sees a sandwich box on the lock with something shiny inside. The stones are scattered.
It depends on the thickness of the paper. A piece of grilled red meat.
Table with loud music.

“Huh,” you say. "Like food."

"Yes," Stone said. "What do they want?"

The technician checks the addressed envelope. "My son is bullying the neighborhood kids."
Research on Animal Diseases and Pesticides
She posted a picture of a child on the street, with the word TINA written on the back. "baby .
A picture of a baby."

Stone looked at the picture. "Of course, we don't need to do tests on mice," Stone said. "But we know
The condition can be easily diagnosed by performing a blood test for this drug. What do they say?
This dog?

"'Basilicus amoratus with three breathing tubes,'" he said, reading.

"Okay," Stone said. "Let's go. While we're waiting for him to show up, get an x-ray done and do
A signed Polaroid. When we draw blood, we start making antibodies until we get some
Your friend. Let me know if there is a problem.


Before breakfast, the labs delivered the news: the dialysis had gone wrong.
A bacterial or viral infection. Venom profiles were also conducted and the same results were obtained.
Friend: Blood is a bit sensitive to King Kabra’s venom. But yeah
Cross-reactivity is the difference between the new mice and Drs. Stone doesn’t take it lightly
The assistant faxed them to Drs. Martin Guthrie on the same night.

It wasn’t a question of ball speed; Wait for the doctor to return.
Simpson. He didn’t return for a few weeks and his secretary asked if TDL would.
Make sure you hold the hair at this point. Dr. Stone puts it in a sack and
And he put it in the temple.


Martin Gutierrez read a statement from Columbia Medical Center/Trump Disease Laboratory. fluent
might : -


Source: Basilica Amortis and Mathematics Education Software
(Adapted from the work of Dr. Simpson)


Parameters: _ field, ? Some animals eat.


Things are happening. X-ray, microscopy, immunohistochemistry for RTX;
Bacteria, viruses, bacterial contamination.


Results: There was no histological or immunological evidence of previous infection in this case.
Species of Basiliscus amuratus.


(sign)
Richard A. Stone, MD . , pattern


Gittier published two articles on the subject. First, the large
As for potatoes, it was discovered by researchers at Columbia University. And second, if
The absence of a bacterial infection means that warts cannot grow, sometimes meaning they do not grow.
Costa Rica’s energy problem is enormous. But suppose the first statement is true:
If a species of animal is taken from the mountain in another country, and it comes
Connect with the villagers. Gutierrez hopes that in a few weeks, it will change
Take a guess and the results are below.


In 1990, heavy rains washed away the roof of the hospital.
Download anascope. It was almost midnight; Losing strength in the storm, Elena of the island.
Morales was using a flashlight when he heard a gunshot. I think a
He was so scared that he immediately left his mother and went to another house.
to see the baby. As his hand touched the door, he heard a command.
And he stood up. The bird appeared to fly out the window to escape the rain. coast
Rukans say that if a bird comes, the child will bring good luck.

Elena opened the door. The baby sits on a belly, wrapped in a blanket, alone.
His face was white. Near the entrance, three dragons roar like monsters.
When they saw Elena, they turned their heads and looked at her in disgust, but they didn't run away. in
Elena's dim light drew blood from their noses. He smiled, it was a laugh.
He nodded, quickly turning his head and ruffling some of the boy's hair.

Elena stands up, screaming, and ​the ladder falls. But before the
When she reached the crib, she saw what had happened to the baby and realized
The child had to die. Children scattered through a rainy night, screaming and screaming, who
They have three hind legs like birds.


The following message


Then, when Elena Morales refused to mention the hate crime. though
She was afraid of being arrested for leaving the baby.
No one expects it. And he told his mother that they had taken him away, and that he was dead.
Among the books St. Joseph sent was SIDS: Preventing Infant Death . This is a syndrome.
unknown cause of infant death; It wasn’t big and very sweet.
He doesn’t get it.

St. Joseph lab explores Tiny Bowman's mind
His teaching is excellent. There are as many layers as there are. But between
Proteins are a problem: Whey was one of the most popular proteins in the 1980s
knowledge. Its biological effects have not been studied, but it is thought to be a fatty acid.
Cobras are very venomous, though.

The lab also detects elevated levels of antioxidant enzymes. why
The enzyme is an example of genetic engineering and is not linked to algae, say technologists
He thought it was just a quick lab and didn’t say anything when Drs. Patience played
Dr. Words.

The spider sits in a freezer at Columbia University, waiting for Drs. He’ll be back.
Simpson, doesn’t wait a month. Well, it might have been much better if he
A pathology lab technician named Alice Levine came in and checked this.
Bowman laughs, and ​says "Oh boy who drew the dinosaur?"

"in?" said Richard Stone, with a smile on his face.

"Dinosaurs. Huh? My son's been watching them all the time."

"It's a joke," Stone said. "From Costa Rica. The girl is stuck downstairs."

"No," Alice Levy shook her head. "Look. It's big. That big full cock is so big
The back of his head. You are a dinosaur.

"It doesn't have to be him. It's only a foot away."

"So? There were little dinosaurs back then," Alice said. "Trust me, | she knows. | she has two kids."
I’m an expert. The youngest dinosaurs were under one foot. Tennisaurus or something similar, | I don't
expert. This name is not good. "You can't learn this stuff when you're ten."


"You don't get it," Richard Stone said. "It's a picture of a modern hero. They're
Send me a dog. He’s upstairs right now. Stone smiled and nodded.
share.

Alice Levine patted her shoulders and neck. He didn’t catch it. "|Nothing
I know," he said. “But this looks like a dinosaur to me."

Stone shook his head. "impossible."

"why?" said Alice Levine. "They're good dogs or pigs or whatever they call themselves."

Stone shook his head. Alice didn’t know; The technology
She works in the bacteriology lab. And he has a very good idea. stone
She remembers the time she thought a project manager was following her. . ...

"You know," said Alice Levine, "if it had been a dinosaur, Richard, it might have been a big problem."

"Not a dinosaur."

"Did anyone see it. "No,"

The stone.

"Well, take him to the museum or something," Alice Levy said. "You don't think so
should."

"I'm sorry."

Do you want me to do it for you? said.

"No," said Richard Stone. "|It's okay."

"Can't you do something?"

"Nothing." She returned the bag to the fridge and closed the door. "No
Dinosaur, a toy. However, wait until the doctor returns. Simpson goes to Borneo to
hear. That’s the end, Alice. This waste isn’t going anywhere.


The second time.


With any version of Frattle Law, it can change quickly.


Ian Malcolm
The inner mine


Alan Grant lowered his head, his mouth an inch off the ground. It’s too hot.
One hundred degrees. His foot hurt, even though he was wearing shoes. His hands were locked.
Strong alkaline powder. She rested her head on his chest. But Grant forgot
aggressive. His gaze settled on the six cardinals of the world in front of him.
Working with ink and artist’s ink, she created a small L shape.
A piece of wood. He was only a foot tall and stronger than his arm. The teeth


a design, and ​he was given an assignment to learn] design. The physical properties of the body are as
collect. Grant took a moment to cover the bones in cement before
appear. Surely the eggs were a tiny predatory dinosaur.
His owner died 39 million years ago when he was two months old. with all blessings.
Granite can also transform the entire landscape. If that happens, this is the perfect first episode.
Children eat meat -

"Oh my God!"

Alan Grant closed his eyes and looked into the sun. He took off his glasses and cleaned them.
Head and hands.

He was on a shipwreck in the illegal town of Snakewater, Montana.
Beneath the dark clouds lay rocky mountains.
He runs for miles in every direction. There are no forests or forests. It was nothing but a bad marriage.
The sun is shining and the wind is blowing.

Investigators found the site unsuitable, but when Grant visited the site,
He saw something else. This infinite world is a different world.
which were created eighteen thousand years ago. In his mind, Grant found himself
A sea of ​​red and green that became the mouth of an ocean. Mediterranean
Thousands of miles, stretching from the New Rock Mountains to
Birds are indigenous to Appalachia. All of South America was underwater.

At that time, small clouds were in the sky and obscured the nearby smokestacks.
tractors. The air was rich in carbon dioxide. The plants are growing well.
farm. There are no fish in this water, but there are crabs and crabs. brushes
He jogged to catch up with you on the floor. Some predatory dinosaurs swim.
They are walking along the river. There was an island in the sea.
It’s about two acres. Surrounded by towering cliffs, the island is a perfect getaway.
where cannabis herbivores put their food in the ground and thrive
Let your kids cry it out.

Over the centuries, the fresh alkaline oceans cooled and
And it fell. The hard surface cracked and cracked from the heat. And a small island in the ocean with its own.
The dinosaur fossils were born in a rising mountain range in northern Montana that is now owned by Alan Grant.
Gosling.

"Oh my God!"

He stood with fourteen men in sackcloth and sackcloth. He heard the laptop beep.
Yes, it was the sound of a distant light from a large rock on a familiar mountain.
He sees the children working on the cart, removing the large red rocks
They looked at them with their eyes closed. At the top of the hill, he saw six of his Tipis in his clothes, panting heavily.
A tent, and ​ a trailer they use as their rented lab. And when he saw Eli's hand, he went.
The floor of the field laboratory.

"and!" he said, looking west.

Grant was a black and white Ford truck heading down a dirt road.
they. He glanced at his watch: on time. On another hill, the boys stopped and were rewarded.
Not many people get to see it on the Snake Coast, and ​there is a lot of talk about it.
The head of the Environmental Protection Agency wants Alan Grant to look into it.

But Grant knows that paleontology, the study of extinct life forms, has in recent years
Not what you expect at this point. The modern world has changed and s
Responses include deforestation, global warming, and ozone depletion
The answer, however, is the same old story. Available information from marketing experts
give. They have been called as expert witnesses twice in the past year.

Grant started down the hill behind the wheel.


The subject was rewarded with white powder as he approached the car door. "Bob Morris, EPA," he said,
He looked at his hand. "I'm in the San Francisco office."

Grant introduced himself and said, "Hey, you want a beer?"

"Jesus like that." Maurice appears to be in his 20s, wearing a tie and a work suit.
He dropped the word. Their shoes clicked on stones as they walked towards
Thank you.


« Yes | First I came to this island, | I thought it was an Indian village,” Morris said, pointing.
of Tips.

"No," Grant said. "It's a great way to be here." Grant explains that in 1978, the first
During the Gonzalez years, they came from the West in a flurry of missions.
available. But the heat is still in the air. Try different types of tents.
Only one answer. Then they started having tipis, the roofs were bigger, better and
Rising in the air. “It was the Blackfoot Tipis, built on four corners,” Grant said. "His Tips
It’s been done on the third. But this is the Red Sea and we worry. . ."

"Uh-huh," Maurice said. "good morning." He looked at her body and covered his face.
head. "How long have you been here?"

"About 60 generations," Grant said. When Maurice refused, he said: “We thought .
time in beer. We started in June with a hundred people. We’ve run about six rounds so far.

"Thirty-three, to be exact," said Ellie Sattler, as they reached the carriage. Grant cheered.
Look at Morris’s face. Ellie wears a white dress and a long skirt. fluent
He was 24 years old and black. Her blonde hair was pulled out.

"Ellie is teasing us," Grant said. "He knew what he was doing."

What am I doing? Maurice asked.

“Smells old,” Ellie said. “And | to do something with the show." He opened the door and
And they went in.

a pothole in the road does not drop the temperature to eighty-five degrees, but
It was raining in the evening. There are large metal shelves and small shelves.
Healthy bone samples were analyzed and analyzed. It has a computer and
education . It tastes like vinegar.

Morris looked at Bones. "I think dinosaurs are cool," she said.

"They are," Ellis said. "All you see here are children. Snake water
It’s interesting because there are so many dinosaur fossils here. Until it starts
In practice, little dinosaurs are unpredictable. Only the wind remains.
The Gobi Desert. We saw many species with legs and tails.
For children.

When Grant went on the knife edge, he revealed Mauricio’s acid-collagen creams used
to extract carbohydrates from the roots.

"It's like a bird's nest," Morris says, shaking his head.

"Yes," he said. "They look like birds."

"What about them?" Morris said, pointing down the street at the edge of a large ditch.
At the bottom, metal is applied.

"It was a struggle," Ellis said. “The bones smelled when we collected them, old
We were able to release him a few days later, but we are now sending him back to the court to continue the investigation.

"A mathematical problem?" Maurice said.

"Take it with you," Grant said, pouring a beer into his mug. And he gave the other to Elijah. fluent
He took a deep breath. Muric nodded.

"We don't hear it here," Grant said. Do you want to come to my office?

"Yes," said Maurice. He led Grant to the sidewalk, where a guard was sitting
Well maintained table, well maintained table. Grant fell to the ground and screamed.
Then he blew out a cloud of dust. He bent down and dropped his shirt on the table behind him.
He motioned for Morris to sit on the couch. "relax."

Grant is a professor of genetics at the University of Denver and one of its senior authorities.
His teachers, but he didn’t remember the old ones. He looked around.
like a stranger, and he knew that there were important things ahead.
and their relationship. Grant is not intimidated by scholars, museum curators, why
He called them the Teak Dinosaurs. He tried to take the clothes off and
Something that runs through all the Teacup Dinosaur Hunters, right down to their jeans-wearing and cheerful voices.

Grant watches Maurice pull out of his car before grabbing a bite to eat. Mauricio
She opened her bag and rummaged through it before turning to Ellie, who was watching her in the elevator.
With the bones and sides of the parchment paper, you won’t have to worry about them;
"You probably know why I'm here."

Grant shook his head. "Too late, Mr. Morris."


“Well,” Morris said, “to be sure, the EPA is looking at this project.
The Hammond Foundation. You get some money from them.

"Fifty thousand dollars a year," Grant agreed. "For the last five years."

What do you know about music? Maurice said.

Grant raised his hand. "The Hammond Foundation is a wonderful resource for education. They are."
Education Support Around the world, there are many education services. | all they knew was that they were supporting Bob.
Kiri sent Tyrell to Alberta and June Weller to Alaska. Maybe more."

"Do you know how the Hammond Foundation funds a lot of dinosaur research?" Mauricio
won.

"Yeah. Probably because John Hammond has dinosaur wings."

"Are you Hammond?"

Grant raised his hand. "Once or twice. He comes here to stay awhile. He's very nice, you know."
And eccentric, just like the rich sometimes. But it was always so much fun. why?"

"Well," said Morris, "the Hammond Society is a secret society." fluent
He pulled out a map of the world with red circles and handed it to Grant. "these
Digs was paid last year. Do you notice any difference between them? Montana Alaska
Canada, Sweden .. . They all live in the West. It's been forty-five hours.
Morris pulled out a piece of paper. "It's like every year. There are dinosaur projects in the West, in
In Utah or Colorado or Mexico, you don’t lose money. The Hammond Foundation is only available during the summer.
Question of time. We want to know why.

Grant quickly looked at them. While it is true that the word simply means star
The category, however, is a mistake, as some of the best dinosaurs
It can be used in hot weather, and ​ -

"And I have another friend," Morris said. "For example, the relationship between dinosaurs."
The Ambers?

"Amber?"

"Yeah. A slice of bread-."

"|You know how it is," Grant said. "But why do you ask me?"

"Yes," Morris said, "in the last five years, Hammond has grown tremendously."
Many diamonds have been found in the United States, Europe, and Asia, and are kept in museums.
treasure. The foundation spent seven million dollars on Amber. Now they have.
"He's in the worst place in the world in terms of looks."

"|He's not your father," Grant said.

"Only when no one else is," Morris said. "Like we said, it doesn't make sense
all. Amber is easy to use. It doesn’t matter how big or small it is. There is no reason to
think. But that’s what Hammond has done for years.

"Amber," Grant said, shaking his head.

"And what about your island of Costa Rica?" Morris did. “Ten years ago, Hammond.
The country became the capital of Costa Rica. You should do
Conservation Biology."

«|I don’t know about that,» Grant said.

"|I can't ask for too much," Morris said. The island is about a hundred miles to the west.
coast. It is very small, and it is located in an ocean where air and water meet
Do it forever. They called it the Mountain Project. The mist of the island.
Costa Ricans appreciate being liked,” Morris said.
The bomb. He said, “Yes | Suppose, according to the letter, you get paid.
The revenge of the king of the island."

"| Is he?" Grant said.

Morris handed Grant a piece of paper. One Slack was released in March 1984.
Retrieved from InGen Inc. All rights reserved. All rights reserved. on Farallon Avenue, Palo Alto, California. Recorded by Alan Grant in Haiti.
Twelve million dollars. On the other side, the concept of advocacy.
Tekitl/Costa Rica/Albergue.

"Obi, now," Grant said. "| Remember this. It sounds simple, but | Remember this. And don't
Everything happens as a team.


Illan Grant discovered the first group of dinosaurs in Montana in 1979, and ​several more in 1979.
Over the next couple of years, but it wasn’t until 1983 that he published his book.
His research shows that thousands of dinosaurs lived in the world’s oceans.
At sea, build your own beach house and join a colony of dinosaurs
Feed an adult every night. Resources for Dinosaur Cats are
Beautiful babies stick their tongue out of their face everyone loves them. huge
It includes quizzes, papers, and books. So, it changed everything.
He wants to keep playing. But that was in the middle of the dark ages.
In the 1980s, Ingen Company decided to expand.

Have you heard of InGen? Maurice asked. "I don't."

How did they come to you?

"Phone calls. A guy named Gennaro or Genino, something like that."

Morris shook his head. said: “Donald Gennaru. "a victimized InGen."

"Anyway, he was curious about eating dinosaurs. And he paid me
“Write a book.”
He loves baby dinosaurs. Children and adolescents. What they ate. | thought
Support | I know.

"You know what?"

“No, no.
Food Information. But Genora says she knows we don’t know everything and she wants her own way.
we. And he gave him a lot of money. 50 million dollars.

Morris picked up a tray and set it on the table. "Do you think?"

"No, go away."

"So Gennard called you in 1984. What happened next?"

"No," Grant said. "You see what we do here. Fifty thousand people volunteer for two summers."
From Gosling. | Tell him I'm working | can."

"Okay, let me make you a book."

"Whether."

"What's with women eating dinosaurs?"

"Whether."

Were you friends with Genory?

"No. Just over the phone."

Jenny says why do you need this information?

"Yes," Grant said. "He wanted to create a children's museum and he wanted to show kids
Dinosaurs. She said she researches and consults with experts in education. there
Naturalists like me, a Texas mathematician named Lane Malcolm, and a couple
Environmental Scientists. Systems analyst. Good group.

Morris shrugged and looked at the paper. "How can you follow orders?"

"Whether.
We found the Hadrosaurus.”

What message did you send? Maurice asked.

"Everything: weight loss, stress, diet, exercise. Everything."

"And how did Genora know?"

"Loud. Sometimes in the middle of the night. Do dinosaurs eat
this? Will they eat this? Should that be in the film? | He didn’t know why.
So you do it. | value, | I thought the dinosaurs were important, but they weren’t. they
He died thirty-five thousand years ago. He thinks his questions can wait until late at night.

"|Look," Morris said. “Is it $50,000?”

Grant shook his head. "I care about Genora and I gave her everything. We did."
Twelve thousand. Maybe in ’85.”

Morris wrote a book. "And InGen? Are there other options?"

"Since 1985."

"And when did the Hammond Foundation start funding your research?"

"I'll have to see," Grant said. "But that was the time. The mid-'80s."

"And Hammond is known as a dinosaur enthusiast."

"Whether."


Morris made another statement.

"Look," Grant said. “If the EPA is concerned about John Hammond and his actions -
North of the dinosaur land, iron ore deposits, the Costa Rican coast - why not ask.
Is that what that is about?

"At this point, we don't know," Mohr said. "why not?" Grant said.

"Because there was no evidence of wrongdoing," Monroe said. "But I | think that
John Hammond was a fugitive from justice.


"|We were scared the first time," Morris explained, "because of the streaming industry. OTT
It oversees the development of American technology.
They say InGen has two inappropriate levels of technology transfer. First, Inj sent three.
Find XMP in Costa Rica. Ingen said it was a change in the economy and said.
Not the middle. But OTT can’t figure out why anyone would need that capability.
in Costa Rica.

"Three things," Grant said. Is it some kind of computer?

Morris shook his head. "That's a lot of computational power. To be exact, three cranes use
It has more earning power than any other private company in the United States. and InGen
train in Costa Rica. You have to ask yourself why.

"| Wait. Why?" Grant said.

"Nobody knows. And Hood is worried," Morris said. “The courts
Automatic genome encryption – machines that decode the genetic code. those
Fresh produce is not included in the price. But any genetic medicine lab can
You have one if it could be worth half a million dollars." He looked at his book. "Well, a
Meanwhile, InGen installed 24 Honda receivers in the Costa Rica Islands.

“It’s also called interregional transportation, not commerce,” Morris said. "there
OTT isn’t doing anything. They didn’t like the job at all. But Angel
In fact, he runs one of the most powerful companies in the world.
It comes from Central America. A country without laws. as well as
This has happened before.

Some U.S. bioengineering companies are going public.
city ​​to avoid the law. Most importantly, Maurice
You know, from Biosyn’s head.

In 1986, the Cupertino Foundation developed a Conta vaccine.
Strawberry Chili. Neither the Chilean government nor the farmers working there were informed. they
He just released the monster.

The vaccine is made from a live virus that has been genetically modified to become a virus. but
The disease is unknown; The bios does not know if the virus can be repaired or not.
Worse, the virus mutates. You can’t have herpes without
That one bit the beast. But Biocin changes the virus so that it enters the body. Your
He can get sick just by inhaling it. Biosyn officials brought the live virus to Chile in the 1990s.
On commercial aircraft, passenger aircraft. Maurice often wondered what would
If the capsule is ruptured during trauma. Everyone on the flight can have
People are amazing.

straight. It's not good. It wasn’t good. But nothing happens
For lifelong friends. Unwitting Chilean workers put their lives at risk;
The Chilean government has complained about the economic crisis, and US officials
There is no judgment. Well, Lewis Dodgson, the geneticist who led the study, is still working.
Bios. Biosyn is a smart guy. And other American companies quickly followed suit.
Those working in foreign countries with limited access to medical education. Countries and
Yes, the company is a tech giant
in their own country;

“That’s why we started looking for InGen,” Morris says. "Three weeks ago."

"And how do you believe?" Grant said.

"Not much," Morris said. « If | He came back to San Francisco, we had to shut him down.
in the experiment. and | I think it will end here." He started to pull up his pants- "So
But what is 'Hyperspace of Genius'?


“That’s a good part of my question,” Grant said. " 'Hyperspoo' is a word
His body is as big as a three-dimensional statue. | You have to do all the work.
The dog needs to eat and walk and sleep, can do the dog in
Lots of space. Some paleontologists argue that the most intelligent animals
Proliferative hyperplasia. 'Teen Part' Has Kids
dinosaurs—if you want to be one, you can be.”

Just as the call ended, the phone rang. Ali replied. "It's a lot of work, sir," he said.
common. Can you talk to me?”

Morris packed his bag and left. "Thank you for the support and the beer," he said.

"It's okay," Grant said.

Grant and Morris walked down the hall to the front door. “Me,” Morris said.
Did Hammond ask for anything on your behalf? Bones, bones, or something similar
What is?"

"No," Grant said.

“Dr Satter says you do magic here … »

"Well, not really," Grant said. “When we get the needles out or something.
Instead of keeping them in the museum, we send the bones to a lab to be dissected.
And it wants to send us proteins, and those proteins recognize it and send us the signal.
we."

What lab? Maurice asked.

"Salt Lake Clinical Biology Services."

How did you choose them?

"The game."

"Doesn't the lab have anything to do with InGen?" Maurice asked. "I don't

available | Find it,” Grant said.

And they came to the entrance of the village. Grant opened the door and felt a fresh breeze outside.
Morris sat up and put his glasses back on.

"Then," Morris said. "Let's say Ingen doesn't make a record. Does he?"
What else did you do with the information you gave them?”

Grant laughed. "Yeah. They probably fed the baby Hadrosaurus."

Morris laughed too. "Small Hadrosaurus. A sight to behold. How big?"

"Yeah," Grant said, pulling his hand back six inches. "A little out of the way."

"And how long before they mature?"

"Three years," Grant said. "Give or take."

Morris drew his gun. "Okay, thanks again for your help."

"Turn around," Grant said. He looked at her for a moment as Maurice turned around.
in his car, and closed the car door.

What do you think? Grant said.

Eli raised his hand. "Cheers0)


DNA provides the molecule FROG

Mysore 2.12.9
Procomygotinid 3.03.7
Ethniel 3.13.3
Version 1.03.0
Hypsiboduntid 2.42.7


Bottom line: all living dinosaurs have their own nucleus or nucleus, DNA. Some of the
Animals do. Wu still couldn’t understand why it took so long. But he couldn't
When they say Grant is smart. Dinosaurs were huge.

He runs into the courtroom.


Lex


He jumped into a hole about a foot wide and walked along the side of the road. was
Baseball glove in his mouth and he paced back and forth, wiping his mouth.
at the end of the tube. It was dark, but he could see through his binoculars.
He was kind and good-natured.

"I'm Lex. Tim."

He didn't answer. He was always throwing stones. "come."

He shook his head no. He could see how much pain she was in.

"Lexi," he said, "when you leave, I'll let you wear seven pairs of underwear."

He just shook his head.

« View from | There,” she said as she picked up her bag. He looked down, not recognizing her. I was
It may be too dark to see. "Here's your clothes, Lexa. | Take off your clothes."

"And what."


He tried to do something else. "There must be a problem n there. There are still stars. You don't want
and?"

He leaned his head back against the pillow.

"why not?"

"There are some servants here."

This took a while. He hadn't said "amen" in a long time.

"The ammonia is gone," he said.

"There's a river. Trancer Rex."

"eventually."

"Where did he go?"

"| I don't know, but he's not alive right now," Tim said, hoping it was true.

Lex didn't move. He hugged her again. Tim sat down on the grass next to the bucket.
Wherever he could see. He had the chair. He took her hand and stood up.
He couldn't think of anything else to do. "I'll just stay here," he said. "And calm down."

"Is Daddy out there?"

"No," he said, surprised. "I'm coming home, Lex."

"Did my mother do it?"

"No, Lexi."

Are there great people here? Lex said.

"No. But I know they won't come here. They can leave now."

Then he enters the room and leaves. I shouted to the stars and
It's not good dried blood, but it's good.

She turned around angrily, "Where's Dr? Okay?"

"|I don't know."

"Well, he's been here before."

"How? Yes?"

"First," Lex said. "| When he saw | it was in the tub."

"Where did he go?"

How do I know? Lex said, frowning. “Good morning,” he began.
Hell! The great doctor? Good doctor!"

Tim didn't like the sound he made - it might scare the transaurus - but .
A moment later, he heard another voice. He was heading straight for the ground.
It’s the story that Tim broke a few minutes ago. Tim was surprised to see his soul mate, the doctor.
Grant approached them, a big smile on his face next to his shoulder, but he.
It was very good.

"Thank God," he said. "I'm looking for you."


With a sigh, Eddie Regis stood up and wiped the blood from his face and hands. It took some time.
It took a long half hour, nestled between huge mountains on a ridge above the road. recognize.
There wasn't much room to hide, but she was scared and unsure. There was a door.
This place, he wanted to focus, but then he saw this dinosaur.
His mind. That’s where the dinosaurs came from. Go back to the car.

Ed Reggie doesn’t remember what happened next. I think the ocean
He said, but she couldn't take it anymore and just continued.
Along the way, he lost his footing, fell off a cliff and had to take a short break.
It looks like it could walk between rocks and fall there
The body was there, so that’s what he did. He’s scared and doesn’t think anything of it.
He should quit his job. And finally, when he suddenly
On the rocks, lost in thought, frightened, and
He regrets leaving the kids behind and running away, now he is fine. fluent
He knew he had to get back on track, he had to try to save them because he always knew
He thinks it’s cute and cute, but when he wants to
For him, he would have settled there - at least. He began to panic.
He also had trouble breathing and could barely walk.

He himself said it was good. If there were children on the way, it could
Nothing, and now Eddie Regis doesn't know what they're doing, and that's fine.


He stayed where he was. No one knew what had happened except him. And there was
He couldn't do anything. He couldn't do anything. And so the soldiers stayed.
The mid-century couple, horrified, wondered if the boys were dead,
And what Hammond says when he’s ready.

What shocked him was what he saw in her mouth. soon
Her mouth watered with a smile, and she blinked, wondering if she had seen him that summer.
Regis grabbed her face and felt the skin of her neck next to his mouth. Then, but not
We were very scared. He finally realized that the red meat was the carcass he was trying to eat when he opened his mouth. I was
In his mouth. Shocked and confused, Regis was worried and thought he was going to pass out.
The skin on his head, feeling the blood rush to his mouth, he gasped and gasped in shock.
in the woods. He felt another finger, pulled it out, and left a trail
following. Jesus, perhaps, is fed up with them. I went down to the bottom of the hill. these
The mountain slopes are full of wildlife. This includes the black metal. What did the staff say?
The butterflies on your clothes. They like quiet places. They like their cigars.
you-

"Thank you!"

He stood up. There was a buzz in the air.

Thank you! The Great Doctor!

Jesus, she was a girl.

Ed Regis heard the call. He was not afraid or discouraged. cotton
name in the system. And he quickly realized he needed to do something else.
Turns out, the Tyransaurus had to surrender - or at least lose - the
Other people may survive. Grant and Malcolm. Everyone can live. and data
Let him rest for a while like you did when the police arrived.
He cast it, and he tried it, because he knew what to do, and he used it.
On the mountain you have already decided your future.
She said, how everything is fine this time.

Reggie wipes the food off his face and hands, a sign that he’s hiding. fluent
He wasn't ashamed to hide, but now he had to make a choice. He stepped away again.
He followed her down the road, but as he came out of the cliff he stopped for a moment. fluent
I didn’t see the car. Like a mountain top. The Land Cruiser should be
above.

He started walking up the hill back to the Land Cruiser. It’s very dangerous. feet.
They walk on the ground. He couldn't stop thinking about the girl. Why did he leave?
Greetings? As he walked, he realized something. so
Unless you have to go again. Tyrannosaurus was probably even bigger. Here
He had reached the top of the mountain. It’s the craziest thing in the house.

And he stood up. Not good, not good.

Ed Regis got annoyed and started walking towards the gathering.


Alan Grant wrapped his arms around his waist and bound his fingers and toes. He is blind.
There is pressure. A miracle: if you miss the butterfly, you miss it. "I said | I'm sorry," he said
said.

"Well | I need to see."

The boy wasn’t too happy. Tim’s wife was devastated and upset; Grant paused.
He broke it. His right knee was in extreme pain and swelling. But his legs are all
good. Both children were able to walk. That’s the most important thing.

Grant himself was fine except where he injured his right knee.
The tyrannosaur was out. He fights with all his might, but that doesn’t mean he’s dangerous and
He couldn't believe what he was doing.

He thought about wanting a sword, because he couldn't remember anything.
That was before he jumped, screaming, into the tree ten feet away
The circle of the world. First, he drew blood from his nose, so he stuck his chain in the blood and
After a while it dried up. Then, he started walking to find Malcolm and the kids.
Grant can’t believe she’s alive and the tortured images start coming back
Try to understand them. The Tyrannosaurus had to kill them all. why not?


"I'm scared," Leake said.

"Me too," Grant said. "We need to get back to our community. And we need to say
This is for the time being.

Are we the only ones who know? Tim said. "Whether.

We have to go back and tell them.

"Then we'll go back to the hotel," Tim said, pointing to the island. "thus
We will find them if we accept them.

He looked at Grant. And he could only think of one thing: his broken leg.
Even the Earth Crusaders didn’t make the cut. What animal is that? can
Just think of one thing - a Tyrannosaurus skeleton.

"| Don't worry about it, Tim. There are plenty of ways to go the other way," Grant said. "Yes
The Tyrannosaurus moves, and we catch it.

"Should we be patient here?" Tim said.

"Yes," Grant said. "We'll wait here until someone arrives." "am

Hungry,” Leake said.

"|I hope it's not too late," Grant said. "am

I’m not staying here anymore,” Lex said.

Then, from the top of the hill, they heard thunder.

"Stay here," Grant said. And he went up the mountain. "Stay here," Tim

With that, he ran away.

Lex followed his brother. "No, don't leave me here, guys-"

Grant was grateful. He tried to think. He shook his head and
He pointed to the mountain to see.


At the top of the hill, Grant saw Eddie Regis, standing there, motionless. He walked towards them up the hill.
They didn't talk. The fear of tourists and wild elephants is gone.
weird. The only sounds were the rustling of leaves and the rustling of the wind.

Lexi started to speak, but Grant sat down on a nearby bench and put
There is no conflict. Tim came up behind them. Grant raised his hand.
His mouth told them to stay, and he looked sternly at the tree.

The street was dark, and the branches of the trees swayed in the wind.
The moonlight became intense and variable. Ed Regis is dead. Receiving support
It’s time to find out. FM cut the neck of the big box and pulled it out.
Reggie didn’t ask.

The forest was flooded.

Lex reaches for Grant's clothes, trying to figure out what's going on. Then, he
Somewhere nearby, they felt a gust of wind stronger than the wind. Lex
He also left because he appeared in a movie.

The words carried them too far, breathing heavily. Grant thought it was a
The horse is panting.

Grant looked at Regis and saw shards shining in the moonlight on the table.
Amusing. But Grant acknowledges that there is another, less obvious, threat to others.
Rides well: Small, strong head and base.

He turned to the wind.

Tim nodded and nodded. Lex did the same.

They hear a rustling sound like grass clippings, and ​a Tyransaurus appears in the road. is
Boy: About eight feet tall, walks like a cat, apparently.
A puppy. Tyrannosaurus guy walking down the street, standing on all fours, sniffing the air
Before you go further. He walked into the forest where Regis was hiding, there was no sign that he
He saw it. Grant noticed Regie's body shaking slightly. Regis turned his head to look at her.
at the top of the Tyransaurus tree.

There are no tyrannosaurs roaming the streets these days. Regis began to panic and made his plans.
In the tree. But the tree is not finished. Regis sat by the wall for another half hour.
One minute. Then the sound came again: the first rustle of a green, green tree.
On one page, then the whole page. Regis turned from the tree and sighed.


Look at the problem. He walked the other way and looked the other way.
Tyrannosaurus.

The attack was imminent.

The boy yelled and shook his head, knocking Regis to the ground. He cried.
He charges, but Tyranxhor escapes and has to catch him from behind.
It was so quiet, because Regis wasn't moving, he was lying on the sidewalk crying.
dinosaur and crossed his arms as if to challenge him. The little dinosaur looks like this
She remembered the sounds and movements coming from her baby. The boy shook his head.
Behind her, overwhelmed by her lesson, Regina grows stronger.

"Get out! Get back! Go, get back!" Regis shouts from behind and
the dinosaur asked, pulling Regina into her lap. Regis said, "Oh! You heard me."
am! back! Share yours with us! After escaping the dinosaur. The boy continued to stare at her.
He wanted to acknowledge the brunette next to him, but when Regis made a few moves, she walked away.
He stopped again.

He'll go with her, Grant thought.

"Hey!" Reggie yelled as he landed, but the boy ignored him and approached him.
feet. And he arose, and followed him. "You bastard! You! You hear-
Come back! And he roared like a wolf.

The boy cried out, but didn't resist, and ​Regis pulled him to the edge of the tree and faced him.
A slice to the right. After a few times, it disappears. "Turn around! You! Turn around!" Regis shouted,
And then, at the last moment, the bull got so mad he bit Reggie in the leg. "shut up
Downstairs," Regina whispered, and ​the baby lowered her head. Regina began to cry, no words, just.
It was a very loud noise.

His voice trembled, and ​when the boy shook his head, Grant saw the charred flesh.
Mouth.

"Oh yeah," Lex said quietly. Suddenly, Tim was surprised and immediately embarrassed. Evening-
Tears rolled down her cheeks and onto the floor in a sob.

The boy's head shot up as he turned to the forest.

Once Tim put his glasses on, Grant pulled both boys into his arms and started running.


ride


At night, the committees conducted street patrols. Harding's Jeep followed a short distance away.
A leg away. Eli showed him the long way. Is this a trap?

"Okay," Harold said. "In the blink of an eye."

Suddenly, the radio crackles. It sounds like John Arnold.

"-Are you there?"

"Ahh, there," said Harold. "last." He pressed the button. "Yes John, we're here. We're
Close to water, great.

Many pages. Then: "-eed your car-".

"What did he say?" January said.

"Something about the car," Ellis said. On Grant’s back in Montana, Ellie performed the surgery.
radio. With years of training, he became adept at leatherworking.
Tips. "I thought he said he lost his car."

Harding pushed the button. "John? Where are you? We can't see each other. John?"

There was a dim light, then the radio, then Arnold.
His voice, "-where are you-".

"We're about a mile south of Hips Paddock. Near the river, we're behind some committees."

"No, no, come here ow!"

"Like there's something wrong with him," Ellie said, rolling her eyes. There was no pain problem.
wait. "We need to go back again."

Harding raised his hand. "John had problems. He knew how the market was. They wanted to
All for the record." He hit the radio button. "John? Say it again, please. . . ."

Many pages.

Very strong. their fire dance. Then: "-Milo I want your car-".

Gennaro rolled his eyes. "Are you saying Mud needs our car?"


"That's it," Ellis said.

"So, it doesn't make sense," Harding said.

"-someone made-it-out-of-a-car-"

"|You understand," El said. "The other cars are stuck in the water, and ​Mildred wants to
Go get them.

Harding raised his hand. "Why doesn't Milo drive another car?" He pressed the radio button.
"John? Tell Muldoon to get another car. It's in the garage."

The radio crackled. "-Listen-Lesson-"

Harding tapped the radio button. "I told him in the garage, John. The car is in the garage."

Very strong. "-Edra has a brother-"

“I’m afraid you can’t take her anywhere,” Harold said. "Okay John, let's go in."
He turned off the radio and stopped the car. "I just want to know what the fuss was about."

Harding parked the Jeep in the driveway and shouted down the dark alley. Here’s another one.
Ten minutes before they see the lights of the Safari, and ​Harding smiles.
They stopped in front of the brothel and saw Muldoon walking towards them. She screamed and
He looked at his hand.


"God damn you, Arnold, you bastard! God damn you, you're taking the driver off the road! Now! I
The new generation is back here! Now!" John Hammond stood in the courtroom, shouting and pointing.
Babies. He had been walking in this direction for two minutes straight before Harry Hu stopped him.
On the page, his eyes light up.

"Yes, Mr. Hammond," said Arnold, "Muldoon will do that now."
Arnold smiles and lights another cigarette. Hammond is like any other president
Arnold didn't see it. Whether it’s Disney or Navy, fashion is always changing.
Only one. They didn’t know what it was; And they thought it was a voice
How we do things. And maybe I’m screaming at their writers to get it.
A lychee for you.

But the public can’t help with the problems facing Arnold right now. What is
The computer doesn’t see that the light is approaching it doesn’t see that it’s on.
Software systems do not meet all the requirements of a user. If anything
His words took on a different meaning, as Arnold was now facing him with Nedry's strength.
It never came back, which meant Arnold had to get on the computer and analyze it.
He needs to know what is wrong. This was a difficult job, he had to learn.
And challenge yourself.

"Why don't you go into the living room," said Arnold, "and have a cup of coffee? Let's talk."
You and I will get more information.

"|I don't want Malcolm Effort here," Hammond said.

Arnold said, “Don’t worry about what Malcolm has.Will you let me go to work?

"God bless you," Hammond said.

- I'll ask you, sir, if | You got some information from Moore, Arnold said.

He tapped the buttons on his console and watched the dials change.


*/Key plants of the Western Park/
|
*/ return lbs
Source: Biostat.sis
From: Sysrum.Vest
Available at: net.sys Available at:
Power.mdl
*/
*small
Reference [42]2002/9A{stringTotal %4 [vig. 7*tp]}
If the value is equal to (mh) (**mh). Return to Schumanlanvis
Time Call 909 C.lev {no Metrowish for $303} on-demand (3#*Maxfield)
On the default system (!Dn) replace shp_val.obi with lim(val{d} samval


If meters (mh) (** m). subway (Vdd) provides
in systemprocessor(!phone) returns mxcpl.obj in lam(val {pdl} fromSatVal


Arnold doesn’t care about the computer. He was walking to the end of the road now to see
lineof-code Line instructions that define processor behavior. Arnold was not happy.
It’s worth noting that the entire plan for Jurassic Park required half a million pages of paper,
The vast majority are undocumented and unaccounted for.

Wu came forward. What are you doing John?

"I'm looking for the truth."

With his teaching? It will go on forever.

"Tell me," Arnold said. "tell."


way


Muldoon said suddenly, and ​​the Jeep skidded to the ground. Genaro was sleeping next to her.
He grabbed her hand. They were playing on mountain roads, in rivers, and now they are hiding under
They were in the dark. Mildred leaned forward. He was very surprised.

"How much does he have?" January said. "Two, three miles away."

Ellie and Harding return to the guest house. Gennaro decides to go with Muldoon.
The car was falling. "It was an hour," Muldoon said. "For an hour, they didn't say anything about the other prisoners."

"But they have radios," Genaro said.

“We can’t increase it,” Muldoon said.

Gennaro rolled his eyes. "If | I was stuck in a car for hours, I'd use the radio
Tell someone.

"That's what I do, too," Muldoon said.

Genaro shook his head. Do you really think anything could have happened to them?

"Well," said Muldoon, "all right, but I'll be happy with |
they. He should be gone in a few minutes now.

The trail goes around the mountain. Genaro saw a white one in the woods.
It was among the trees along the road. "Stop," Jannard said and Meade said.
Genaro jumped up and ran to the Jeep’s headlights to see what it was. so
As a punishment, but there was

Gennaro thought.

Even though he was six feet tall, he could see. He walks a little.

Muldoon jumped into the car and said, "What the hell? "It's

Someday,” Gennaro said.

The skin of the leg is red and ends with a pool of blood on the leg.
eventually. He wears two white shirts, a black shirt, and black shoes. This means sboe.
Ed Regis pulled it off.

By this time, Muldoon had gotten out of the car and she was trapped behind him and on his shoulders. "Jesus." get up.
His leg was severed from the stake and pierced with a sharp knife, and ​blood dripped from the wound.
He played for his team. Gennaro is three feet tall. He quickly turned it over and put it down.
With her hands on her hips, she closed her eyes and took deep breaths, trying not to cry.

"right." Mild's voice disappeared.

"in?"

"Go ahead. Hide that thing."

Genaro took a deep breath and shook his head. When he opened his eyes, he saw Maud staring at him.
With conflict in our hearts. "They cut him on the side of his body," Muldon said, "They didn't cut him – they cut him and cut him."
She just missed her leg." Mildred stood up and put her left leg over her head to steady her weight
The animals were perfused. His hands turned red as he grabbed her by the throat.
Genaro shouted.

"It's not a question of what happened," said Mildred. "Trex is looking for you." Mildred looked up.
Climb the mountain, and ​ back to the campfire. "Are you okay? Can you go?"

“Yes,” Gennard said. "|Okay."


Muldoon walked around the Jeep, shirtless. "|I think we should take this
That's right," he said. "He can't stay here. Jesus, that would destroy the car.
Look at something growing, right? Trib or cut. . ."

Genaro opened the back door and looked down the stairs. fluent
He thanked her for just thinking of something else. Learning Problems
Reaching up to regain consciousness, he pointed to the servant's hat.
mold, computer, card, old-

"Two ethers," he said. They did well.

“Give me one,” Muldoon said, still in front of the car. Muldoon clenched his fists and
He gave command of the group to Genaro. Holding it in his hand, Genaro smiled.
It’s very difficult. “Just put it in the middle,” Mid said. "If there's a way to stop him, you'll find out."
Then he didn't look back. . ."

"Good." Genaro turns the ball over and Muldoon gets into midfield. fluent
It shakes violently, and the leaves fall to the ground and he hides.
Suddenly, there was a light in the sky, and it moved
Ginny, and ​​Jenny looked at the road ahead.

"Jesus," said Mildred.

Gennaro saw a Land Cruiser parked in the middle of the road. He couldn't see.
This is my second Land Cruiser. Where is the other car?

Muldoon gets up and walks to his left. "there." The second burden of the city is.
twenty feet, and it hangs on the root of a tree;

What am I doing there?

"Trex didn't."

"Did you miss him?" January said.

Mildred’s face fell. "Let's get it over with," he said, climbing into the jeep. they
He left in the second vehicle of the Land Cruiser. Their lights went out and disappeared into the night.

As they approached, Gennaro noticed how the car stopped. He was careful to leave Muldoon alone.
Look outside first.

"|I don't care," said Mildred. "We didn't find anyone."

"I don't?"

"No," he said. He said that, during the years he lived in Africa, he traveled through the interior,
Twelve Love Beasts attack humans. Tiger Attack: Tiger
table one night and picked up a three-year-old. But one dog attacked Amboseli, two goats.
competition; A forest flew to the east, near Meru. Usually, there are some
Evidence will be provided.

For those who don’t know about the bad example of an abandoned animal
The tent, the trail of blood from the dog, the dirty clothes, not far away.
where. But in reality, it doesn’t matter, especially when the target is young.
A child or child. It was as if the man had disappeared as if he had been cut from
the truth and there is no going back. An owl can kill a child if it burrows and digs its tail.
Maybe there was no blood.

And most of the time you won’t find another one. button.
on a cloth or paper towel. But it’s often the wrong thing to do.

Pirates kidnap children – they love children – and leave nothing behind. So Mildred
He hoped that none of the other children would be bullied.

But suddenly, it stops. "I'm struggling," he said.


Muldoon tries to protect the team. The front of the Land Cruiser was severely damaged.
But there weren’t many kids around. He sees pieces of glass on the road. so
Here he had to break the chain before stopping the vehicle and pulling out.
here. But the car has a great value. Mildred had that spark in her soul.

"empty?" Genaro said suspiciously.

"It wasn't," Muldoon said. The light shines on the radio transmitter and shines on the ground.
Car He saw something else, black and white. The doors are locked and
It was locked, but he ran through the back door and up the roof.
Strange things.


"It's a clock," he said, dimming the light of his flashlight. There is no time limit
Sprayed black rubber. The LCD screen is great, I think you might be
He volunteered, even though he didn’t believe in it. But that’s the punishment a child gets.

"What do you mean, Clock?" January said.

"Yeah. And there's a radio, but that's about it."

Does that really matter?

"Yeah. And there's another thing…" Mead smiled. There was a smell in the car.
He turned on the light until there was a knock on the door. It says:
Always good. “Some kids can do it,” Muldon said.

Gennaro looked up. What makes you think that?

"A ghost," said Mildred. "The clock is ticking." He gave Genord a watch from
He waved his hand at the light.

"The crystal is broken," Genaro said.

"Yes," said Mildred. "And this team never wins."

"what do you mean?"

"The boy was killed."

"It could happen at any time," Genaro said. "Every day before the fight."

"No," Muldoon said. "These LCD crystals are fragile. It takes a lot of force to break them."
The clock ran in half on the fight."

"So the boy took off his watch."

"Think about it," said Mildred. "If Tyransaurus attacked you, would you try
Taking off your watch?

"You can feel it."

"You can't take a watch off someone's wrist if you can't take a frame off."
However, not all teams are happy. No, said Mildred. "The boy was shocked. He saw
Make sure it’s done and remove it. He had time to do that.

"when?"

"It can only happen after the funerals," Mildred said. "The child should be in the car."
After the selection. And the radio was off, so that was off too. He’s a smart kid, you know
It's not good.

"If the light," said Gennard, "where does it go? For here I sit and wait."
He caught her.

“Yes,” Muldoon said. "But you can stay here. Let the Tyrannosaurus return. Though
Another dog. Either way, something had to go.

"Where did he go?" January said.

"Let's see if we can find him," said Mildred, walking to the side of the road.


Genaro looked at Muldoon. Her face is just holy.
On the field, he followed his plan. Mildred really believed that she had something.
One of the children was alive. Gennaro didn’t mind. The key to finding the right person
Sean allowed himself to grieve until he shut it down and destroyed the park. either.
Muldoon says Genaro treats him with love and respect and

Have you seen this? Muldoon asked as he looked down. What number? January
said.

“People walk on foot, you see them approaching them on the street, especially the elderly.
sboe - same type of sboe. Notice the shape of the line.

Gennaro stared at the floor. The fibers absorb light from the wave.

“You can see,” Muldoon says, “the letters that men who come here are given .
Another book. Short and medium. . . He goes in circles. . so
They all stood and listened. . .. here it is now, this is how they did it. It showed
for. "There. In the park."

Genaro shook his head. "You can see anything in the world."

Mildred stood, stumbling. He looked down and smiled. "State
Whatever you want, I’m babysitting some kids. And maybe both. He can also be a big guy.
"If those big letters belong to anyone other than Regis, we can find them in the park."

"tonight?" January said.


But Mud didn't listen. He was walking on a flat surface before
rain. He shook his head again. What is this girl wearing?

“Christ,” Gennard said. "|I don't know."

Muldoon walked briskly down the street. And so they did.
Storytelling with the wind. The sound of an animal.

"Listen," Genaro said calmly, "I think you're better-."

"Shhh," said Mildred. He stopped to listen.

"It's just the wind," Gennaro said.

And they heard his voice again. There was no wind. From within.
There was a bunch of flowers out front on the other side of the road. Not as a dog, but Mildred
He studied well. He turned on his torch and shouted, but the wind didn’t change
features. Muldoon pointed to a tree branch.

"What's that?" January said.

"It's Malcolm," Mildred said.


Lan Malcolm was next to him, his face white and his mouth agape. He took a deep breath.
Wind Wind. Mildun placed Genaro on the fire, then turned to examine the body.
"|You can't hurt me," he said. "Okay, Sissy Blots..."

Xenari turned to the light behind her. "He had a dress code." Malcolm lost his mind.
Pain in left side. Genaro took out his gun with his foot. His right leg was paralyzed.
Below the knee, the muscle is thin and filled with blood. Mildred
He snapped his fingers and Malcolm groaned.

Muldoon paused, trying to figure out what to do. Malik may have another illness.
It's really beautiful. He could have killed to get it. But if they leave him here, he will die.
mess. Because of her beauty, she was able to wear a tronic around her neck.
He was bleeding to death. And he may have been caught. They can also be removed.

Genaro helped Muldoon find the man, draping him over their shoulders.
Malcolm smiled and took a deep breath. "Lex," he said. "Lexi…sleep…Lexi…."

Who is Lex? Mildred said.

"A girl," Jannard said. They drag Malcolm into the Jeep and arrest him.
stay. Gennaro shoots him in the shoulder. Malcolm yelled again. Mildred
He turned around and looked at the skin underneath, which was white sticking out
nut.

“We need to get it back,” Mauldin said.

Are you moving here with the kids? January said.

"If they go to the landfill, it's 20 miles," Mudd said, shaking his head. "A
How do we organize everything with daily parameters. If the children survive and th
Usually the motion sensors are turned off, and ​ we can walk around with them and turn them back on.
But if we don’t get Drs. Malcolm now, we're going to die.

"Then we can go back," Genaro said.

"Sure | Think about it."

They got into the car. “You can tell Hammond the kids,” Genaro said.
failure?"

"No," Muldoon said. "You."


ride


Donald Gennaro looked at Hammond, sitting in the empty living room. The man was making a report.
Cream, to eat in peace. "Does Mildred think the children are somewhere in the park?"
"It was his idea, of course."
"So, I'm sure we'll find them."
"|It's amazing," Jannard said. He saw that the old man was still eating and realized that he was hungry.
"Oh | I'm sure we'll find them. Then | tell everyone that this park is for kids."
Genaro said, "As long as we know they're innocent, sir."


"failure?" He pulled it out. "Yeah | I know it's not true. It's not true." He was happy and
Rotate the circle again. "Look, Donald," Hammond said. "We don't have to brag. We're
It was a blizzard Sunday or something, so we were working a little
A bad problem. And that’s exactly what happened. We worked with him. Arnold comes.
Computers are clean. Mildred took the children, and ​| You don’t know if he’s going to turn on them again.
When we do this work. So, let’s wait and see what happens, shall we?

"Whatever you say, sir," said Gennard.


"why?" Henry Wu said as he looked at the car.

« Because | I see Nedry doing something illegal," Arnold said. “That's what I want to run for."

"Okay," Wu said. "But have you checked the scale?" "as

"What is?" Arnold asked.

"| I don't know. Are the alarms not working?" Wu said. Bone marrow tests? All this?

"Jesus," Arnold said, breathing heavily. "It has to go. Security doesn't have to die."
Just with the big stick."

"Well," Wu said, "if Keichika was working so hard, you should say what he did."

"It's definitely possible," Arnold said. He started pushing buttons. Why didn’t he do it?
before? That’s obvious. The Jurassic Park operating system has a few bugs.
His mind was on her. One of them is a software that manages all software
It attracts people. It was originally developed as a means of preventing crime.
However, it is protected because of the value of its protection.

In an instant, all the lyrics Nedry had written on the computer the day before.
appears in a separate window on the webpage:


13,42,121,32,88,77,19,13,13,122,13,44,52,77,90,13,99,13,100,13,109,55,103
144, 13, 99, 87, 60, 13, 44, 12, 09, 13, 43, 63, 13, 46, 57, 89, 103, 122, 13, 44, 52, 88.9.
31.13.21.13.57.98.100.102.102.146.13.13.13
system

Nedra

Go to the government level.

Nedra

040/ # L/67& m.

Hello

check

Look at the picture.

forbidden

Sl the

check

rbt_white


"What is?" Arnold said. "I could stay here for hours, yeah."

"It's probably just killing time," Wu said. "Until he tried to escape."

The first source of information is the Nedry ASCI report.
He tapped his console. These numbers show that it didn’t go to a full UI, either.
Anyone can use a computer. Well, first Nedra just watches, which you shouldn’t do.
Imagine that the program created the system.

“Maybe check for changes, before you go in,” Wu said.

"Okay," Arnold said. Arnold is now looking at the legislative model to act
Follow Nedry’s instructions, step by step. "We can see what he did."

System is Nedry’s way of disrupting users and looking elsewhere.
The computer asks her name and she answers: Neidra.

This name was in the code, so the computer allowed access to the system.
He asks Nedry to go to the management level, which is the computer government level. level of government.
He asks for help, says his name is Nedry, he’s in 7th grade and so on.


Nedra

040/# L/67& m.

Hello

These concerns brought Nedry to the court. Eventually, he got the message. and with
He complied, and the computer let him go. During the battle, Nedry investigates.
Three changes:

Look at the picture.

forbidden

Sl the

"It's trying to solve security problems," Wu said. “He didn’t want anyone to see anything.
He will do it.

"Yes," Arnold said. “But he doesn’t know that he can’t change.
The systems are complete if the resistance changes and in the mass.

After three failed attempts, the computer didn’t last long with Nedry. but
At this point, the computer thinks it's Nedry.
He was desperate, trying to do what he couldn’t do where he was. So the computer asks
That’s where he wanted to be,” Neider said.

check. And he left it there.

"In the end," Wu said, "because that's what it was." He followed in Neidra’s footsteps.
He entered.

rbt_white

"what is this?" Arnold said. "The white ghost? Is that what he did?"

“It’s called something,” Wu said. In computer terms, a “cluster” is a collection of data.
One can be carried and used as carrying a chair around the house. some
It can be a command to take an image, redirect a link, or take action.
The number.

“We’ll see where he is in the competition,” Arnold said. "We can do what I do." fluent
Go to the main program and type:


Find WTERBT.OBJ
The computer received a power supply:
It’s not in the book.


"Not there," Arnold said.
"Then ask for the list of rules," Wu said.
Arnold wrote:


Download/print: Wittrpt.obg


The screen was running wildly, the lines of logic closing as they went. So he stayed.
one minute, and then suddenly it's over.

"That's it," Wu said. "It's okay, it's a dog." The symbol shows the body.
to display a page:


curve = return{cm.dt} tamrn{itm.dt2}. wait
= Handled {ssd.etcl} tamrn2 {etm.dd4}.
In radiometer(!gn), change shpval.obi to lim(Value{d})-Xval. and
Impedance (mH) (** mH). MeterVis Reference.
if metroband] (vGT) ((Drubuc(ty)) return.
limits.4 = maxbytes (%33) of element {line 04}.
String.5 = string, five digits, 0 { string .2value(sb)}.
in whterbt.obi link.sst {security, privacy} is ready for installation.
North = {Maxiran + Spect} Tampin (FDN-&BB+$404).
hormone = {mainline multiplier / 2} divisor (fdn-&dd + $105). empty
Camera Send screen.obi output.


"Son of a bitch," Arnold said.

Wu shook his head. "It's not a cost problem."

"No," Arnold said. "It was a trap. The green man put on something that looked like an invitation, though."
A policy that establishes and governs security and safety. He loved her.
You can go anywhere in the park."

“Then we can do it again,” Wu said.

"Yes, I should." Arnold folded the paper. "We just need to listen to the rules."
I saw violence on the site,” he said.

Wu stood up from his chair. “At that moment, someone came in,” he said.
Wait an hour. | Support | You better go look for my genes.


Eli was in his room taking off his wet clothes and changing into his clothes when there was a knock on the door.
are.

"God?" she said, but when she opened the door, she saw Maud standing there and
A basket in his hand. Muldoon is also hot and has some personality.
Yes sokiyo.

"I'm sorry, but you need to help yourself," Mildred said calmly. “The Land Cruisers were being attacked and .
1 hour later. We stopped Malcolm, but he refused. His leg is badly damaged. is
I don't know, but | He sat on his bed in his room. Harding will be on his way."

Harod? She said. What about others?

"We don't have any more, Dr. Satter," Mildred said. He spoke softly now.

"Oh no god."

“But I think Dr. Grant and the kids are still alive.I think they’re in the park, Doctor.
Satter.”

Did you go to the park?

"Yeah I guess. At the time, Malcolm needed help. I asked Harold."

Shouldn’t you call a doctor?

"There's no doctor on the mountain. Harold is our best friend." "but

When can you call a doctor-” he said.

"I don't." Mildred shook her head. "Phone lines are busy. We can't make calls." He changed his appearance.
Put it in your hand.

"What's that?" She said.

"No problem. Just go into Malcolm's room and help Harold if you want." and

Milden leaves.

He sat on his bed, deeply saddened. Ellie Satter is not a woman afraid of danger.
And he knew Grant from the ordeal. And he went out immediately.
Badlands on the fourth day he hit mud, his truck skidded a few hundred yards.
feet. Grant’s right leg was amputated. It has no water. But he started walking again with a broken leg.

On the other hand, children. .

He shook his head and dismissed the thought. Thankfully, the kids love Grant. And if
Grant came into the kitchen, of course. .. the right person to take to Jurassic Park
More of a dinosaur expert?


In the park


“I was very disappointed,” Leake said. "Take it off me, Dr. Grant." "We'll be leaving soon," Tim said.

"But I'm tired," he said.

"Okay, Lexi," Grant said, picking her up. "Oh, it's so sweet."

It was almost 9:00 a.m. when the moon was filled with clouds and light.
He led them down a dirt road to a deserted forest. He stood up and turned to Grant.
Tell me where it is. Since we went from the dock to the end, where the car
Lightning flashed, and Grant was sure it was somewhere on Tyransor.
The platform. The one place he never wanted to go. The plan goes to the computer.


Length of Tyrannosaurus, the average represents the length
In a small house. The house was now occupied by women and children.

But Grant also remembered;
This means that they will know they are no longer part of the group if they cross a line.
half, or two.

He had never seen a thank you before.

The girl rested her head on his shoulder and rested her hair on his face. It was over quickly.
health. Tim walked over to Grant.

"How did you get it, Tim?"

"Okay," he said. « But | Do you think we could have lived in the same environment as Tyransaurus?

"It's true. | I wish we could go out for a while."

"Are you going to the zoo?" Tim said. The closer they got, the darker the mountain looked.
Make a payment.

"Yes," Grant said. I think we can make up those numbers with motion sensors.

Motion sensors are vertical boards placed about four feet above the ground. some
business; Most of them are connected by trees. None of them do this to us
The energy is not there. Each sensor plate has a specific cover and barcode printed on it.
The information is below. Above him, in the moonlight, Grant could see a console moving.
T/S/04.

They went to the forest. There are big trees everywhere. In the moonlight, the snow was melting.
The ground covered the trees, shaking, but they kept walking.
He is a prisoner. And Grant sees the centaurs. That doesn’t exist.
narrative. He did T/S/03, and ​T/S/02. Finally, they reached T/S/01. He was too tired to
girl, and ​hoped to go to the ruins of Tyransaurus, but
Just another house across the street. After the next letter T/N/01, .
Then t/n/02. He told Grant he needed to check the surrounding area.
Upside down, like a bottle. They were moving east and west, so
They reached the edge and then turned around.

“We’re getting bigger sometimes,” Tim said.

"Okay," Grant said.

Tim laughed, kicking flowers in the snow. And he stood up quickly. They’re still walking.
A little while. "My parents got divorced," she said.

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

"My father died last month. He has a cemetery in Mill Valley."

"Good."

"He can't bring my wife back. He can't."

"And he said you had a head injury," Grant said.

Tim was happy. "Whether."

Did you forget? Grant said.

"Not really," Tim said. "Sometimes. It's frustrating."

Who, your mother?

"No, Lexi. My mother has a friend. She knows him from his job."

It was published on a separate date prior to T/N/03 and T/N/04. - Did you see him? extend
said.

"Whether."

"How are you?"

"Okay," Tim said. "Younger than my father, but still important."

How does it affect you?

"| I don't know. It's okay. | I think he's just trying to look good. | I don't know what's going on
do. Sometimes my mother would tell us to sell our house and move out. Sometimes I and he
My mother hunts at night. | sitting at home playing games on my computer and | I've heard it too.

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

Are you divorced?

"No," Grant said. "My wife died young."

- And now we want Drs. Satter ?

Grant sighed. "No. Master."


"You mean you're at school?"

"Off to college, then." Grant took a moment to pull Lexi aside and
He returns, passing T/N/05 and T/N/06. There were lights in the distance. What is
The water flows south. There was no sound on the mountain except the plane.
Cigars and wildflowers.

Do you have kids?" Tim asked. "No.

Krantz said.

Tikitas Drs. Satter?

"Well, she's going to marry a wonderful doctor in Chicago next year."

"Oh," Tim said. He seemed surprised to hear that. They walked for a while. "So what
Getting married?

"|Don't expect me to marry someone," Grant said. "am

You too,” Tim said.

They walked for a while. Are we going to dance all night? Tim said.

«| I don't know | Sure," Grant said. "We'll have to wait a few hours." He looked over his shoulder.
protect. "We're fine. We have eleven hours to get back. The plane hasn't left yet
It reaches all over the country."

Where can we stay? Tim asked calmly.

Grant thinks so. At first it was thought that the trees could be removed and
Sleeping in front of the village. But they had to climb a long way out of the forest, and
Lex could sleep. The leaves are tough; He didn't rest.
Otherwise, it’s not enough.

They want a better place to live. He remembered the scene on the plane.
below. Remember, there are basements everywhere.
It broke up. Grant couldn’t see where they were because they were on high ground.
It didn’t help. And he couldn't remember where they were, but he remembered.
They are all close to the park. Good from the start.

But he didn’t need that and just crossed a line and left.
tyrannosaur paddock, the pursuit of a horse is a pursuit of adventure. And good
These answers are-

"Tim, can you hang up your hat for me? I'll climb a tree and see it right away."


In the trees that are visible straight from the cliff, the tops of the trees rise.
Left and right. They were so surprised that they approached the forest behind the trees.
This was before electricity and asphalt. Then there was his mother.
On land, he thought it was a sauropod. In the distance, lots of trees and snow.
The moon was shining on the sea.

In the distance, he heard a dinosaur roar, but it was too far away. This is Tim’s body
face the sun and try again. He followed a group of fire ships and then saw
He seeks: a dark path to somewhere far, far away. the first house;
Not to the bottom of the earth, but close. And it's not far. Maybe a mile or more
In the tree.

When he got to his knees, Lex smirked.

"What does it mean?" "I heard."

Let it be so.

"We're not wrong. Do you understand now? Come on."

He led her to the door. it was twenty cubits high, and its posts were of bronze. fluent
He looked into your eyes in the moonlight. The water is still on the other side.

Lexus looked up at the ceiling in shock. "can

Did you get on it? Grant asked.

He put on his gloves and a baseball cap. "Okay. It's easy." He started to walk away. "But | all
Tim is bad.”

Tim shouted angrily, "You're about to die."

“Tim is afraid of the sky.”

"It's not like that."

He went to the village. "That's it."


"I don't."

"Then give it to me."

Grant pulled Tim up, trapped in the darkness. The child did not move. "It's great with a line."
Tim?

"sure."

Do you need help?

"Tim's a bad dog," Lex said.

"Bad idea," Tim said, starting to walk away.


“It’s going to be great,” Leake said. They submerge themselves up to their necks in the murky water.
Cement to cement. They go upstairs and nothing happens until Tim takes off his shirt.
Wire mesh front. Then they trained underwater together, and now Grant.
He was looking for a way to go.

"Yeah | I got Timmy on the wall for you," Lex said. "You're always scared."

"Thanks for the help," Tim said with a smile. In the moonlight, he could see flashes of light.
Out. He walked over to the window and looked at the concrete wall in the distance. concrete;
practical; They couldn't catch him.

"Eww," Leica said, pointing to the water.

"Don't hurt Lex."

Grant noticed an area where the creek had collapsed and grass was growing
fluent. He touched the tree and touched its roots. "Let's go kids." They started walking.
forest, retreating into darkness.

It only took a few minutes to walk from the village to the Dam.
The road to it, and the house on the right. passed both motion sensors and
Grant said with some relief that the sensors weren’t working and the lights weren’t working.
More than two hours after the initial fire, it still hasn’t been restored.

Then, they heard Torraso’s voice. Are you here? Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "We're across the table from him." They fell on the grass.
wells and roads. In the darkness, she calls out to him.
as.

"What is this place?" Lex said.

"It's okay," Grant said, hoping he was serious.

The gate is wide enough for a chariot to pass through. It’s full of cracks.
Inside they can see a terrace with a garden and a bar
between our bodies.

The door slams shut with a loud bang. When Grant stood up, Lex pulled away.
between offices. "Come on guys."

Tim followed. “I think you can do it, good doctor.”

He was strong; It was a long shot, but Grant managed to squeeze his body between the posts
And in the bedroom. As soon as he entered the house, he was very tired.

"|I think there's something better," Lex said.

"It's just not good." Grant breaks a brick and throws it into the street. year in
Mid-heat. They were definitely feeling cold. Lex turned to her and smiled.
eyes. Tim waved his hand. He heard the songs of the sarpods in the distance.

None of the boys speak. Now they are getting closer. Grant turned and looked at her.
You look up, but it’s too dark to see the light. He felt the warmth of childhood in his body.

Grant closed his eyes and fell asleep.


ride


When Muldoon and Gennaro arrived in the control room, Arnold put down the weapon, he said.
"I understand, girl."

"What's that?" January said.

Arnold revealed on the site:


Vgl = received {dat.dt} message time{atm.time}

Vg2 = get {time. itl} timecall {itm.time}

If the combination (Vgl, Vg2) gives lim (Vgl, Vg2) and
The connector (Vg2, Vgl) returns the output (Vg2, Vgl).

in whte_rbt.obj Visibility Functions (Vgl), Permissions (Vg2)
= MaxBytes (%22) to {column .04} Fixed
border.2 = Stephen, Stephen, 0 { border.2value(dj)}

in the fini.obi link.sst package {security, security} to install
fini.obi for site.sst {security, security}
In fabric.obj add page rf whte_rbt.obj, fabric.obj Vgl = .
getHandlers { data.dt } profit { atm.tmp } Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tm}

limit.4 = maxbytes (33%) of { limit .04} of .
= setBorder, setFive, 0 { value .2value(sj)}


"That's it," Arnold said cheerfully.

"What's that?" Genaro asked, looking at the screen.

"| Then I ran the Redocode command from earlier. The 'fini.ob' command was re-run."
The most common types are walls and energy.

"Okay," said Mildred.

"But I do other things," Arnold said. "They then removed the visible scar."
He destroyed all evidence that he had been there. I'm really happy.

Genaro shook his head. "I don't know about computers." Although he knew a lot about
Learn what it means to be a leading technology company. It means a lot, a lot.
The game.

“Well, look at this,” Arnold tweeted:

public.obj

The screen blinks and changes suddenly.


Vg1 = GetHeader {Here.DTPMT™} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tm}

If the combination (Vgl, Vg2) gives lim (Vgl, Vg2) and
The connector (Vg2, Vgl) returns the output (Vg2, Vgl).

= MaxBytes (%22) to {column .04} Fixed
border.2 = Stephen, Stephen, 0 { border.2value(dj)}
Vgl = Gateway{data.dt} vDialog{atm.tm} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tm}

limit.4 = maxbytes (33%) of { limit .04} of .
= setBorder, setFive, 0 { value .2value(sj)}


Muldoon climbed the steps. "protect!" Outside, huge bonfires burn.
Throughout the park, they walk up to the railing and look outside.

"Music," Arnold said.

Does that mean electric paint is bad? Gennaro said.

"You said yes," Arnold said. “It takes a few seconds to get back to full strength, because
It was about 50 miles of line and the developers had to put the ranches back on the road.
But we’ll be back at work in half a minute,” Arnold said to the standing bird.
A map of the park.

On the map, lightning shot out of the fire and swirled around.
Stop, because it’s hot inside.

"Are they spectators?" January said.

"Yeah, they are too. It takes a few minutes for the computer to boot. But it all works."
Arnold said. "By nine-thirty, we're all up and running."


Grant opened his eyes. Natural light enters the room through the walls.
gate. Yellow Quartz: The energy he felt when he looked at his watch. just.
He fell asleep for two minutes. He tried to stay a few minutes and
He then went back to the network and stood in front of the motion sensors and headsets.
Let them go. The doctor nodded; They sent a car to pick her and the children up, i
She tells Arnold to call the ship and stays in bed all night.
Manic.

He will do it now. Just a few minutes. She smiled and rolled her eyes.
further.


"It was nothing," Arnold said in the courtroom, looking at the map on display. "There are three
throughout the park. better than | hopefully."

"The leaves?" January said.

"The ship is facing some smaller issues," he explains. "You can see your mother."
"One here, on Twelfth Street, across the street."

"That's when Rex cut the line," Mildred said.

"Yeah. And there's another one here in Section Eleven. Near the Sharppod Training Center."

Why was that part removed? January said.

"God knows," Arnold said. "It could be a hailstorm or a fallen tree. We'll have to check
Wait a minute. The third is the Great Plains. I don’t know what’s going to happen.
Even outside."

When Genaro saw it, the map had become a dream, filled with blue dots and numbers.
"What does all this mean?"

"The ghosts. The sensors are working, and ​the computer is working."
where all the animals will live. And other people too."

Gennaro looked at the map. "It's about Grant and the kids…."

"Yeah. We've doubled our recruitment to 400. So, if you're out there
Inside,” says Arnold, “the movement feels like another living thing.” He looked at her.
The map. "But | I don't see anything."

Why is it taking so long? January said.

“You must know, Mr. Gennard,” said Arnold, “that there are many things.
there. Tree branches in the wind, birds flying and everything. The computer needs
Put everything back where it was. You can take it. Good. The account has been suspended.

Not the children? January said.

Arnold leaned back in his chair and looked at the map. “No,” he said.
There are no credits on the card. It all looks like a dinosaur.
It can be in a tree or in a hidden place. | You can’t imagine.
Not many monsters like Rex’s mother showed up. That's because you're asleep.
aside and not moving. Maybe even people kill. We just don’t know.

Mildred shook her head. "Okay, let's get started," he said. "We need to build walls."
And the animals returned to their homes. According to this app, there are five
Return to the beautiful garden. Now I will organize the security team.

Arnold was furious with Gennard. "See what Dr. Malcolm thinks. Tell Dr. Harold
that Muldoon would be there for an hour to see the horses. And I gave the information to Mr. Hammadi.
"We've started our final preparations."


Genaro stepped through the metal gates and into the Safari Gate. Look
Ellie Sattler comes down the stairs with makeup and a bottle of water. "There he is."
In a calm environment," he said. “We use it to heat the water."

"How are you?" Jinaru asked.

"Okay," he said.

Genaro followed Ellie to Malcolm and was surprised to hear her scream.
laugh. The doctor patted his abdomen and Harold hooked up an IV.

"And another said, 'I assure you, | I don't care, Billy. | I'll be back with the toilet paper!"

Harold laughed.


"It's nothing, is it?" Malcolm said with a laugh. "Oh. Mr. Gennaro. I see. Now you
You know what happens when you want to go again.

Gennaro came in and tried.

“He had a morphine addiction,” Harding said.

“ Now, | I can tell you," said Malcolm. "Col, she's been abused by her medication. You understand
What about the others?”

"No, not at all," Jenna said. "But I'm glad you did the right thing."

“There has to be another way,” says Malcolm, “if a wave can .
septic tank and it starts to smell really, uh, really bad? But | Always say you can’t protect your secrets
happy. . ."

Genaru laughed. Do you remember what happened?

"Okay | Remember," Malcolm said. Do you think Tyrannosaurus hunts?
Rex And you've lost your mind? It is unlikely, I assure you, that you will remember it for the rest of your life.
life. In my experience, probably not very long. But, even now, | delighted."

Malcolm said as he jumped out of the Land Cruiser into the snow and followed her.
Rex. "It's my fault. It's so cute, but | she was scared. However, she chose
I got out of bed.

"as well as?" January said.

"Torso," Malcolm said and raised his wand. A half circle separates from it.
Word for word. "She got up on her back bleeding profusely and fell to the ground. And |
He was shocked, but it all made sense when he pulled out. | sunday
feet. But the relationship wasn't half bad." He smiled. "I guess so.

"Most carnivores don't have very large teeth. Their real strength is in their teeth," Harding said.
body. Dogs are suckers, and they use their tongue to suck and suck. But with a little
Faith like Drs. Malcolm Banga just smiles and laughs.

"I'm afraid so," Malik said. "| I thought I was just living the heart of a giant ".
It didn’t help. To be honest, he struck me as a bad opponent.
A car or a small house.

Do you think he went half-heartedly?

"I don't want to say it," said Malcolm, "but | I was wrong | He was fine. He was .
Mine, of course. After all, it weighs just eight tons. | I don't. "

Genaro looked at Harding and said, “The walls will be finished today. Arnold said so.”
"Muldoon needs your help to find the dragons."

"Okay," Harold said.

“All you have to do is leave us with Dr. Satler,” Malcolm said, “and lots of morphine.” “And if you don’t .
"It doesn't matter here, Malcolm."

What does Malcolm mean? January said.

"Your attitude makes me want to tell you the truth about something," Malcolm said.
Me." She replied and closed her eyes. Within moments, she was asleep.

Ellie comes out on the balcony with Genaro. "Don't be fooled," he said. "It's a big problem
write. When will the helicopter arrive?

"Helicopter?"

“We need a warning this time.
island."


park


The portable generator hums and buzzes, while electric pins fly in the background.
With telescopes in hand. Muldoon could hear the water rushing down the mountain a few miles away.
north. He returned to the service van and saw an employee driving the large truck.
Peter St. John;

"No, no," he said. "Just hang on, Carlos. You don't have to."

He turned to look at the wall. At first, it was difficult to find a place to sit.
For limited reasons: there was a small tree in the garden. I was
Many local businesses were there to
He burned ti li from the crowd.


But these trees have been threatened by thorns and thistles. Nope a animals
He shot at the wind, and ​the weapon hit the wall and knocked him out.
leave. Of course, none of this should have happened; Farmers should use plastic.
Services and fixtures behind walls. But that’s what happened.

Either way, it’s not a big deal. They just need to get the hammer out of the ceiling.
Remove the cutting wire and lay it on the ground ready for the night. It shouldn’t be
More than twenty minutes. And it works, because Mildred learns about diffusers.
He always sat by the river. Although river servants
A vessel where spirits can enter water and make fire.

Rama, the servant, is coming. He said, "Sixcuse Mud, are you dreaming?"

What light? Mildred said.

Ramen headed east up the hill. "|We saw him when we left. We loved him
weak. Did you see? It’s like an electric car, but it doesn’t move.

Muldoon rolled his eyes. Probably a fair answer. Then, the government quickly relented.
"We'll take care of it later," he said. "Now, let's get the beam out of the wall."


Arnold was ecstatic. The park begins to come alive. Mildred does
They are the walls. Hammond went to see the horses being driven by Harding. though
He was tired, Arnold was fine; I was thinking about Prosecutor Jenny.
"Picture of ​Malcolm?" Arnold said. "Do you like that?"

“I’m just looking at it,” Gennard said.

"Do you want me to tell you why Malcolm is a bad guy?"

"sure."

Arnold took another sip. “It’s technology.”

"Look at me."

"Okay," Arnold said. Linear theory implies a nonlinear system. Now it’s fixed.
He wants to learn everything from vaccines to populations to the brain
waves in the syndrome. This is a fundamental science of fashion. It can be used with any non-toxic material.
Where things can go wrong. Good?"

"Okay," Gennard said.

"Lan Malcolm was a mathematics professor who studied chaos theory. He was a very simple guy and very ambitious."
But what he does, instead of just adding black, he uses a computer to fix it.
Complex systems. And John Hammond loved new things, so he asked Malcolm.
A picture of Jurassic Park. What Malcolm did. Everything Malcolm creates is organic.
appears on the computer screen. Have you seen them?

"No," Gennard said.

"Well, they're like sunflowers in bloom. Like Malcolm said, they're all
The shot is controlled by the shot. You and me?

"It's not good," Genaro said.

Arnold threw his hands in the air. "Say | put a bottle of water on my head. Oh."
The truth was slipping out of my hands. It could have gotten out of hand. It can fit in my hand.
Or between my hands. | I'm not really sure where it's going, but | Just know that it will happen.
I have my hand on one side. It must be done.

"Okay," Gennard said.

The GPS system is considered as the whole system is a floating ship.
The crown jewel of innocent warfare. The blade can slide or slide to one side. very good
Do a lot of things, just. But it always goes hand in hand with the woman’s will.

"Good."

Malcolm created a funnel, or channel, through which water flowed.
quite. He called this phenomenon the Malcolm Effect. It’s all about him.
It might fall. And that’s exactly what he said about George Parker. because it is in
unfortunately."

"It's a problem," Genaro said. "And what did you do when you got your seat?"

“We didn’t do well, we really did,” Arnold said.

"Isn't it?"


"To relax," Arnold said. "We're dealing with things in life, after all. This is life, not
Computer Models."


In the light of the lamp, the head of the Hypsilophodent skeleton protruded above the canopy.
His mouth guarded, his eyes wide.

"Be careful! Be careful!" cried Hammond, as he began to clear the way.

Harding gasped, his head hitting the skin. He didn’t want to live.
in the gastrointestinal tract. Crank yelled, lifting the creature into the air.
Expect truck paint. Hipsy was a small dryosaur, seven feet long and five feet wide.
One hundred pounds. Chop the logs gently. My mind was blown, but
Just one word. Harding had committed suicide a few days earlier with a knife and
He seems to have learned the right way. There’s always time to celebrate this holiday
Animals. He runs so fast that he slides across the grass and falls out of reach.
they. Then, they went into cardiac arrest. This means that a
Get up and go. The right amount.

look! practical! Hammond yelled at the attendant.

"Mr. Hammond," Harold said. "please."

"Well, they should be careful-."

"He thinks," Harold said. He came off as a hippie.
And he went down and bound him with chains. Harding is wearing a heart necklace.
She listened to her heart and quickly released a large dakka-sized hummingbird.
Baster and shoot him in the head. read: 96.2 degrees.

"as?" Hammond asked angrily.

"Okay," Harold said. "He missed a class and a half."

"He's huge," Hammond said. "It's hard."

"You don't want him to get up and jump in the truck," Harding said.

Before arriving at the cemetery, Harding served as San Diego’s funeral director
animals, and ​is a world expert in veterinary medicine. He traveled the world, interacting with animals.
in animal husbandry in Europe, India and Japan. You don’t have to do anything special.
A little kid shows up and throws a ball at a ball. But when he found out that
Hammond … couldn’t walk. Harding is a researcher and
Inspired to write the first book on veterinary medicine: diseases of the dinosaurs
Coercion. In the early 20th century, veterinary medicine developed on its own –
Good animals make hospitals different from hospitals. The new book is simply an improvement on the old book.
For a farmer, there is no land that he cannot take care of. But you’ll do the right thing.
The science of today’s plants: yes!

Harding doesn’t regret his decision and puts on a good show with
These dogs. And he didn't want to hear a word from Hammond right now.

Hypsy smiled and nodded. He smokes a little; There is no obvious hope.
still. But it’s time to move on. "You all stay," Harold shouted. "Let's give it to this girl."
Paddock.”


"Biological matter," says Arnold, "happiness is not like biological matter. Biological matter never
Balance. Bad results. It may look like they’re staying, but they’re not. All available
Hope and change. That way everything falls into place."

Gennaro smiled. "But it doesn't change much, body temperature doesn't
Another way-"

"Our immune system is always changing," Arnold said. "Always. Always changing."
Twenty-four hours, less in the morning and more in the evening. varies with level, with
Disease, by work, by smoking, by eating. is replaced by
below. Minor changes to the form. Because at any moment there is a force attracting
At the top, there are additional forces pulling downwards, and ​it doesn’t break beam A. And everything that happens in life
So does the language.

"As you said..."

Arnold said: "Malcolm was a different person. "He sat in his office and did the right thing
mathematical model, and he never thought that what he saw was wrong.


They are worth it. See: date | When we work with sound, we use a phenomenon called 'resonance'.
You.' Resonant diameter means that although the coin is not resting on the pendulum,
There was no hope for him. He couldn’t eat it, he couldn’t take it. is
Characteristics of mechanical systems. A small infection can become a large infection and affect the entire body. but
These little gems are essential to our lives. It shows that freedom is.
And that's his answer. Malcolm doesn’t understand.

"You really don't understand? You're wondering the difference between
Life is not-"

"Look," Arnold said. "It's a test." He pointed out the cameras.

"Within an hour," he says, "the whole park was back on the road. Something that caught my eye
The phone is very clean. For some reason, they keep showing up. But everything else goes.
And it’s not science. STRAIGHT."


I channeled the energy into his chest and Harding connected with Medrine.
The female Dryosaur appears to be approaching the surface. Then the beast was healed.
She screams and flails her arms and legs.

"Go back, everyone," Harold said as he ran off. "Turn around."

The dinosaur smiled and spread its legs and nodded. He lowered his head and looked at
People cook over stone fireplaces.

“He’s growing up,” Hammond said, through tears.

"Yes," Harold said. "We stop."

The Dresaurus paused, then walked briskly across the distance.

Why don't you go?

"He will," Harold said. "It'll take about an hour to recover. Normal." wonder.
Go back to the car. "Alright boys, let's go to Stego."


Muldoon watched as the tree trunk fell to the ground. They drew lines.
incision, and ​the protocarp surface was flattened. Muldoon could see shadows;
before the silver curtain where he walked. In saline soils, a lot of cement.
Pipeline networks are excellent. We need to change them. But first, Arnold
It should cover the entire line.

"Cote. This is Mildred. We're about to start training." "all

"Okay," Arnold said. "Shut up now."

Muldoon looked at his watch. A few feet away, he hears a voice. I’ve heard
Like a pig, but he knew they were dolphins. She goes to Ramn and asks him to follow her.
above. | You want to get to the other side of the fence.


An hour passed. Donald Gennaro sees the glowing map in the control room as a point and
The numbers are staggering and divisive. What will happen now?

Arnold works in Kansas. "I'm looking for their phone numbers. That's why you called
Malcolm.”

"No, | I mean later."

Arnold looked at the floor. "When animals go and both
education. What | I told you the park was in the barracks. Unless it’s Malcolm’s fault. hear,
There are three such cases. . . ."

"Arnold." It was Muldoon’s voice.

"Whether?"

"Did you see the bloody thing?"

"Just a minute."

Through a spyglass, Genaro saw a shadow far beneath a patch of grass, moving.
wind. There was a house away from me. "That's Sharpod's lesson."
Arnold explained. "It's one of the most important ingredients we use in cosmetics, food and other products."
We have them everywhere in the park, in every neighborhood." TV Video
On walking. "Now we're going to turn the camera to look at the ceiling..."

Gennaro watched the ship sink into the metallic light. residual section;
They killed him. Mildred's Jeep and crew are there.


"Huh," Arnold said. "You mean Rex went to Sauropod."

Mildred said, "Great dinner tonight."

"We need to get out of here," Arnold said.

"By what?" Mildred said. "Rex and I have nothing in common. I'm building this ship, but
you can't come in until morning.

"It doesn't matter, Hammond."

"We'll talk when we get back," said Mildred.


How many sharks did the sharks kill? Hammond said as he entered the hearing.

"Well just one," Harold said. "Big dogs, Rex can only run a little
celebrate."

“We need to get out before dark,” Hammond said.

Mildred shook her head. "I won't be there until morning."

Hammond paused, as he always did when
pain. Did you forget you work with me?

"No, Mr. Hammond, I don't. But it's an ancient Tyransaurus. How
Do you want to know?

"We have weapons."

“We had a 20-inch drop,” Muldoon said. "It's good for the animal to
It weighs four or five pounds. And it weighed eight kilograms. He was not afraid.

"You didn't ask for a stronger weapon..."

"|I ordered three guns, Mr. Hammond, but I'm sorry, we're just
A. And he went out. Nedra followed him as she left.

"Too bad. Who ordered it?"

"Nedry is no problem to me, Mr. Hammond," Muldoon said.

“I think at this point,” Hammond says, “there’s no way around it.
Tyrannosaurus?”

“That’s what I’m talking about,” Muldoon said.

"It's a problem," Hammond said.

"This is your park, Mr. Hammond. You don't want a fan on your property
Dinosaurs. Well, now Rex was with Sharpada and you didn’t have to worry about that anymore.
Good." He left the room.

"Just a minute," Hammond said, smiling. Genaro looks at screens, and
He hears music upstairs and says to Arnold, "|I didn't know you knew."
You still own the park, after all.

"Don't worry," Arnold said, lighting another cigarette. "We have a park. Let it be."
Two hours. We might have to kill a couple of dinosaurs before we can get Rex out of here, but let's hope so.
We have our park.


breakfast


Grant woke up to a low growl. He opened the door.
The eye caught a flash of light that passed in front of him on the driveway to the front of the house. double
This was very rewarding. Then the game is over from the beginning, and ​the food
The room was quiet again.

Grant smiled. He sighed, wincing in pain, and sat down.

The sun streams in through their windows. Next day: slept through the night!
He looked at his watch and it was early: 5 pm
Look at the idea. She fell on his knees and wept. His head was throbbing and his body was shaking as much as he was.
And it fell. He heard a noise near the hallway, like thunder. and
Then Lex laughed.

Grant stopped and looked around. Now that the sun was out, he could see
Some home therapy, lots of medication and activities. He saw a hole in the ceiling.
Toolbox and Note: Sauropod Conservation House (04). This should be
sauropod Shell, as you can imagine. He opens the drawer and looks at the phone, but when he turns it off.
He picks up the receiver and sees that the phones are still working.


"Take care of your body," Lake said. "Don't be a bitch, Ralph."

Grant turned a corner and saw Lexi in the corner of the office, her hand reaching into one of her bags.
The animal in the foreground is a black cat being petted by Grant.
You know. Third year, kids like a horse. There was no tumor in the baby.
At the core, it’s just part of the body. He pushed his head between the sheets.
As for Lex, his eyes scanned her face as he added more pillows.

"It's not good," Leake said. "There's plenty of medicine, don't worry." He stroked the baby's head.
"You like horses, don't you, Ralph?"

Lex turned to look at him.

"It's Ralph," Lex said. "He's my friend. He likes challenges."

Grant took a step back and stood, frowning. "You're so beautiful

“It’s not good,” Leake said.

"|You're so scared."

"Tim, too. He has a sweet tooth."

Where is Tim?

"Lie down," he said. “Do you want to help me feed Ralph?”

The little triceratops looked up at Grant. Grass fell on both sides of it.
The top of the tree became scary.

"He was a big eater," Leake said, "and he ate a lot."

The boy sighed and licked his lips. He opened his mouth and swallowed again. extend
He could see her spread legs and cherry-like body.

“Okay, just a minute,” Lex said, pushing another log out of the way, “Yeah, .
Ralph, he said, "I hope your mother never leaves you."

Why the name Ralph?

"Because he's just like Ralph. In school."

Grant reached out and grabbed her shoulder.

"Well, you can do it," Leake said. "It feels good to be spanked, doesn't it, Ralph?"

His skin was smooth and warm, like a football. Ralph yelled something.
Grant pulled his hand back. In the polar region, the right hemisphere grows happier.

"It's hard." Ralph sees Lex walking towards Grant during dinner and showing no fear.
He reminds Grant that dinosaurs don’t have personalities like humans. "Maybe | maybe
It really is,” Leake said.

"We shouldn't be doing this."

"|It made me laugh," Leake said. "It would be so cool to ride a dinosaur."

Grant examined the fossil record and in the field of sauropods. I was
Flash every few minutes. You have to understand the world around you and accept
Sensor at base. Then, people in the courtroom can take an hour to
Here he is. And he didn’t like the idea of ​​the phone. . . .

They heard a noise like the neighing of a great horse, and the boy was surprised.
They were worried. She tried to put her head between the pillows, but he caught her in the trap.
frill, and ​he cried out in terror.

The sun returned. He was closer this time.

Ralph stood on his hind legs awkwardly between his eyebrows and shook his head.
Up and back, it covered the tree.

"Ralph, you're right," Lex said.

"Wait," Grant said. He put his hand on Ralph's head and bowed, smiling.
on the side and back of the animal. The tub went wrong and the boy fell into the tub and drowned.
He went harder and harder. So the kid hid in the shadows and came out with a big
In appearance, near the bottom of the tree. Its feet are like the claws of an elephant.

Ralph looked up and sighed. A bear appeared: 6 feet long and 3 feet wide.
A white mask, one over each large eye and a smaller one behind the nose. fluent
A perfect Throshertop. The creature looked at Lex and Grant, nodded its head, and
He looked at Ralph. A voice came out, shaking the baby. shouted Ralph and
She spread her legs happily.

Is it his mother? Lex said.

"Yes," Grant said.


Should we feed the mother? Lex said.

But Mrs. Thrushthorp struck Ralph with her finger, killing the baby.
The road.

"Don't worry."

And the boy left the boat and went away. Sometimes, I have my mom.
son, who called after the pair left the bathroom.

"Hello, Ralph," Leica said, extending her hand. Tim walked out into the yard.

"You tell him anything," Grant said. "I went down the hill, turned off the motion sensors so they wouldn't move
Please tell us. You two stay here and wait for me.”

"No," Lex said.

"Why? Stay here. It's safe here."

"Don't leave me," he said. "No, Timmy?"

"Okay," Tim said.

"Okay," Grant said.

They ran in and out of the streets.


This was before the storm.

The air is warm and humid, and the sky is blue. white white locked.
land. On one side, a Thrustertop mother and child are seen playing around the yard,
Giant Hadrosaurus fed on coastal vegetation.

Some Hadrosaurs stood upright in the water. And they sat down and drank.
They dip their heads in the salt water. Then, they look at each other, their heads touching.
From the side a little boy jumped, screamed and ran towards the water
The men looked at him in shock.

To the south, some Hadrosaurs ate leaves. Sometimes they grow
On their hind legs, they put their feet up on branches to reach the branches.
His legs are long. And in the distance, in the trees, was a large, skinny Apatosaurus.
he shook his big head. The place was haunted, Grant couldn't believe it.
war

"Whether!" Lex yells and steps closer. Two six-foot poles were erected.
they. "What's that?"

"Animals," he said. "The Jurassic is the age of monsters." "I can

Will you fall? Lik said.

«|Don't worry about it,' said Grant.

Tim picks up his gun. The dragon sets the trap. He could feel the weight of a large object.
insect.

"He's going to hurt you," Lex said.

But the ball quickly came back clean, and, when Tim
He reached out and held out his hand.

"Which way are we going?" Lex said.

"there."

They started walking across the hallway. They came to a black box on a tall metal plate.
tripod, moving first. Grant stood up and reached for his gun and
But nothing happened. If the phones are not working, the sensor may not be working.
"I'll see you again," he said, gesturing to everyone. Remote listening
The sound of a large animal.


"Oh, hell," Arnold said. "I didn't find it." He took a sip of coffee and watched TV with his eyes closed.
He had turned off all television channels on the internet. In the courtroom, he looks for a computer.
code. He was tired; He worked twelve hours a day. He saw Wu, who
from the laboratory.

"What did you find?"

"The phones didn't go out. They couldn't go back. | I think Nedry did something with the phone."

Wu picks up the phone and hears the dial. “Ken is a role model.”

"But that's not it," Arnold said. because | He reached deep and covered everything.
model. "What I heard was white noise, which sounded like a modem ringing."


"And the phones are bad?"

"Now, of course. Nedry got too close. He seemed to be following her."
Software Code, and ​Software | I didn't get it, because | enacted the Criminal Code based on a portion of the
program page. But the basic rules for phones seem to have been established.
Computer memory.

Wu raised his hand. "Okay? Just do it: turn off the computer and restart the system."

"I've never done that before," Arnold said. "But I don't care. It's fine."
You can go to the starting point-but you can go over them. You’re not a computer expert either. I don't
really. And because there is no phone line, we cannot talk to anyone there.”

"If the process is a RAM resident, it won't show up in the list. You can remove some RAM and
You’re looking, but you don’t know what you’re looking for. | You think you can do it with your mind.

Enter Jinaru. "We didn't even have a phone."

"We're working on it."

"We've been working on him since midnight. And Malcolm is the worst. He needs medical attention."
attention."

"That's why I had to sell it," Arnold said. "| I can't believe it can all come back."

Genaro said, "Look. There's a patient in this room. He needs a doctor or he's going to die. You."
Never call a doctor without a phone. Otherwise, die 4. New,
Put down the phones and use the phones!

Arnold sighed.

"good?" January said.

"Well, that's it... The security systems don't allow access to the computer, and-"

"Then kill the guards! Don't think he's going
Did he die because no one helped him?

"Okay," Arnold said.

He stood up and walked towards the large tree. He opened the doors and went downstairs
Belt closure. And he took them out one by one. "You asked for it,"
Arnold said. "And you understand."

He puts down the key.

The school is dark. Everything looked black, and the three men stood in the darkness.

How long do we have to wait? January said. "Thirty seconds," Arnold said.


Water! “They’ll try,” Leake said.

"in?" Grant said.

"The flowers!" Lex said. "Like free food."

Grant paused. He looked all over the place at the tall trees, curious. fluent
He didn't see anything. There was no wind blowing the leaves. There was peace and quiet.
Early morning. "I think it was his attitude," she said.

"No-."

Then he heard her voice. He came from the group of guards next to him.
they. First one dog, then another, and another, until all the dogs are eaten.
cry. The ducks were chirping, jumping, and bouncing as they emerged from the water to lay their eggs.
Others will look at them. . . .

They can smell it too, Grant thought.

With a roar, the Tyransaurus galloped, thirty feet away, towards the horse. flee.
You’re going to be in the country with a lot of dogs. Ignoring them, he went to get wood.
Hadrosaurus.

I told you that! Lexi yelled. "No one can hear me!"

In the distance ducks are chirping and jumping. Grant could feel the heat.
under his feet. "Hey, baby!" He grabbed Leaky, lifted her body off the ground and ran off with
Tim loves roses. He saw a tyrannosaur in the ocean, swimming.
hadrosaurs, which used their jaws for defense and swimming to mate and reproduce. Already heard
A shower of leaves and twigs, and when he saw it, his fingers flew.


Arnold looked at his watch, and ​Arnold checked his watch. Thirty seconds. The result should be
It's safe. He tapped the remote again.

Nothing happened.

Arnold's jaw dropped. He closed the gap, then pulled away. However, nothing happens. fluent
He has blood on his face.

"What's going on?" January said.

"Oh dear," Arnold said. Finally, remember to wear a seat belt.
Before the power comes back on. He broke off the three pieces and replaced them with that.
Good page. He then took a deep breath and let out a sigh.

The city lights are bright. What is

The computer beeped. leaves;

mind.

"Thank God," Arnold said. He confronts the head of security. There are pages.
monitor:


Gennaro picks up his phone, but it’s dead. There were no surprises this time - not at all.
"what is this?"

"Give me some," Arnold said. "After you upgrade, everything you put into the system needs to be replaced."
line manually." The employee immediately returned to work.

"why?" January said.

"Will you let me work for Jesus?"

Wu said, "The system is not designed to be sustainable. So if it is sustainable, it will be devastating
There is a problem somewhere. You have to initialize everything manually, if not with
Somewhere along the line, the system starts, turns on, disconnects, and crashes.
Again, in a never ending cycle."

"Okay," Arnold said. "going to."

Genaro picked up his phone, started dialing, and stood up.

"Jesus, can't you see?" He showed a video clip.

But Arnold wasn't listening, he was looking at the map where the dots were.
the ball starts moving in a straight line. It moves fast, in the direction of gravity.

"What's going on?" January said.

"Ducks," Arnold said calmly. "They did the balance."


The ducks moved at a leisurely rhythm, their tails moving in unison;
And they were screaming, the kids were screaming and trying to stay a foot away. Animals raise large calves.
Thunder clouds. Grant couldn’t see the guard.

His dancing fingers.

Still holding onto Lex, he and Tim ran up a hill with their arms wide open. And he ran.
It was so hard, they felt like the ground was burning under their feet. As the animals approached, they called
It’s as deafening as airplane noise at an airport. It filled the air and reached their ears. Lexi yelled.
But, for one thing, he couldn’t hear the screams as he struck the stone,
They added the mushrooms.

Grant had bigger feet than any previous Hadrosaurus, carrying more weight than any other animal.
Five tons, and then he was in the air and couldn't see anything. heart
It shows large body size, large paws, pain cries when attacked by the animal and
notice. A bear threw a rock at him, flew towards them, and then left the area.

Against the blue sky, they could see nothing but rock. They face each other.
Listen to Southern music and dance. Lexi signed her name.
His leg was on Grant's shoulder.

Another Henderson scratched his hand on the rocks, ​leaving a trail of blood. extend
He waited until he heard gunfire from his left, then joined the boy.
He started to climb a large tree. They climbed up quickly, clutching their bodies like rats.
They were covered in dust. Walking about twenty feet, Lex caught up with Grant.


And he didn't want to go far. Tim was surprised too, and Grant thought there was a lot. through
landscape, they can see animals moving as far as they can walk.
Grant sat on the board, laid back on the bed and closed his eyes.
And he'll get married.


Arnold waves to the camera as the animals walk away. He quickly cleared his throat. He looked at her.
Hadrosaurs passed and tyrannosaurs stayed behind, i.e.
He had committed a murder. Samson was by the water. Arnold looked at the video camera.
"Muldoon you better go see how bad it is," he said.

"I'll take it," said Gennard, leaving the room.


park


And for this it is like a flame in the fire. Something hot and brown covered Grant's face.
He opened his eyes and saw a huge tower of hair. The head is placed on the locked door.
Like dad’s face. The eyes on the back of the moth lobster are yellow and black.
n cow. The bay door opened and Grant sat up crossing his arms. fluent
He saw big feet in his class. His tail turned and the creature sat down.

Hadrosaurus means bear. It was interesting to see it up close. epic; all
There were many types of dinosaurs that grazed on the ground and these worked as livestock. and
Despite its size, the thing was solid and sturdy, and ​Grant did not disappoint. stay
From its position in the branches, it tells it to fly and watches as it feeds.

What surprised Grant was that there were some references to the monster:
Probably Mysore, of Late Cretaceous Montana. And John Horner, please
He was the first person to mention race. Myshaur has a flat head, which is
His face is wooden. Her name means beautiful woman, she is believed to protect the Mayasaurs.
The eggs remain until the young are born and are able to fend for themselves.

Grant hears a crash and his left hand twitches. She turned to look at him.
The young Hadrosor knelt beside the old man. The baby is black and white.
bar. The old man hung his head and waited, motionless, for the boy to wake up.
She puts the back of her knees and elbows on her mother’s head and takes the bite.
from the coast.

The mother waits patiently until her baby finishes eating and everything falls to the floor.
Four more, and the vote was back on Grant.

The hadrosaurus still sat only a few feet away. Grant stayed a few steps away from the two.
Air holes at the end of the box. The dinosaur couldn’t eat Grant. so
Although the monster stared at him in some way, Henderson did not respond.

He remembered what he had seen the night before. Grant said.
in an experiment.

He was breathing.

Suddenly the Hadrosaur stopped, as soon as the massive head stopped scratching its back. except
He walked forward, looking for the source of the commotion. Then, after a while, when he decided .
There is no danger, the animal begins to forget.

Not really, thought Grant.

Sitting up in his arms, Lex opened his eyes and said, "Hey, what was that?"

The Hadrosaurus shouted, the Portuguese monster that scared Lexus and made
He fell from the tree. Hadrasa took his hat from the tree, placed it on his head, and spoke again.

"Don't worry," Tim said from around the corner.

The little boy screamed and ran to his mother's lap and came to Harozor.
Amusing. His mother raised her head and asked for the wand, Grant was.
Lex sat up. The dinosaur has a smiley face.

"Don't you like it?" Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "He just scared her."

"So," Lex said, "are you going to make us some water or something?"

Hadrozor reports to the police. He hugged her again. and Grant in
impression He was trying to deceive them. But of course, Kanba didn't know.


purpose. He found it gross and disgusting. They wait a minute or so.
the hadrosaur approached the figure again, narrowing his eyes in thought. In fact, it will
Start eating.

"You're right," Lex said. "I'm not here." He started to climb the tree. along
As he left, Hadrosaur added a new sound.

Grant was awesome. He decided he wouldn’t see us if we survived. And a minute later
You almost forgot we were here. This looks like another example of Tyransaurus
Amphibious optical fibers. Animal studies have shown that aquatic ecosystems aren’t static, either.
Beetles. If someone doesn’t walk, they don’t see it. It was kind of the same thing.
Dinosaurs.

However, it seems likely that Mayasaurus found this tree representing
It’s very encouraging. She placed her son in the backyard and quickly fell asleep. It saves time.
Once, and ​look at them carefully.

And they came to the bottom. Lex shook his head. Both children hugged each other.
dirty. Grass fell all around them. There are red blood cells.
smell.

Grant checked his watch. "Alright, let's go boys," he said.

"No," Leake said. "I'm not going here."

"We have to do it."

"why?"

"Yeah," said Grant, "we'll have to tell them about the island. If they don't want to see us."
When we build a part, we have to go all alone. It’s just a job.

"Why shouldn't we take the train?" Tim said.

What team?

Tim pointed to the storage room with a low ceiling where they lived far away.
evening. He was 20 feet from the wall. "| I saw a ship here," he said.

Grant recognized the benefits immediately. It was now almost one in the morning. they
There were about eight miles to go. If they moved the boat to the other side, they would have more
It is growing rapidly around the world. "We will," Grant said.


Arnold went into video search mode and saw scanners flying everywhere.
park, with images changing every two seconds. I was tired of being seen, but it was true.
Sal notices Nedry’s Jeep and Muldoon offers to fix it. is derived by
Genaro looked at the crowd, but by now it was too late to try to find the car. fluent
He wants weapons.

His phone was ringing. "Mr. Arnold, can I tell you something, okay?" fluent

And Hamon. It sounded like the voice of God.

"Would you like to come here, Mr. Hammond?"

"No, Mr. Arnold," Hammond said. "Come with me. I'm in the genetics lab with Dr. Wu. We're
I'm waiting for you.

Arnold took a deep breath and turned to the cameras.


Grant was escorted down the hallway. He gave five pounds.
Four buckets, stove, Jeep tires, air tires;
Hundreds of pounds of dirt, weight, engine oil, tools
Light and light.

"| You don't see a cloud."

"Keep it up."

Artificial cement, copper pipe, plaster .. . The two plastic holes are connected with metal screws.
The earth is not a wall.

"Okay, but where's the fountain?" "fluent

You have to be here somewhere,” Tim said.

"Did you see the wall?"

"No, I just thought you were here."


In Grant’s little pocket, he couldn’t find the key. But he showed a lot of determination and came back u
Hanging on a peg on the wall, he gives you his thoughts.
Below, a ghost appeared. And he looked at them for a long time.

"I stopped... .""Just

minutes."

These maps contain important information about the early settlement of the island.
Thus turning the valley into the previously overlooked river, which became a .
At the end of the day. . . as the birds do. . . and in half a mile in length.

She filled out the form. How to get to the hotel? According to the number, there are
Maybe there was an entrance to the floor they were on. Grant looked up, saw her, and winked.
on the ceiling fan. The door is too wide for the car. When he opened the door, he saw a
Stand on the beach. The passageway was buried underground and not
Light from above. It’s a different way of working. and went to the beach.
And the most prominent feature of the ship is the RAFT STORAGE.

"Hey," said Tim, "look at that." He hands Grant a gun.

Opening it, Grant sees a compressed air cannon and a bulletproof leather clip. Six years.
slice all the way around, each finger-width apart. Its product is MORO709.

"Good job Timmy." He fastened the belt around his neck with his handcuffs attached to his belt.

"A flying bomb?"

"Yeah I mean."

How is my father? Lex said.

“I think he was at the top of the mountain,” Grant said. They started walking down the street. Grant boarded the train he was supposed to catch.
shoulder. "I'm glad it's a big hole," Lex said, "because | I'm not very good at falling."

"Don't worry," he said.

"We can catch fish," he said.

And they were walking along the road, and water was coming out of two wells.
They heard a noise, but Grant couldn't figure out where it was coming from.

"Do you think there's a hole here?" Lex said, frowning.

"Okay," Grant said.

The screams of agony continued as they walked, but they also heard voices.
market in When they reached the end of the small street,
Grant was shocked.

Here lives a King.

They sit under a tree with their feet in front of them. Eyes
It was open but barely moving;
noise. The sound of running water covered it and
His jaw was swollen shut and his mouth was bleeding and the body of a killed Hadrosaurus was under his chin.
Thermasaurus.

Tiranasara is divided into twelve districts. Grant did see it, but he
The creature did not respond. He just sat there. It took him a moment to realize: Tyransaurus had
asleep. I was tired, but I was struggling.

He tells Tim and Leica to stay where they are. Grant walked briskly.
dock, in full tyrannosaur face. The old man was still asleep, snoring softly.

Towards the end of the bridge, the wood is painted black to match the pillars. extend
He opened the door and looked outside. Half a dozen oranges were cut into it.
A wall, some logs, some iron, and two mana cubes are still there
below. The columns are closed in pairs.

balsa.

He turned to Lex. fluent

Mouth: Nothing, he shakes his head.

Whether.

Tyransaurus raised a hand to cover his tail next to his chest. But that's not the case
He didn't move. Grant pulls a cube out of the mountain. He was surprised at how soft it was. fluent
It removes the springs and assumes a cylindrical shape. With a flash of a wheel, the car started moving, and
And with tears! Unlock the vehicle. They are expensive.
ear.


Grant stopped and looked at the dinosaur.

Tyransaurus roared and screamed. He started to walk away. Grant tries to escape, but he
The cat yawned and leaned against the tree and stood up.
Scream, scream.

Lex sighed and rubbed his hands over his face.

Grant was burned for violating the crime. He moved the dish to the other side of the kitchen. fluent
It fell into the water with a thud.

The dinosaur was still asleep.

Grant tied the ship to the dock, returned to the deck, and fired both guns. fluent
Put them in the bag, then take the babies out of the bag.

Hesitantly, Lex lowered his hand, no, lowered it.

He raises his hand: Yes.

The transavari was still asleep.

Grant throws him into the air with a kick. Lex smirked, smirking.
He arrives on a bicycle; Then Tim entered. They both got dressed. Grant comes in and runs.
The boat floats down the river. Grant picked up his bag and pointed at it.
ship. And they fled to the mountain.

Lex sat up and exhaled in pain. Then he felt like flying, and thanked
are. He shook his body, in a weak whisper: he wanted to breathe.

He always throws an attack at the wrong time!

"Lex," Tim said, turning toward the river.

He shook his head vigorously and shook his head. She knew what he meant: change.
The language. All he needed was a drink. Grant was driving the truck and Tim was riding.
He reached over to the table and shook his hand.

Lex stiffens and smiles. To Tim’s ears, the words rose out of the water like
Metal.

Tyransaurus grinned happily and covered his head with his cat-like paws. fluent
He shook his head again. He was very tired after the big meal and got up early.

On the ship, Lex is making some music. “Lex;

Shut up!", Tim said.

"| I can't stop," he said quietly, then sniffed again. Grant works on the boat to keep the boat moving.
He ran to the riverbank.

In the river, the Tyransaurus retreats.

"| I can't talk, Tim!" Lexi yelled. I didn’t do it!

"Chch!"

Grant steered the ship as best he could.

"Okay," he said. "We were very careful. He couldn't get in the water."

"That's bad, thief!" Tim shouted. Riverside, Tiranapur
And he got out of the boat and walked on the water. And he followed them to the water.

« Well, how | recognize ? She said.

"Everyone knows dragons are fake! It's in every book! Because all animals are fake!"

"The law is wrong."

"Yes, death is possible. It's cruel!"

"Stop," Grant said. Take some! Grant looked at the Trancer.
It looks like a running dog. The tyrannosaur leaped into the water, but slipped
Its massive head hit the ground, and ​Grant knew the creature couldn't move, and it collapsed.
somehow, because then only the eyes and ears protruded from the head
above. Meanwhile it looks like a duck and walks like a duck, changing shape
His back shook and screamed, the water splashing behind him. above, Grant is the director
ground, and ​their ears were in all directions, as if they were scratching their heads a few times.

He thinks as happily as a dog. The crab is the largest crab in the world.

"I'm so sorry, Dr. Grant!" Lex shouted. I don’t want to!

Grant looked over his shoulder. Here, the bottom is no more than a hundred kilometers deep.
And they got in the middle. If we leave it, the water will continue to rise.
Tyransaurus could also swim and swim in shallow water. extend
And he turned the ship, and began to sail southward.


"What are you doing?"

The tyrannosaur was only a few feet away. Grant heard her breathing.
As he approached. Grant looked at the knives in his hands, but they were dull.
All shots.

Tyransaurus threw back its head, opening its mouth to reveal sharp claws.
and, with a strain, climbed aboard the wrecked ship;
The big head turned, and the water ran over the edge of the pool.

The Tyrannosaurus bit it, leaving scars. The island still exists. Lex
He snapped his fingers and looked down.

Is it in your mouth?

"No," Grant said. He saw bubbles - and a fire burning near the volcano -

"attention!" She screamed as her head hit the rubber floor, turning the boat around and up.
He was in the air, catching their attention before disappearing again.

Do something! Alex shouted. Do something!

Grant pulls the air piston out of his pocket. It looked very small in his hands, but he had
It can kill germs in the sensitive areas around the eyes and mouth.

Tyransaurus appeared on the edge of the cliff, opened his mouth and roared. Grant returned and
taken. The guard glowed in the light, scratching his back. Tyransaurus shook his head.
And he gave it to me again.

Suddenly, they hear a sound coming from the water nearby.

Somehow, Grant saw the young T-Rex on its side and saw that the sauropod was dead.
She said it was her fault. The boy cleared his throat, then shook his head.
he shouted. The Giant Tyrannosaurus also saw it, and ​had the same conclusion - back in
Take care of the battle and go to the other side of the river.

He was walking! Lex sighed and crossed his arms. "I'm watching! Nhnnn-
I don't߹ Damn dinosaur!

From the shore, the boy shouted in frustration. Startled, the Giant Tyransaurus turned
the lagoon in all its glory, with its length stretching from the bay to the mountains above sea level.
The boy shook his head and gasped, his stomach full of precious meat.

The dragon turned and ran towards the foot of the dead monster flying off the cliff. they
He heard her breathing heavily.
The lagoon, not in the background.

Too tired to keep going, Grant slipped and injured his leg. He could barely breathe.
He was in heaven and he fell.

"Are you all right, Dr. Grant?" Lex asked.

"Now, what are you going to do | Shall I tell you?"

"Okay," he said, as if he was asking the world's worst question.
He held his hand in the water for a moment. "You missed the train," he said.

"I'm tired," Grant said.

"How are we doing?"

Grant sat up. It was very good. The ship was slowly heading east. "Now it has to be." What is
The subway took them to the hotel in the evening. He looked at his watch and sighed.
Fifteen minutes past seven. It had only been 15 minutes since he left.
Your school. So two hours.

Grant placed it back on the keyboard and closed his eyes and went back to sleep.


five


"The problems in the system are growing right now."
Ian Malcolm
search


Genaro sat in the jeep, listening to the roar of the sea lions and looking out over the towering palm trees.
The trees shook with the flames. He was surprised by what looked like a target: a mountain.
One hundred yards in each direction. The big tree fell.
land. There is a large pool of blood in the grass and rocks to k
good.

Sitting down next to him, Mildred said "It doesn't look so good. Rex was inside a Hadrosaurus." fluent
He picked up another bottle of whiskey and gulped it down. "It's really fast," he said.

They wait and see.

Gennaro drummed his fingers on the table. What are we waiting for?

The mayor did not immediately respond. "There's Rex somewhere," he said, smiling.
The field in the morning. "And none of our weapons have power."

"We're in the jeep."

"Oh, he's driving in the Jeep, Mr. Gennard," Mildred said with a frown. "When are we going
On this road and over land the only thing we could do in four laps was thirty-four miles
One hour. It drags us down. No problem." Mud nodded. "But | I don't see anything
I'm leaving now. Are you willing to go through the trouble?

"Okay," Genaro said.

Muldoon started the engine, and ​with a sigh, the two little Otniellia
Azucare made of wood. Muldoon gave me his car. He walked in a circle.
He located the window, entered and climbed some stairs to the ground floor.
And he came to the sons of Othniel. Then he left and left.
Walk up the hill, away from the jeep. And when he arose, behold, a cloud appeared in the sky.

"What's that?" Jinaru said.

"Pick up the radio," Mud said.

Genaro got out of the Jeep and walked toward her. Even at a distance, it can
Wet skin dries quickly. He saw something red on the grass with blood and knew
Askew.

"The son of a Hadrosaurus," Mildred said, looking at Suri. "Everyone go."
And then the kid gets scared and a Trex attacks him.

"How do you know?" January said. The meat was cut into thin slices.

"You can tell the difference," said Mildred. "See the white stuff on the grass?"
That’s Hadro Spur. Uric acid goes red. But here you can see”-he pointed to a large mountain.
He rubs his tail against the grass- "It's the tail of a tyrannosaur."

How do you know that Tyrone came later?

"Very well," said Mildred. "Have you seen the children?" He pointed to the bird.
"These are for autism. These syringes don't contain blood. Death syringes are for snakes."
Otis did. But Hadro landed with a broken leg - you can see the big gash
That, most impressively, is Trex, no question.

Genaro looked at his body and looked at his feet.
It's not true. Next door, Muldoon turned on his radio. "ride. "

"Yes," John Arnold radioed.


"We found another dead Hadra. The baby." Muldoon sat between the trees, watching.
The skin on the back of the knee. There was a number that said, "Book is number HD/09."

The radio crackled. "I have a thing for you," Arnold said.

"Oh? What's that?"

"|She found Nedra."


The Jeep went through the woods on the east side of the freeway.
career path, leading to fieldwork. This part of the park was hot and wooded.
and fetid around them. Muldoon checks Gibb's computer, which is now .
He pointed to the social media map. "It was caught on surveillance video," he said.
said. "Scott 1104 is right in front of you."

Further down the road, Gennaro sees a puddle, a jeep parked beside it. "fluent
It could have gone wrong," Muldon said. "A baby.”

What did he bring? Jinaru asked.

"Wu said five students. Do you know what that means?"

Genaro shook his head.

"Somewhere between two and ten thousand," said Mildred. He shook his head. "Too much."

As they approached, Janrod saw the deceased standing next to the car. The body is not black and
Green – but then the usual greens disappeared, like the Jeep.

“They’re leaders,” Muldoon said. "The commissioners got it,"

Twelve Prochomygnathidae have been identified, which are small birds larger than ducks.
In the woods, cheering, the men got out of the car.

Dennis Nedry was sprayed on his head, neck and shoulders. The rats are dead.
His mouth was open and his mouth was open. His body is finished - the tip of the hole, a
His legs are ready to go. Genaro stood for a moment, looking at the dwarfs worriedly.
His hind legs are bent, facing the crowd. There are dinosaurs.
Five feet, he offered. Wash their eyes and mouth and rinse.
The best-

"I don't know," said Mildred. "We don't have time for the committee."

"in?"

Mildred shook her head. Do you see the pattern? In his clothes and face? You wear makeup.
Does it smell like old black smoke?

Genaro nodded. He was breathing.

"It sucks," Muldoon said. "Dilophosares don't exist. You see the problem
The approach, all black. In our eyes, it’s annoying but not fatal. You have about two hours to clean it.
Out with the weapon; We explore everything around the park whenever we can. If it doesn’t mean this
bastard. They destroyed it, tore it apart, with great force. Right.
There are monsters in the world, after all."

procompsognatbids screamed and jumped up and down as Genora opened the front door
Inside the door you will find a metal lock and a metal box. "Everything is still there," he said. fluent
He gave Gennaro two little black beads.

"what is this?" January said.

"That's how good they are," Muldon said. "Coins." When he returned Genaro said;
You don’t want to miss anything.

Genaro tapped his fingers on Nedry’s shoulder. Muldoon took the rock and went to the other Jeep;
And put it in the middle. Get in the back of the van. "going to."

"How's it going?" Genaro said, pointing to his chest.

"How's it going?" Mildred said. "We have things to do." He drove the car. I'm looking for it.
In the distance, Genaro sees cars begin to speed up. One jumped and landed on Nedra's lap.
He opened his mouth and licked the flesh of her lips.


The graveyard cycle is complete. The plates on both sides have hinges to keep out jewelry and debris.
This shape faces forward and blocks the sun. Tim hears birds chirping and he
Small dinosaurs roam the trees. But suddenly the air is hot;
Under the shade of a tree.

Grant checked his watch. It was eight o’clock.


They walk happily in the light. If so, it looks like
He’s moving faster than ever. She had just woken up and Grant was sitting on his haunches looking at the tree.
Head to head. Just then, he saw his wife waking up.

"Hey, what are you doing?" She said.

Do you think it’s safe to eat this food? He gestured to the box. Some would say
His lips seemed to burn to her touch. Tim noticed the red marks on his hands.

"No," Grant said.

why? Small dinosaurs eat them. It features little walking dinosaurs.
Leaves.

"No, Lexi."

He was happy, not happy with his body. "| I wish my father was here," she said. "always
He knows what he’s doing.

"What are you saying?" Tim said. "He didn't know what he was doing."

"Yes, he does," she whispered. Lex watched the trees move, their wings mov
after the flood. "Because it wasn't a search . . ."

Tim smiled and said nothing.

"But don't worry, you look good too, Dad. Even when you're on computers and in locker rooms."

"My mother was an athlete," Tim explained to Grant.

Grant shook his head. In the branches of the trees fluttered a few little green birds.
There was applause and more applause. They had a cherry topping. "Do you know their names?" Tim said.
"Microsertube."

“It’s huge,” Leake said.

"|I think you're right."

"Only kids care about dinosaurs," he said.

"Who is he?"

"Lord."

Tim starts to cry, but Grant comforts his friend. "The kids," he said, "screamed."

"why?" Lex said, "|You can do whatever | I want, if-"

Then he laughed because he heard it too. The noise comes from everywhere.
five.


Where was Rex? Mildred asked, talking over the radio. “We don’t really know.
Look here." They were also on the outskirts of Sarpodah, where they could see the fireworks.
This is where the Hadrosurians lived. The Tyrannosaurus was nowhere to be seen.

"Now I see," Arnold said and smiled.

Muldoon is furious with Genaro. "I'll see you now," he said calmly. "Why don't you
Have you tried it? Why didn't he try?'

"|I don't know," Janari said.

“It doesn’t look like it,” Arnold said after a moment.

What does it mean to not disclose?

"Not on cameras. Motion sensors don't connect."

"Hell," said Mildred. "A lot of it is pretty bad. Have you seen Grant and the boys?"

"The speed is amazing."

"Well, what are we going to do now?" Mildred said.

"Calm down," Arnold said.


look! look!

In front of them, a large pair of birds flew overhead. Grant took one look at him.
clingy; Now he realized he had started four miles or so. example
Zedis's feet glowed red and his first instinct was that the mirror must
It has a ton. Then, as they got closer, he saw that there was no mirror, only a room. Good range.
and hid in their land.

"Nothing happened," Lex said.

"|I think so," Grant said.

"That's why all birds fly."

"If they're big birds," Grant said.


The river runs through the mountains. They looked at the wall. Now they
In the bathroom, you can still scratch the floor. Just a few minutes.
If you don’t see it alone. Grant said, “|I remember there was a separate bedroom.
Here." He recently bought a house in the western mountains.

Do you want to go? Tim said.

"It could be the phone. Or something weird." Grant walked behind him. "We should try
To access the Control Center. Time is running out.

They got out of the water and, jumping into the cold water, Grant pulled the boat out of the water.
Then he tied the rope to a tree, and they went to a big forest with Indian trees.


car;


«|I just don’t get it,» said John Arnold over the phone. “It’s not Ricky, and ​ |
Plus, you can’t go anywhere with Grant or the kids.

He sat down in front of the consoles and took another cup of coffee. All around, the kingdom.
The house was filled with debris and debris from the afternoon rain. Arnold sighed. I was
Saturday 8:00 am Forty hours Nedry turns off the computer.
In Jurassic Park , Arnold calmly narrates a few details, one after another. "The whole bar
The units became stronger and more efficient. Machines work. I called the doctor.
You."

On the other side of the fence, Malcolm looked uncomfortable. Arnold talks to her in her room.
Manic. "But there's a problem with the motion sensors?"

«Well, I didn’t | What I’m looking for”.

"How is Rex?"

"There was no hunger this time. He started early in the morning, about twenty minutes before, and ​ went
on the wedding day, then | They destroyed it. | I don’t know why, but I always try.

"But shouldn't it be Grant and the kids?"

"I don't."

"I think it's great," Malcolm said. "Social connections create a safety net."

"Isn't he going?" Arnold rolled his eyes. "Last two ninety-"

«Ninety-two percent of the world, | Remember,” Malcolm said.But if you show others.
Place in the World, | Suppose you find that eight percent is a reasonable percentage, i.e.
that these parts are important. Now, the animal can roam freely anywhere in the park.
It searches rivers, forests, rivers, and streams.
nothing."

"Still," said Arnold, "animals don't have the sense of smell."

“I don’t know how animals suffer,” Malik said.

What do you think Grant and the boys are up to? Arnold said.

"Not now," Malcolm said, fighting again. "Grant wasn't an engineer. He really wanted to be
Ask him, and he will tell you. The wife and children hide from the projects they see every day. But you can
They have other things we don’t know. or are in the river, do.

"|Don't wait for them to reach the river. The cliffs are too narrow. You can't swim in the
there."

"Will you take the question this far?"

"Yes, but it's not the best, because -they live with birds. . ."

Why don’t birds fly down the road? Malcolm said.

"We have a problem with the plan. Before, the park was just a mountain of trees.
Built on land, visitors can see the glaciers from a different perspective. we
Four species of dactyls have been identified among birds now - yes, they are cearadactyls, the dactyls eat a lot of prey.

How are they doing?

"Well, when we were building the house, we put the ducks in the chicken coop to train them. But they
This is a big problem. It turns out our plants are soil.

"Directory?"

"Tough terrain," Arnold said. They fight each other for territory and fight
"All the other animals that come will hear it."

"hostile?"


"Okay," Arnold said. “The birds fly on their wings and .
salt. A 30-pound dog will knock a man to the ground like a brick. they
The workers were beaten and forced to drop their weapons.

Aren’t your pipes burst?

"It's not like that."

"So if the children are among birds.. ."

"They're not," Arnold said. "Yeah, I don't think so."


"Is that Lori?" Lex said. "What a leaf."

Below the birds, Peteratops Lodge is built high up in the trees.
flat, at the base of the tree. But the house is unfinished and immaculate; What is
The doors are open. The tree and the house were decorated with white flowers.

"I thought they didn't do anything," Grant said, hiding his disappointment. fluent
He glanced at his watch. "Let's go back to the store."

The sun came out during the walk and it was a beautiful morning. He looked at Grant.
A photo of the ceiling above noted that the floor was
The parts are printed on each panel in the same white color as before.
In your home. And the smell wafts in the morning air.

"It smells bad in here," Lex said. "What do you mean all white?"

"It's like a treat. It's good for birds."

Why wasn’t Lorraine fired?

"|I don't know."

They entered a clearing filled with grass. They heard a voice.
Then the horn sounded, coming from the other side of the mountain.

"What's that?" "I don't

expert."

Then Grant sees a black cloud in the woods. long
I'm going to go in the middle. And he immediately ordered them to be arrested. And he looked, and behold, it was very dark.
They hang it in the sky.

"Whether!" Lex said. "Aptridactic?" "Whether,"

Tim said.

Grant didn’t answer. He was a good tackler, moving through the air. above
From their tail, the pterodactyl sticks out a tail and makes a soft noise, walking towards them.

How can you not walk down the street? Tim said.

Grant thinks so. Flying dinosaurs are so cute and cool.
He was floating in the air. As Grant looked up, he saw another bird in the sky.
The third and the fourth.

"It's probably because they didn't close the gap," Leake said.

Grant thought the trees were unusual. They are so great. Should
Cearadactyls, large flying reptiles from the early Cretaceous period. If it was below, it would be
Like the little ones. And as they went down, behold, there were winged serpents, two cubits long.
Its body is black and its head looks like an arrow. take f of it. North America and
Mexico.

Lex opened his eyes and looked up. Can they hurt us?

"|Don't worry. I eat fish."

A figure rolls across the floor, and ​a red light calls out to you and the police.
The hot air and the smell of smoke.

"good morning!" Lex said. "They're really cool." And he said, don’t you think they should be afraid of us?

"dump."

The second layer goes through the process more slowly than the first. He turned around and did it.
in front of their heads. Grant nodded and patted his body. It means a lot of things.
Bat, he thought. But the animals looked at Grant strangely. His mother
The wings are overlapping – black feathers are folded into it – so it’s a bit of a camouflage.
It all benefits Ducts.

"write!" Lex screams and grabs her by the hair. But he sent me. "fluent

What?" Grant said.


"He killed me! He killed me!" When he lifted his body, he saw blood on his hands.

Upstairs, two doctors grabbed their wings and landed on tables
He fell to the ground. They managed to scream as they jumped to the bottom.

"series!" Grant said holding their hands. They played with each other and.
With a stick, he ran across the ground once more and took the children
And they went down behind the two eagles that went before them, and they flapped their wings. extend
He felt like he had the boot on his foot.

Then he stood up, picked up the Lexus, ran with Tim a few steps ahead and .
Two birds circled above, chirping. Then, the
He throws the children to the ground and the darkness grows thicker and thicker.

"Uck," Lex said, annoyed. He saw that the birds were white.

Grant jumped to his feet. "series!"

Just as he was about to run away, Lex screamed in panic. He was very nervous and noticed something.
The dactyls held the cover with their thick claws. Animals with many vertebrates are lizards;
It shone in the sun and split in two. The doctor tried to reassure her.
But Lex was too heavy, and ​when he fought, he hit his head several times with his body.
The back of his head.

Lex screamed and threw her in joy. Grant accomplished the same goal. fluent
He stopped, turned around, and leaned against Duke's body. He throws it away.
His head hit the ground and fell onto his stomach. The creature roared;
Grant pulled his hat off his back and dropped to his knees when a voice came back.
body. It was like living in a tent in a storm. He couldn’t see; He couldn’t stop; I was
Nothing but screaming and screaming and ripping off clothes. The months are warm.
over his head. Lex shouted. Grant threw himself onto Dactyl and screamed.
And turned around when he changed directions and tried to turn back. Eventually, he gave up.
The bird like wings flapped and rose to its feet and began to fly down the road.
Suddenly he stopped.

He can even walk on his wings! Hi Leather! But there are other doctors.
At the thought of them, Grant is shocked and helpless, horrified to see Lex walking away, the
Hands on his head. . . Tim yelled in the background. . . .

The first of them fell to the ground and hit something with a stick.
And he will suck. The other tables moved up quickly, following the first floor. The fourth
Dactyl flies through the air to join the others. Grant looked up and saw her.
What happened. The three doctors asked first, shouting in anger.

They were the only ones in the show. "in

good? Grant said.

“They got my glove,” Leake said. "Daryl is part of the landscape."

And they started walking again. Tim put his hands on his hips. "Are you okay?"

"Yeah, bad," he said, smiling. He stared at the ceiling. "|I want them to hurt me to death,"
She said.

"Yeah," Tim said. "me too-"

The ships are at sea. Grant checked his watch. Thirty-eight. fluent
Now he had two and a half hours to get back.


Lex shouted as they passed the dome of the Silver Eagle. Then, in 1990, the trail was closed.
On each side, the mountain faces the river. The river is smaller than it looks, in some ways.
The hole was ten feet deep and the water was gushing. Lexi nodded and took their hands.
They seem to have passed.

Grant sat in the boat and listened to the shooting. they
They walked a little way, and now passed the branches. It's really beautiful. fluent .
A cool breeze blew the burning logs around him. And that means taking
A lot of time.

Grant wasn't sure how far they had come, but they must have gone miles.
sauropod where they spend their days. Maybe four or five miles. Maybe too much.
This means that they can only spend an hour at the hotel after leaving the ship. But then


aviary, Grant did not hesitate to leave the building again. Now they are doing much better
schedule.

"| I wonder how Ralph is doing," Lex said. "You could die or something."

"good morning."

"| I thought you'd let me take it." She loved lying under the sun. "It's great to run
Ralph.

Tim says to Grant, "Remember the Stegosaurus?"

"Whether."

Why are you asking them about stem cell DNA?

"It's for our health," Grant said. “They couldn’t explain why dinosaurs existed
Because they sing, and because they are all women.

"good."

"Well, radiation is dangerous and harmless. I hope it's safe."
shown here. But there’s still the problem of a dinosaur. How can they live
When will all the women come?

"Okay," Tim said.

"No, in all animals, a homosexual is a bad thing."

"Tim's so excited," Lex said.

None of them. “Basically, most animals take care of themselves,” Grant says.
If we can’t communicate. The male releases sperm containing
Leon, woman will kill next time. This change is not significant.
There are more physiological differences between men and women than you might think. People are
Women care more about the names of animals than people.

Tim shook his head. "What about the monsters?"

Grant hears a rustle in the trees above as the Micro-rtotopes disappear in a panic.
The leaves are moving. To the right the massive head of Tyransaurus emerges from a tree trunk.
Bags are used on board. Lex screamed in shock and Grant jumped to the side.
But this sea here is only ten meters deep. Tyrannosaurus trapped in a tree trunk
He turned his head and shouted. Then he shook his head.

In the bushes along the river, they saw a large black tree.
He heads south, looking for a spot in the trees along the coast. All services are
She walked to the other side, where she screamed, screamed, and jumped up and down. in
Raft, Grant, Timothy, and Lexus were on the battlefield when the Tyransaurus tried to attack again, but
There are many trees along the river. The tyrannosaur evolved again.
Back on the bathroom floor, he tried again, with threads flashing.

However, this was not always the case.

Then it went down. "am

I love it,” Leake said.

Grant sat on the boat, devastated. If you like Tyransaurus, you will
Nothing could save them. The river was calm and small.
ship. It was like I was in a cave. The rubber covers the sides like an anchor.
He was riding a wave.

He glanced at his watch. Nine almost. The ship went down.

"Hey," Lex said, "Listen!"

He heard a voice, amidst much noise. Screams came from outside.
Legally, down the river. He listened, and heard their words again.

"What's that?" Lex said.

"|I don't know," Grant said. "But there's more than one." He boarded the train
On the beach, he struck a light to set it. His voice trembles again. And they get even angrier.

"Like a cat cage," Tim said.


Malcolm shouted. Isn’t it Middle East time?
"Not yet," Ellie said.
Malcolm smiled. How much water do we have here?
"| I don't know. There's a lot of artificial water-"
"No, | I mean, how many? One?"


Eli raised his hand. "nothing."

"Go to the room on this floor," Malcolm said, "and fill the buckets yourself."

Ellie rolled her eyes.

"And," said Malcolm, "shall we have a fire? A spark? Aluminum? Aft fuses?"
Are they his descendants?”

"I'm looking for everything. Do you think it's a wall?"

"Of course," Malcolm said. The Malcolm effect represents a major shift.

“And Arnold says all systems are working.”

"That's it," Malcolm said.

Ellie said, “You don’t think much of Arnold, do you?

"So. The. Store. Uh so. You guys. Not
advice. Contents | Say 'thoughts'. That’s what they’re looking for right now. I think
It's small and it's called 'focusing'. He wasn’t alive. No
effect. That’s how you get a team like this. It comes from the right mindset. Because you
We cannot make an animal invisible. To escape. But they
Don't look at it.

Don't you think it's just human flesh? Ellie said.

"God no," Malcolm said. “That’s why we say coffee and saba in the morning are people.”
nature. It's not like that. It’s just Western culture, in most parts of the world.
I was just thinking about it." He rubbed his eyes in pain. "Morphine makes a philosopher."

Do you want water?

"No. I'll tell you the problem with engineers and scientists. There's an easier way
Bad news about how they want to know the truth about the country. Yes, but no
that separates them. Nobody approaches things as 'finding the truth'.

"Scientists are concerned. So they wonder if
Anyone can do it. He doesn’t stop to ask if something should be done. People are mean.
It should be noted that these numbers are not significant. If they don’t, someone else will. knowledge,
Dale, it’s not good. So they just wanted to do the first one. That’s what education is all about. Even pure science
Education is a problem. Building a strong and distributed workforce
A world beyond that. Particle accelerators heat the earth and remove exhaust gases. local
Throw food at the moon. There is still evidence that scientists are working there.
Research. Research is always part of that world. always.

"Scientists want this. They need to put their energy into it. They need to go
Their appearance. It just doesn’t look good. We don’t have to just glorify it. They simply cannot penetrate the body.
narrative. They have to do something incredible. It is the work of a scientist, and ​now
Some of their group want to become scientists.

Ellie said, "Don't wait for him to grow-."

What will one of your family members be doing a year from now?

"Yes, yes," he said.

Can’t you always imagine a world you don’t want?

"I don't."

"why not?"

He held out his hand. « No Money | mind...

"You have money to spend, but not to do it?"

"No, we're working in the wrong place..."

"It's just the wrong place," Malcolm said, shaking his head. "It's too bad. It's just the beginning of things. Just the beginning."
consequences . . . I give you experts who agree with that. they just need help and no problems.
and muscle and bone. That’s their way of fighting. It is based on education.
And the opposite happens.

"What's the answer?"

"Bring out wise men from among yourselves and appoint them."

"But then we'll destroy everything we've built-"

"What are you doing?" Malcolm said cheerfully. How many hours do women spend at home?
Not much has changed since the 1930s, despite all that has happened. vacuum cleaner, washer and dryer;
They pick up trash, take out trash, cleaning and clothes. .. Why is it taking so long to.
Is the city as clean as it was in the 1930s?


Ella didn't say anything.

"Because there was no plan," Malcolm said. "Yes." Thirty thousand years
As a caveman in Lascaux, he worked twelve hours a week.
They provide food, shelter, and clothing. The rest of the time they can play or
He sleeps and does everything. And they live in a world of clean air and clean water.
Beautiful trees and sunshine. Think about that. Twelve hours a week. Thirty thousand years ago.

Do you want to sit down? Ellie said.

"No," Malcolm said. "| I hope people wake up. It's been four hundred years
Science, and we all needed to hear it by now, is good and exciting. It’s time to
change."

Haven’t we destroyed the world? She said.

She took a deep breath and closed her eyes. "Oh my God," she said. "That's the end | I'm sorry."


In the darkness of the forest, Grant went from hand to hand, kicking branches and screaming.
The platform is moving forward. He still hears voices. And they end up seeing dinosaurs.

Aren’t they poisonous?

"Yes," Grant said. "Diluphosaurus."

Two dilophosphates are located at the mouth of the river. They threw spears longer than ten meters.
And red. Below, the birds have childlike forms. The first black-legged patient ran away.
The top of the head from the eyes to the nose forms a V shape of the head. bird-
As can be seen from their behaviour, they are encouraged to drink from the river and then go
Scream and fish.

Lex said in the message, "Should we go for a walk?"

Grant shook his head no. Dilophosaurs were smaller than the triazoles, and ​ smaller
He will hide among the trees by the river. And it looks like they play the same
They screamed and threw stones at each other.

"But we can't get them on the boat," Leake said. "He's poison."

"We have to do it," Grant said. "right."

Dilophosaurus were always drunk and aggressive. They seemed to be talking to each other.
Very nice and clean. The monster on the right is smiling, drinking, mouth closed
Her mouth opened and she screamed. The right-hand axis has
boot in response and begins absorbing the first image of the Beast. Afterwards
The relationship is reversed.

Grant noticed that the person on the right was shorter and had small ear piercings and a
Christian fled.

"I'm struggling," he said. "It's a bad idea." "can

Are we going to take them? Tim said.

"Not like now. They're in the ocean." Grant was well known for horses.
He did this kind of sex for hours a day. They went without eating anything and slept.
Nothing else. . . . He glanced at his watch. 29 .

What are we doing? Tim said.

Grant smiled. "|I don't know."

He put her on the ship, and ​the Dilpozors took her back;
bad. He looked up at the sky. Both animals know what’s going on.

"What's that?" Lex said.

Grant laughed, "I think we're getting a treat." Jump in the tub. "I want you
Two kids in kindergarten. We live in uncertain times. But remember: what
It happened, you didn't say anything, and you didn't encourage it- okay?

The ship begins to sail towards the Dilophosaurs. He has a soul. Lexi believes
Grant’s eyes were fixed on the water. He approached the Delphosaur.
They were still near the river. He then pulled out his rifle and looked around.

The boat is sailing and they smell something sweet, salty and sweet all at once.
schedule. It smells like that sweet perfume. The teeth of the Dilophosaurs were amazing. Five ships.
After an ordeal, Grant remains at peace. Dilophosaurs are just a few miles away,
And they talked about the trees by the river.


According to Grant, he was talking about the Tyransaurus. The tyrannosaur seeks revenge.
When the leaves are crushed, the animals dig their hooves into the mud. The ship goes
in front of them. The smell is horrible. The tyransaur roared, probably because it was a living creature.
But again. . .

chest.

The group continues. They were only a few feet from the edge of the cliff.
Below the dolphins.

Lexi smiled, "Oh, okay."

There was a faint noise from the ship outside. So the ship was going.
further. And they were going to the river. Tyransaurus roared one last time and flew off; a
Dilophosaur stared in shock and hissed. Another dilophosphate nodded.

The boat floated down the river.


Tyrannosaurus


The jeep is moving against the sun. Muldoon walked away, Genaro at his side. they
They were in a field, taking pictures of green grass and weeds.
And the breadth of the valley on the east side was 100 cubits. Upon arrival, Muldoon
car.

"Col, you're so cute," she said, stroking his cheek with the back of her hand. He drank the bottle.
The whiskey between his fingers, and ​he handed it to Gennaro.

Genaro shook his head. He saw the ground glisten in the morning dew. so
He looked at the ship's computer and the video projected on the screen. Television
It shows the layout of the park for the remote cameras. Grant and the children no longer know each other. either
Thermasaurus.

The radio crackled. "Mildred."

Muldoon picks up the phone. "Whether."

"Do you have a key? Do you have Rick. He's in 442 things. He's in 443."

“Just a few,” Muldoon said, turning off the TV. "Yes. I've got it now. Stay by the river."
The monster is running along the branches of the wall to the east.

"You're right. Just take it off."

“Don’t worry,” Muldoon said, looking up at the sun. "| It's not good."

"Remember," said Arnold, "Tyransaurus is the tourist attraction."

Muldoon turned off his radio with a chuckle. "Okay, Joel," she said. "They also talk
What about the singer." Muldoon smiled. "Let's go see Rexy and give her a shot."

The jib sinks into the mud.

"They've been waiting for this," Gennaro said.

"For a long time I wanted to put a bell on this great man," Muldoon said. "And there it is."

They came to a crossroads. Inside the furnace, Genaro suddenly notices the Tyrannosaurus.
He brought pine logs to the riverbank.

Muldoon dropped the bottle of whiskey and tossed it in the corner. He held out his hand.
tube. Gennaro watches the video, which shows their jeep and Tyransaur.
The camera should be in the middle of the tree somewhere below.

"You want to help," said Mildred, "might as well get these canteens out of your shoes."

Gennaro smiled and opened a case of Halliburton stainless steel. Posted below with
Movies. Four cylinders, each the size of a milk carton. All of them.
Its product is MORO709. He pulled one out.

"You put your head down and laugh," Muldoon explained.

Gennaro saw a plastic bomb with large holes, each the size of his finger. fluent
Shoot one of the canteens. At the other end of the spectrum is the hydraulic system.

"It's potatoes. It's about anger." Muldoon sat in front of her in a blanket.
feet. Made of black metal and shaped like a Janro, it looks like a bassooka or a whale
arrange.

What is Muru709?


"Small animals are active all over the world. You'll see 1,000 cc
Start with. Muldoon opened the box to free his hand.
He took the box and closed it.

"It should be," Muldoon said. "Cows give about two hundred cc, but they
Tyrannosaurus rex weighed only two to three tons each, compared to eight tons, and was very large. This is very important.
health.


"why?"

“The measurement is the difference between hardness and hardness.”
As an elephant, stallion or donkey, you rode an elephant, to be exact
statue. You put a reindeer to sleep, but it moves. And Richard has
Just lose yourself in the game. But on the other hand, you’re driving for more than five minutes.
car and died of adrenaline. Every problem is complex and complicated and complex.

Muldoon walked slowly across the river and close to the river. "But that's all
independent. She teaches a lot about animals because animals appreciate
It means animals - lions, tigers, hyenas, elephants. We don’t know much about the characters. and
Nobody knew anything about dinosaurs. The cannasaurus skeleton is a new species.

"Do you think about them then?" January said.

"No," Muldoon said, with a smile. "The dinosaurs never used any of the islands there." He turned and walked away.
You’re not stuck in marriage. “In fact, what we’ve learned is that dinosaurs evolved as animals during this period, as they do today.
Some religions are beautiful and sweet, while others are harsh and violent. Some of them look great and
Others don’t. Some of them are foolish and some are wise.

"How about the Raptors?" January said.

Muldoon shook his head. "Reindeer are smart, very smart. Trust me, they all have problems
I hope,” he said, “it doesn’t matter what we get when the retirees leave.
reading. Oh. | I think that’s as close as we can get to Rexy.

Ahead, Tyransaurus sticks its head between the trees, looking out over the river.
You tried to leave. The shooter walked a few feet across the ground to sit back down.

"What do you see here?" January said.

"It's easy to tell," said Mildred. “It could be associated with Microceratopsians.
Walk in their hands. They will be happy to eat.

Muldoon stops the Jeep about 50 yards from Tyranchore, and ​you drive off.
around. He freaked out and ran away. "Sit down on the couch," Mildred said. "And plan what you're going to do."
on." He picked up another can and tied it around his neck. Then he left.

Genaro jumped into the back of the car. How often have you done that?

cried Muldoon. "No. I always want to win. We'll see how it goes
He's coming." He walked ten yards to the jeep and parked it in a ditch
knee. He lowered the large knife and took a deep breath.
Muldoon wanted the Tyrannosaurus, which he had never seen before.

A black gas exploded and Genaro saw a white trail in the sky behind him.
Thermasaurus. But it doesn't matter.

The Tyransaurus leaned back slowly on his knees to face them. He shook his head from side to side.
On the one hand, a single eye seems to be watching them.

Muldoon grabbed the trigger and pressed the second button.

Did you hit him? January said.

Mildred shook her head. "He said. Laser light... Make sure you have some batteries in the pack."

"in?" January said.

“It’s a battery,” Muldoon said. "Bigger than his body. Scar marks."

Gennaro pulled away and looked at the weapon. He could hear the Jeep revving and hear his heartbeat.
often. I can’t find the battery. yelled Tyrancer. For Gennaro, it was a challenge.
The sound coming from the monster's tail echoed across the floor. fluent
He stood up, reached for the table, and put his hand on the glass handle. In radio,
I heard a voice say, "Muddie. It's Arnold. Get out of here. Go."

"|You know how I work," Myrtle said. What is

Tyransaurus paused.


Mildred is stunned. Although the tree swings slowly and slides in
He raised his wand, spoke, and held it. Once, Genaro saw a puff of smoke, and it was white.
The conversation turns to the animal.

Nothing happened. The tyrannosaur continues to attack.

Now Meade was up and running, shouting, "Go! Go!" Genaro took the bag.
And Muldoon walked out the front door as the Jeep pulled up in front of him. Transocerus
Closing it quickly, Muldoon opened the door and stepped inside.

"Go, cry! Go!"

Gennaro smiled. The jeep stopped to the left, and for a while they only saw
He jumps in the air, then falls to the ground, running forward
further. Genaro walked along the wall to the left until he saw a mirror.
The tyrannosaur took one last sigh and fell asleep.

Gennaro started the car. "Jesus."

Mildred shook her head. "I can tell you | I'll kill you again."

"I mean, you've thought about it," Jannard said.

"They must break the horn before they can give him the horn."

"You said, don't stop."

"Yes," said Mildred. He was happy. "|Jenny. The battery died in the laser beam.
confused. | He should have seen it when he left yesterday. We will be back to get more
Canister.”

The jeep heads west towards the hotel. Muldoon grabbed the radio. "ride."

"Yes," Arnold said.

"Let's go back to basics."


The river is now calm and flowing. The boat is going fast. I was
It started out as a pleasant walk in the park.

"Uh!" Lex yelled, turning around. "Hurry up, quickly!"

He looked Grant in the eye. The river is small and narrow, but you can see far
Then he reached the top of the tree, and there was sunlight and a distant voice. fluent
It seems to boil down to two things. . . .

The boat is going fast. extend

He grabbed the bag.

"What's that?"

"You're tired," Grant said.

The ship emerged from the darkness into the morning sun and floated.
He was walking in the direction of the river. They had music in their ears. extend
And he struck the ship with all his might, but he could not. fluent
He walked to the door.

Lex turned around. I'm not walking well! Grant noticed that the waitress was missing.
But there was nothing that could be done; They reached the door with a flash of light, and
The roar of water filled the area. Grant steered his boat into the water.
Black and white, your mouth; The rubber bottle floats in water, but it doesn’t sink.
Grant stood on the beach, looked to the side and saw a hole about 50 feet deep.
With water.

And he was standing in the kitchen waiting for a king.

Lex screams in terror and the ship flips over and falls to the bottom and she escapes
They flew through the wind and the waves and landed sick. Grant threw his hands in the air and
Everyone else in the world is stupid and doesn't understand anything.


He thinks for a moment, and ​he has time to look at Lex in his orange shoes.
they fell before him; He had time to see Tim, to see the world; He has time.
Look at the clear water flowing; I took the opportunity to see the wall below.
He bowed slightly, and there was a moment of silence around him.

Then, by accident, Grant plunged into the cold, boiling water.
He exclaimed, surprised to see Tyranxhor's footsteps walking in front of him.
It fell into the water and then came out of the river. Grant jumped into the water and was rescued from the fire.


The stones, he said, caught hold of a tree branch and lodged themselves in his trunk. windy.
He sits up and on the rock, looking down at the river just in time to see water.
The kitchen is working. Then he saw Tim, fighting against the water, and covered a
He nodded and walked into the next bathroom.

Grant comes out of the water and pulls the Tyransaurus head off.
the water was under his feet. The main head enlarges and fills both sides with fluid. heart
Something between her legs.

And the sky was open again. Lex’s personality is green Lex.
congratulations.


Moments later, Lex appeared next to the dinosaur trail. He was lying on the ground.
water, the neck muscle. Grant landed on his back in the water.
He was a stream. A moment later, he sat down on the rock.
Being heavy is not life. His eyes were wide open. He sucked it into his mouth.

Grant shook his head and went to the door, but didn't make any progress. Then he pulled his hand away.
White water and snake heads. He rolled his eyes. "Thank you," she said. He smiled a little. "We do
fluent."

Tim started to cry. He hugged her again. Are you going? What are you crying about?

"why."

"We love you guys," Grant said. Small white pebbles float down from the river.
The Tyransaurus gives you some flowers. However, he turned away from them and looked at the river. but
The animals were always moving and moving. . . . Come on children, he said.

"Where are we going?" Lexi wants to help.

"series." He was looking for a place to hide. All he sees is the forest along the river.
It does not provide security. In the river were the dinosaurs. Then Grant saw a dirt road along the river. fluent
It was like going underwater.

And he’s a white guy, who doesn’t have money. And they went out on the road.

The tyrannosaur stands up, growls, and glares at the ceiling. fluent
Somehow they feel left out.

They were lying on the ground. Grant and the children hid in tall trees nearby
on the ships. and scattered them in the land of the south. "Where are we going?" Lex said. "go
back."

"|I know."

They were now near the shore, and they were making a lot of noise. The stones became stars.
The dirt road. There is always a risk. It's like walking on a cloud. way
It looked like it had gone underwater, but when they got closer, they saw that
And he went down into the water.

The tyrannosaur could still see the water, even with its eyes scanning them. goes.
road to the falls, and ​was near the top of the falls when Grant arrived
Song of the Tyrant. So she’s underwater, and ​Grant can’t see her.
of silver.

Grant looked over his shoulder suspiciously. There is a shed here, no bigger than the garage, and
It’s full of parts: little pumps, big filters, needles. Everything is calm and peaceful.

"we?" Lex said. He must have screamed when he heard the rain coming down. "where are you
we? What is this place? we?

"It's just a matter of time," Grant said. Protects weapons. Seriously, this is a pretty impressive car.
And there are probably running lights, so there might as well be a phone to talk to.
That goes for your filters and pipes.

"What are you doing?" Lexi yelled.

"I'm looking for a phone." It was almost 10:00 now and it had only been an hour.
It took an hour for the train to descend.

They spotted a metal door called MAINT 04 and closed it.
Next to it was a security card. Next to the door, he saw a piece of metal wood. fluent
The drawers are open, with only keys and watches inside. There was no telephone.
And nothing but an open door.


He almost threw the baby against the door. And when he had opened it, behold, there was a statue with three skins;
It is surrounded by black stripes. But that seems like a way to close the door, and ​​the
Suppose the phone is at the other end. The blades are made of steel.
Number 1023. He leaned over it.

Startled, the door opened. The darkness is supported by thick wires.
Below we see the VEHICLE MAIN CHARGER 04/22 highlighted in red
Go upstairs. Maybe he thought the car was still there? "It's okay, baby."

"You're right," Lex said. "I'm not coming in here."

"Come on, Lex," Tim said.

"You're right," Lex said. "There was no fire or anything. I didn't go."

“It’s okay,” Grant said. There was no time to talk. "Stay here, I'll be right back."

"Where are you going?" Lex said nervously.

Grant came to the door. He let out a sigh and closed the door.
afternoon.

Grant was completely in the dark. After some hesitation, he went to the door and
His body was so hot. No box, no line. He sat on either side of the wall.
The door, the switch, the ignition key, everything.

There was nothing.

Fighting the pressure, his hand wrapped around a black metal cylinder. He held out his hand.
On one side of the fork is a pond. . . It was dark, and the bell was there.
weird. He checked the door, but saw it wasn't open. should be
Let the children open it. so . . .

It starts with the leaves. They dry their hands and cover them in mud,” says Janet.
As he stepped out onto the roof, he heard a crash and then the clanging of nails on concrete. fluent
He drew his gun and stepped forward.

His feet dragged him closer to the wall, and ​as the light faded, a strange light shone from behind him.
And, suddenly, he saw it: it was a car! An electric car that looks like a race car and looks amazing
It’s a long stretch that goes on for miles. A green light came on in the driver’s seat.
A car, however, can be quite expensive.

Grant heard the noise again, and ​he turned to see something black coming up behind him.
He’s torn, the relationship is broken, and  Grant doesn’t know where to turn. Banga loves it.
He throws it to the ground and gasps in shock, then BANG.
She didn't wake up, and he was sitting up when she saw him.

It was a Velociraptor, but it was smaller than a year old. It may be two meters long, or it may be two meters wide.
A tall, strong, heavy-breathing dog, with a downward sloping tail.
jaw. Maybe too much space and Grant pulls the trigger.
brief. Velliciraptor stares with its eyes glowing slightly.

Grant remembers very different things he learned about this animal.
And the elders of the synagogue were afraid. The man shook his head.
velociraptor, I think you’ll agree. He looked down at his stomach, which was trembling a bit like
Sedation was administered. And he saw that it was a man.

Young, young and gay. There was no question about it. You’re cycling
He was in the woods.

Furious, he rushed to the door. In his light, he gave
It's a big, beautiful door, and ​ it's hinged. They go together.
At the door, he suddenly realized that it was locked and could not be opened without
Children are very smart and can communicate with him. He could hear them from the other side.
believe.


"Dr. Grant!" Lex sighed and slammed the door shut. "Dr. Grant!"

"You're right," Tim said. "He'll be back."

"But where did he go?"

“Listen, Dr. Grant knew what he was doing,” Tim said. "He'll be back in a minute."

"He should be back by now," Lex said. He covered it with his lips and smiled.
wide. He crossed his legs angrily.

And, loud, the waves rose out of the water to meet them.


Tim looked shocked and his mouth dropped open. Lexi screams and jumps.
land. The head turns back and forth, then back again. But Tim sees darkness.
And the head of the beast sat upon the grass.

He took Lex for a parade and when he got back on his feet, he screamed, loudly.
It went in and out of our mouths quickly. Water drips from the top. Then he went
further.

Lex walked up to Tim and hugged him. "|I really like it," she said. He was shocked, and so were the others.
It was only a few feet away, and machines were surrounding it. There was nowhere to hide.

Her head was in the water again, but gently this time, her lips relaxed.
land. Tyransaurus snapped his fingers as he let out a deep breath. But there is fruit
Water in the tank.

Tim thought: He can’t see me. He knows we’re here, but he can’t see underwater.

The tyrant snorted.

What am I doing? Lex said again.

"Chch."

With a small sigh, her lips parted and he brought her into his mouth. It’s really nice and green.
Black, with a small dot in the middle. About four feet tall.
The high walls of the house. The slurry was then transferred to filter cylinders. Tim and
Lex smokes.

His mouth moves left, right, flicking the fly.
He wrapped his head around the bells and whistles and put it on. Tim noticed he had hair on his neck.
A gauze-like appearance.
It was wrapped around Lex's waist.

"Eeww," Leak said.

His mouth was open. He turned around and stood like a snake, his body on one side.

"Don't laugh," Tim said.

. .. face to face, then back to Tim and then shaking his head. Tim
He closed his eyes when a bit of his face caught his eye. It was hot and humid and felt like
setting.

He kneels in front of her, his mouth kissing her.

"Timmy…."

Tim couldn't answer; His mouth was full of red teeth. He could look into it, but
I couldn’t speak. Lex took her hand.

"Come on, Timmy!"

His mouth pulled back. He felt a wetness on his face.
Lex takes him, but he can't handle the force that's holding him back. Tim allowed it.
He bowed his head with both hands on his head. He can't get rid of it.
He put his hands on the ground, but leaned forward.

Lex put his hands on his hips and walked backwards, yelling at him, but he
He couldn't do anything. He began to notice something. There was a kind of silence.
He felt an incredible sense of relief when she left.

Timmy?

And they spit in his mouth, and released him. Tim felt his eyes go dark. body.
He ended up with his nose white and his mouth falling to the floor. setting;
He smirked, as he opened his mouth. The blood turned red and mixed with dirt. What is
The nose is very sensitive.

What am I doing? Lexi yelled.

And slowly, slowly, the leader began to rise through the shadows to leave.
Deep in the mud. And then it ends and they only see money
A spiritual rainbow.


ride
"It's OK," Arnold said in court. "Rex is downstairs." He leaned back in his chair and


He smiles, puts down his cigarette, and takes a deep drag. Here’s what happened: it was finally time to
park is back in full swing. Now they just have to go out and get it.


“Countryman,” Muldoon said, watching his television. "| I'm making it the last of everything." He rolled his eyes.
January. "It took about an hour to dry."

Henry Wu reviewed the photograph. "But you can swim there…."

"He doesn't play," Mauldin said. "I have never seen an animal so strong as to kill it."

“|I think we should go do it,” Arnold said, “Ourselves.

It's going to happen," Muldoon said. He wasn't very strong.

"He's a good dog."

"|I know you're a special kid," Myrtle said.

Arnold was furious with Gennard. He couldn’t wait a minute. "I'll show you," he said.
He said: "The park is back to normal. Anyway, Malcolm
It will happen. We are still in control.

Genaro looked in the direction of Arnold's head, "What is that?"

Arnold sighed. Here’s the source code, at the bottom right of the page. eventually
empty. Arnold was surprised to see that it was now flashing red: AUX PWR LOW. conference
For a moment, he didn’t understand. Why is it necessary to improve the strength of the reinforcement? And they walked on the highway.
Experience, not supported by knowledge, was thought to be suitable for a supporting role.
Power, you can check the fuel level or charge the battery. ...

“Henry,” Arnold told Wu. "Look at this."

Wu said, “Why are you leaving the store?

No, said Arnold. "Who is."

"|I can't."

“You’re going to find a board,” Wu said. The trend has been to maintain momentum over the past few years.
hour.

Arnold hit a button and they heard the click of a printer on the floor. Wu walked towards him.

Arnold looked at the television. The box now changes to red and yellow, and the word
Now read: AUX PWR FAIL, the number starts with an asterisk.

"What's going on?" Arnold said.


Reluctantly, Tim walked a few steps down the dirt path into the sun. Look
And he looked upon the river, and saw the land beyond it.

"|I thought he was dead," Lex said.

Tim saw nothing: the dinosaur's tail was still moving, and one arm was flailing.
spasm. But there was something about it. So Tim is the white circle on the bottom.
on his head, to pluck his ears.

"He was stabbed," Tim said.

"Yes," Leake said. "ate."

Tim looks at her, confused. He was angry because he didn’t expect to see such a huge creature.
That's how it is. He doesn't want to die. "It's not his fault," she said.

"Oh sure," Leak said. "He ate me, it's not his fault."

"He's a foodie. He's doing what he's always done."

"You wouldn't say that," Lex said, "if you were inside her right now."

Then the sound of the water changed. Slowly, it became calm and peaceful. What is
And the waters came down into heaven, and became a river. .

And he stood up.

"Tim. The water's gone," Leak said.

It breaks apart like sweet potatoes. Coastal areas
There is water. They were standing near the top of a field full of tomatoes.
See below.

"The water doesn't have to be cold," Lex said.

Tim shook his head. "There must be energy ... someone is losing energy." In front of them,
All the pumps and filters shut off each other, the power goes out and
The train stopped.

And then came a solo, and ​it was played at the door of MAINT 04 .
It opened immediately.


Grant walked out, held his face in the light, and ​said, “Good job, boys. Watch the door”.
“We didn’t do anything,” Leake said. "write

it’s over,” Tim said.

"It's not good," Grant said. "Come see what I'm wearing."


Arnold looked at him suspiciously.

Eventually, the screens went black, then the lights dimmed and
In the company in darkness and darkness. Everyone started crying together. Mauldin is.
The blind give way to the light, and ​Woo comes to write.

"Look at him," Wu said.


Time Description [Code]
05:12:44 Security | Open Project [AV12]
05:12:45 Validation 2 enabled [AV12].
05:12:46 Security 3 Basic Security [AV12].
05:12:51 Anti-Violence Order [-AVO].
05:13:48 Review [-AVO}
05:13:55 Security 1 Online [-AVO}
05:13:57 View 2 in view [-AVO].
[05:13:59] Security 3 in [-AVO}
05:14:08 Linear Trace - X Power [-AV1]
05:14:18 Control Performance - Baseline Power [-AV04]
05:14:19 Safety - Versatility - Signal Capability [-AV05]
05:14:22 King of the Rings - The Power of Walking [-AV06]

05:14:24 Laboratory - Big Detector - Recall Power [-AV08]
[-AV09] 05:14:29 TelecomWeb Opera - Active Power [-AV09]

05:14:32 The Big Test - Strong Power [-AV09]

05:14:37 Perform Service - Enter Power [-AV09].
05:14:44 Control Panel Computer Panel - Power Monitoring [-AV09]
05:14:57 REFERENCES: Jungle Guide [NB] Server - High Power [-AV09]
09:11:37 NOTE: fuel injection (20%) operation - fuel injection [-AVZZ].
09:33:19 KEY POINT: Gas from Leakage (10%) Operation - Leakage Velocity [-AVZ1]
09:53:19 Default: High (1%) High - High [-AVZ2].

09:53:39 Correct: No oil (0%) [-AVO]


“We were arrested at 5 a.m.,” says Wu, “the day the arrest began.
It starts with empowering stakeholders.

"Jesus," Arnold said. The force at the front was not built from the war. When he gave
He insisted, only Japanese help would come. Arnold thought it was funny when
He was compassionate and knew this was okay. That’s what needs to happen. is
First: The electronic steering wheel is offered first;
Because it takes a strong king to lead a great power. thus
It’s over.

But Arnold had no time to compose himself. and when we see and .
The screens in the control room lit up and you never knew the power supply was down.
they replied.

But no, and ​every time since then, when I was looking for Rex and going
The thing is, the park is in terrible shape. And it wasn’t pretty
advice. Of course, the rate started to rise.

What does this word mean? Muldoon said, looking at the paper.


05:14:57 REFERENCES: Jungle Guide [NB] Server - High Power [-AV09]


“That means the status of the surveillance system is sent to the controllers in the control room,” Arnold said.
"About the birds."

"Have you seen the detective?"

Arnold shook his head, "No."
Look.

What do you mean, alert: emergency situation'?

« Well, | I didn't know it at the time, but we had a great relationship," Arnold said. "And
This means that it doesn’t produce enough energy to satisfy its fans, so
He was falling on his own.

Mildred rolled her eyes. "Is it scratching the wall?"


"Whether. "

"What about the Velociraptor ships?"

Arnold smiled. "Whether."

“Christ Jesus,” Muldoon said. "Five hours. These monsters can fly."

Then, in the distance they heard a roar. Mildred began to speak loudly.
fast. He goes through the house picking up radios that he can carry.

"Lord Arnold goes to the engine room to turn on the gas. With the help of Dr. Wu To
hell. Only you can use computers. Goodbye, Mr. Hammond.
Manic. Don't run to me. Go now. Close the windows and stay near them until you hear the
I. This helped Arnold overcome his anxiety. " Janard shouted. "You could get yourself in trouble
further?"

"Not really," Genaro said. It’s very crowded.

"Okay." Then you and the others can go home. Mildred is stunned. "That's all." Today
walk. "

“What are you going to do with my cows?” cried Hamon.

“It’s not a serious question, Mr. Hammond,” Muldoon said. "The question is what
Will it be you?

He walked through the door and down the hall to his office. Genaro bowed.
across. "Has he changed his mind?" cried Muldoon.

"We need help," Gennard said.

"I'm fine." Muldoon walked into the building next to Animal Control and took out his bag.
The space launcher, and ​opened a panel on the right side of his desk. It had six cylinders.
and the sixth canteen.

“The thing about these wines,” Muldon says, “is that they’re amazing.
assessment. They don't die easily even if they leave their heads. And they stood fast; It’s very important.
Dig a hole in the dicey heart, and ​it’s hard to lose fingers and toes. smooth
They are rotten, and ​​they will soon die." The cylinders behind him broke open and fell into the
Cantor. He fought in Genord. "Listen."

Gennaro took the key and Muldoon handed him the key. "All we can hope for is
and he puts them down. Unfortunately, we only have six birds here. This includes eight episodes
A city of flowers. going to. Stay by your side. Your wife is right.”

Muldoon stepped out and walked over the railing, looking at the wall across the way.
which leads to injustice. Gennaro smiled beside her. And the walls.
At the glass door, Muddy stood.

Arnold remained in the program. Three men approached.
Arnold took a whip, threw them, and screamed. The officials show up
They were all nearby, one sitting in the middle and two others watching from the side. developed.
smooth. Gennaro sighed.

What his body looks like.

Muldoon had watched him, with the inspector hovering at his heels. "Get lost," he said.
Genaro kills the creature in the back. There is a gap. nothing
done. "Col, you'll get it later," Mildred said, leaning down the hatch to grab the bag.


Gennaro’s hand. Genaro was reinstated. Deputies yelled at Arnold after the animal was shot.
In his hands.
Schools provided masks. The rest of his body fell to the ground, his legs
She screamed into the air, kicking her ass.

“You give it to them,” Muldoon said.

Arnold walked through the office door. The Velostrators returned and started
Mullin and Genaro. They turned as they approached. A remote area, near
In the living room, he heard a loud bang.

"That could be a problem," Genaro said. "Donny," Mildred said.


Henry Wu heard a knock and knocked on the door of the palace. He pulled it out.
in front of the consoles, and stood up. He wanted to go, but he knew he had to stay home.
If Arnold can regain his strength - even if just for a minute - then Wu can regain his own.
Generator.

He should have stayed home.

He heard someone shouting. That’s what Mildred says.


Muldoon felt a sharp pain in his chest and fell to the ground.
run. Looking behind him, he saw Genaro walking the other way up the hill. The leaders
It does not belong to the Genera, but is represented by Muldon. They have now reached more than 20 feet.
Muldoon shouted hysterically as he jumped, wondering what was going to happen next.
go. They know they have ten seconds to find it.

Ten seconds. bridge

quite.


Ellie has to help Malcolm up while Harding takes the needle and administers the morphine. Malcolm
He was stumbling and falling. Every minute is getting better. In radio,
He heard a noise.

Hammond came into the room and said, "How are you doing?"

"It's no good," Harold said. "It's a little sad."

"It was nothing like that," Malcolm said. "|I'm so white." Turn on the radio. "fluent
I feel like a warrior.

"The answers are endless," Hammond said.

"They did," Malcolm said with a slight smile. How can this be achieved?

"It's pretty stealthy. Arnold didn't know there was a reinforcement and ships."
Get it.

"Are they?"

"Go to hell, thief-."

« If | You remember,” said Malcolm, “I said the dark walls didn’t look good.”

Hammond took a deep breath and sat up. "It's all very well," he said with a nod. "should
We do not escape the fact that the argument here considered is the least of the errors.
This is a simple concept. My friends are | Many years ago it was proposed that it was possible to clone
DNA from extinct animals and their offspring. It was a good idea for us.
Time Travel-Just time travel in space. Bring them back alive. and will be
It was so good, and since we could, we decided to go. We learned this lesson and
We went. Everything is the same."

"cotton?" Malcolm said. Somehow she found the strength to stay in bed. "Easy? You
He’s a bigger guy than you think. and | He thought I was crazy.

- Dr. Malcolm, Ellie said, wanted to smile. But Malcolm didn’t care.
He looked at the radio, the switches, and the buttons.

What does that mean, what’s going on here? She said. "It's easy. It's easy. I'll do it again
Proof of life, for those of you who don’t know. Dr Wu doesn’t know.
In practice, I don’t worry about things like product names;
Something like this. They can do so much in such a short amount of time, you never know what
They do, however, expect to know you because you created them, so
in; Forget about living, sentient beings who can


Don’t ask them, forget what little you know about them, no
Make your word easy.... God. . ."

He thought he was paying.

"Do you know how powerful the mind is?" Malcolm said. “It’s an interesting thing that’s happening.
And you know, guys. They don’t fall.”

What is he talking about? Hammond said.

Harding made a face, as if to say he was annoyed. Malcolm looked up.

"| He's telling you | what I'm talking about," he said. “Some things take a lot.
Whoever wants power gets it. There is the importance of education, which for many people
anniversary. The energy you need. The CEO of the company. A black man in the film. Spirituality
teacher. You have to put time, effort, and energy into something you’ve decided to do. You have to do it.
It’s too much to take. It must be important to you. And if you lose it, it’s yours.
pressure. Tip: It’s your choice. This is a reward for your leadership.

“Now, the beauty of this is when someone
He could shoot with his bare hands, and he also learned to shoot with a sword.
That’s how this system started. Strength training changes you in this way.
that you didn’t do him any favors.

"But the power of perception is like a missing piece: You find it even without training. You read what others say."
Do it, and you can do the next thing. You can do it as you go. You can do a lot of things.
fast. No kingdom lasts for many years. There are no rules: the old schools are bad.
There are no location problems, just a previous inversion.
philosophy. Cheating, cheating, cheating - it's not good. You, or your friends. I don't understand
You’re struggling. No one belongs to anyone. Everyone wants to do the same thing: get something done.
Yes, and do it quickly.

"And by targeting superstars, you can do anything
brief. You don't know what you're doing, but now you say:
You took the cup and bought it. And the leadership of people is not that important. Student Review
It buys energy like anything else. The customer doesn’t see anything.
Maybe you should.

You know what it says? Hammond said. reach

He shook his head.

"|I don't know," Hammond said.

"I will," Malcolm said. "A karate master would never kill with his hands."
he did not kill him in his anger. A murderer does not murder.
Lead, don’t follow, ​and that was strong on Saturday night.
And it is this invisible force that attracts and attracts science. And so you think
It’s not easy to build a house like this.

“It’s great,” Hammond said.

"Then why are you acting like a fool?"


Shocked by the scene, John Arnold opened the door to the utility room and entered.
The darkness within. Jesus, they’re red. He should have known the light would go out. he thought.
Problem, spaceships, going two floors below, one needs
Take the ring. He must push or fall.

hiking.

He just blinked like a fool until he realized it was useless. As such, he had to find his light
At the bottom, go back to the door and open the four chests. It lets in a lot of light. but
There was no way to close the door. Then he quickly took off his shoes and opened the door.

Going to the bathroom seemed easy. He climbed into the metal cylinder and listened.
The next moment, one is louder, the next it’s quieter, but he still sees the light. appearance
A ladder can be used for airplanes. Ten beds.

black.

The lights went out.

Arold looked at the portal and saw that the shadows had engulfed the Velociraptor's body.
The cat laughed and kicked its paws vigorously.


Henry Wu walked over. He pointed to their computer terminals. He clings to the screens. fluent
Still smiling. He felt nervous.

Here’s a story of what he did. It has to be worth it. The first screen will be displayed, and
taken-

"Uh!" The radio crackled.

He caught her. "Yeah. I'm here."

"Is blood powerful?" It’s Muldoon. There was something wrong with his voice.
Something down.

"No," Wu said. He smiled, glad to hear Meade was alive.

"|remember, Arnold came into the kitchen," said Mildred- "Later, I don't remember."

"where are you?" Wu said.

"I'm done."

"in?"

"It gets into the bloodstream," Mildred said. "And now I'm happy."


Muldoon thought it was like a heat wave. There are many holes in the water.
He passed the passenger, then drove to the right of the field and landed
Activists. The subway tunnels are too heavy for him, but he can’t walk under them.

Sometimes, when he put his foot on one when there was a bad strike near the nail.
cried Tortoise, the others answering now. That’s the only excuse
He didn't bother to check the needle at the end of the tube before pressing the button.

But he probably still got the job because three or four people were outside screaming and
he called closer.

“Yeah, great,” he radioed.

Wu said, "Does Arnold have a radio?"

"You can't think about that," Muldoon said. "Just come in. See."

He didn't know what the other end of the pipe looked like - it was so dark - and .
I don’t see it now. It is written. All he could do was wait for the last straw to be removed. Jesus,
He didn't like being caught by one of the thugs.


Arnold followed him downstairs. The Velostrator was only ten feet long, and it was heavy.
His eyes darted around in the darkness. Arnold felt his fingers tickling the metal.

But it’s sweet. I know the horse could have been better, but Polish Grill
The familiar mechanical smell made him shiver. This observation was correct for Arnold.
thought. It can climb walls, even the floor. . .

Because he was sure the judge couldn't just walk away. It’s not small, it’s complicated.
ladder.

Arnold looked over his shoulder. The bridge was only a few feet high. Another page. . .

That was it! When he arrived, he remembered the ramp and began to climb closer to the ground.
Leaves. The logs are anchored in the concrete blocks. 20 feet up, Rapport screams in pain.
Bath.

"It doesn't matter, buddy," Arnold said. He was very surprised. He was very close to the current assistant.
Generator. Just a little bit, even in this light. . . .

There was a cut on his leg. Arnold

His wife changed.

Retort stood on the concrete walkway, staring at him. fluent

They crawl on the ground.

She frantically reaches for a gun, but accidentally shoots him in the head.
concrete. Something hard pressed against his throat and he couldn't breathe.
When he saw the person standing over him, he grabbed his wrist as it ran down his body.
His mouth, sucking in foul air from his nostrils, fell open.
The door opened.


Ellie held the radio in her hand and listened. Two other Tikan employees arrived at the hotel.
It was like they knew they were safe here. But no one else makes it through the weekend. and
A small one at the bottom. Over the radio, Muldoon said, "How long has it been?"


"Four fifteen minutes," Wu said.

"Arnold must do it now," said Mildred. "Okay. Do you have an idea?"
"No," Wu said.

Have we heard of Gennaro?

Genaro pressed the button. "I'm here."

"where are you?" Mildred said.

“I went to the emergency room,” Gennard said. "Give me some time."


Gennaro leaned his head against the wall and listened.

Upstairs, he saw a hallway leading to the living room. January knew
There is some furniture somewhere to the east. He heard birds chirping in the trees. is
There was a chill in the air. A solution is crying out, but it’s a long way off. His voice trembled.
body. Genaro started, went off the road and fell to the ground.

Do you want to live in poverty? I don't

really.

The truth is, he didn’t. But Gennaro thought he had a point or an opportunity to
business. If you live in a house on the east side of town, you might be able to save on repairs.
He left after that. All the fish were good near the other houses on the east side. there
There were no houses in their forest.

At least, he hoped not.

He took all the barriers off and knew he played hard. weird.
He paused, feeling his heart beat faster. Here the difference is small; It didn’t work.
Six or seven feet up. She began to worry that they would never be there again.
All floors in the building. But then he saw a house on the right at the top of the bridge.

He was getting closer and closer. He found a door, opened it and went inside. fluent
It was very dark. It fell into something.

Personal shoes.

Gennaro rolled his eyes. He opened the door and led her downstairs. fluent
And he saw a man walking in front of him. He realized he didn’t know where to go. so
He left his radio.

damn!

The radio can be placed anywhere in the kitchen. Or do I just think
Generator. He knew what fire meant. Probably somewhere under
below. He saw a fish fall.

It was so dark it was hard to see anything. He felt the gap between the walls.
He catches his step to avoid hitting his head.

He heard the horn blow and calmed down. He listened, but heard nothing. shift.
Proceed with caution. Something ran down his shoulder and into his left arm. It burns like water.
Kept in the dark.

Gifts. He was breathing. bold.

He looked up at the sky. The raptor perched on the branch, just a few inches above his head. There was blood.
He got out of bed. She thought she was being bullied. And then
He started to run, but the weight fell on his shoulders and he fell to the ground.

Gennaro got the speed, got up, hit the ball, walked.
concrete. When he woke up, he saw the dog sitting next to him looking very sad.

Yes, it hurts. His feet were hurting for some reason.

death

Gennaro bent down, looking for the weapon. A journalist is always happy.
concrete. He's looking for something to use as a weapon. When it changed
Then, there’s the raptor.

He shouted, making his call in the darkness.

Genaro spun around in a circle, feeling hands reaching for him. And then he heard something strange.
Pain in left side.

finish.

It will destroy.


The man shot himself in the head and Donald Gennaro slipped and fell.


Malcolm was lying in bed, relaxing, listening to the radio. "nothing?" Mildred said.
"Do you have anything?"

"There are no words," Wu said. "hell,"

"He was," said Mildred.

withdraw.

Malcolm smiled. "I can't wait," he said, "to hear about your new plans."

"Our goal," Muldoon said, "is for everyone to go home and get back to normal. But it's not.
Look at the road.”

“There was a jeep outside the church,” Wu said. "If | runs away from you, you can catch
In your body?”

"Fine. But you don't belong in that area."

"There's nothing I can do here."

"God knows it's true," said Malcolm. "A house without electricity is not a problem
Government building.

"Okay," said Mildred. "Let's see. This sucks."

As he sits up in bed, Malcolm says, "No, it's nothing. It looks like an accident."

Wu said, "The ball is coming to us."

“We’re still a work in progress,” Malik said. "going to."

The radio crackled. Malcolm closed his eyes and exhaled slowly as he regained his strength.

"Just imagine," Ellis said. "Just keep it simple."

“You really know what we’re talking about here,” Malik said. “To see all this….”
We’re talking about five hundred years of Western thought. Then they started.
At the time Florence, Italy was the world’s largest . Scientific Theory - Ta
There’s a new way of looking at reality, it’s okay if you don’t like it.
Or your hometown, he thought, an idea that was new and exciting at the time. fluent .
Hopes and expectations for the future;
10 years. Politics, Religion, and Violence in History
It’s about science. But, in reality, that’s because old castles don’t work.
It will not work in our bodies, it will not work in our hearts, and it will not work in the new world
They do.

Malcolm sighed.

"But now," he said, "science is an age-old thing. And still."
After the Middle Ages, science began to grapple with nature. Science has
It became so fast that it seemed impossible. Maybe through science.
Millions of us live in a crowded, interconnected little world. But science sucks
Help us decide what in the world to do or how to live. Science can build a nuclear power plant, but
He doesn’t tell us to separate. Science can create medicines, but it cannot tell us to use them. and
Our planet is starting to run out of many key resources: air, water, and soil, as
He knows he shouldn't." She smiled. "That's enough for everyone."

There was silence. Malcolm closed his eyes, his heart pounding. No one spoke.
It was as if Malcolm was asleep. Then he stopped again, under the tree.

"At the same time, there is a growing interest in education. What
The discoveries of Newton and Dickett proved the theory of attraction. Science has
He first seeks the power to control everything through his doctrine of cosmic law. but
In the 20th century, this became an unresolved problem. First, Heisenberg
His uncertainty theory is central to what we can learn from the fine granular world. Oh, so, we
State. None of us live on a planet without an atmosphere. It doesn’t matter how
in our lives. Then the G"del key picks up the number in the correct word.
wisdom. Mathematicians believed that there was a fundamental truth in their arguments.
derived from traditional rules. We now know that what we call 'knowledge' is just an idea.
play. It’s not what you think.

"And now chaos theory says that chaos is at work in our daily lives. It shows that the universe
Like the water is indescribable. So the great philosopher of the past -
The dream of a popular government is dead, at least in our century. And with that much work, he thinks.


Let science do what it does. And let's listen. The science always says no
Now you know everything, but later you will understand. But now we know that's not true. And thank you.
Like an engineer, and ​ like a little kid jumping off a building because he believes he can
treat."

"This is important," Hammond noted.

"We are looking at the end of the days of education. Education, like other traditional disciplines, is
He smiles. If the energy is no longer significant, it indicates that the energy cannot be maintained. why
Everything is great right now. Fifty years ago, everyone was in the atomic bomb. What is
health. No one can say that. However, it was only about a decade after the bombing that it began.
To get the power of arithmetic. Thermal energy is much more powerful than nuclear energy. and in 2019.
All hands. It will be on the tree they harvested. presentation for students. expensive
laboratories of terrorists and dictators, and ​that makes everyone ask the same question - what.
Quality | Am I doing what I want? Science says it can’t answer that question.

"What's going on?" Ellie said.

Malcolm looked up. "change."

"What music?"

“The whole big change was like death,” he said. "You can't see the other side until you get there."
He frowned.

"No good," Hammond shook his head.

Malcolm smiled. "Do you have an idea?" He said how he wouldn’t care if it was you or one of us.
Can you get to this island alive?


The sixth time.


“You don’t just have to say how it works.”


Well done Malcolm
return


Its electric motor roars and the car lurches forward into the darkness. Grant goes.
His feet on the ground. The ship is propelled only by a rooftop mill, which is broken.
To protect against water, the system leaves a small gap. But he knew they
There are white dogs in many areas. There are definitely a lot of monsters here.

Sitting next to him in the room, Lex aimed a flashlight at the base where the Velociraptor was.
Why does it hurt his heart?


« Because | He hit her with a gun,” she said.

Will you die? She said.

"|Probably not."

Why should we accept it? Lex said.

“To show people in the community that dinosaurs actually work,” Grant said.

You know how you know they’re alive?

"Because he's so young," Grant said. "And because he's a little dinosaur." "is

Right?" Lexi said as she looked at the flashing lights.

"Yeah. You're awake now, aren't you?" He reached out and handed her his watch.
What did he say?

"She said... fifteen."

"Good."

"That means we only have forty-five minutes to take care of the team," Tim said.

“We have to be close,” Grant said. "I think we should get to the store now."
He didn't know, but he knew that the wings were raising their heads and turning them back.
outside, the

"good morning!" Tim said.

He walked into the sunshine with a smile. There was a crisis going on in other places.
The floor was dark. Grant knew immediately that someone was watching him.
average. They are next to the garage!

"Whether!" Lexi yelled. "We did it! That's it!" She was lounging on the couch when Grant came over.
The car was in the garage. There are dog houses along a fence. They put the velostrador down for a day.
With a glass of water. Then, they began to climb the stairs that reached the roof.
Go back home.

"I'll have a burger! And fries! A chocolate shake! No more dinosaurs!"
Yay! They reached the door and opened it.

So they sat down.


Inside the sliding door, the glass door is open and something is flying through the air.
from the tip of the leaf. An example refers to the time when dinosaurs ruled the earth
At one point, he screams into the air. The giant robot Tyransaurus woke up and fell asleep.
His boots were in the air, his pipes and drains were broken. Outside, inside, seen
of grass, grown in the field.

Tim and Lex approached the guards behind the armor. Grant picked up his safety radio.
And look at all the streets. "Hi, this is Grant. Who's there? Hello, this is Grant."

Lex saw the body of the guard lying on the ground to his right. He could see nothing but
His legs and feet.

"Thank you, Grant. Thank you."

Lex furrowed his brow, glancing at the office door. Grant held out his hand.
"Hey. Wait."

dead? What on earth is that thing? bold?

"Whether."

How is it not black? "You

It’s not good,” Tim said.

What does 'patient' mean? | No.

The radio crackled. "Oh my God," said a voice. great? are you?

And then: "God? God?" And Eli. "I'm here," Grant said.

"Thank God," Ellie said. "Are you okay?"

"I'm fine, yeah."

What about children? Have you seen them?

"|kids like me," Grant said. "wish you all the best."

"Thank God."

Lex walked over to the table. Grant pulled his hand back. "come here."

The radio crackled. "-n where were you?"

"In jail. In jail."


Over the radio, he heard Wu say, "Oh my God. He's here."

"Listen, Alan," Ellie said. "The coaches let them go. They could have locked their doors. They could
Like a house.

"Okay. Where are you?" Grant said. "We're home."

Grant said, "What about the others?" Mild, everyone else?

"They lost a few people. But we sent everybody home."

"And do the phones work?"

"No. Whatever you're thinking is bullshit. I don't care."

'How can we solve this problem?'

"We tried."

“We have to get it now,” Grant said, “if we don’t do it in half an hour.
It reaches the ground.

He started to explain about the mountain when Myrtle nodded. "I don't think you understand."
The great doctor. We don’t have half an hour here.

"as?"

"We have teams behind us. Now we have two."

"So what? This house is uninhabitable."

Muldoon sighed, "No. We don't want the dogs to wake up."
Outside." The radio crackled. "-Please, throw a stick next to the fence. The men stopped.
on the floor and ceiling. Either way, the device in the taillight should be
There was a fire, but the cause of the fire was unknown. They pollute the sky.

Grant said, "Are you going to the mountain?" He nodded and was about to ask, "How?"

“Yes,” said Mildred, “they cost five thousand dollars each.
It’s like a child, they can get on the phone and-” The transmission cut off abruptly.

"as?" Grant repeated.

"I think they have another ten or fifteen minutes to go," said Mildred.
He entered the house by the light of heaven. And when they came in. . Ahhh, that’s it.
Minister Dr. Great.”

The radio crackled.


In the dim light near Malcolm’s bed, the bombs hit the first steel beams.
A count caught the end of the revolver and drew it, firing again. He gave her a shrug.
The ceiling lights and ceiling lights shone on Malcolm’s bed downstairs. Ellie reached downstairs.
And get rid of the valuables in the kitchen.

"My God, they were bad," Malcolm said, looking up.

Now that the light was gone, they could hear screaming and the sound of screaming, screaming.
Their feet are in the metal when feeding the lobsters. Where there are little silver linings.
They suffered. She crawls all over the dinner table and the bedside table.

“It really wasn’t appropriate,” Ellie said. They’ll just do it at another bar.

Woo said, "If only Grant had gone to the testing room..."

"It's terrible," said Mildred. She walked around the room on shaky legs. "incompatible
It’s much easier there. It is impossible to own everything at once. To get this thing started."

Malcolm sighed. "Whether." His voice was as loud as the wind.

"What did he say?" Mildred said.

"Of course," Malcolm replied. "can. . ."

What's going on?

"anxiety . . ." He rolled his eyes.

What kind of evidence?

"Go to the side…" "Okay?"

And what do you do?

Malcolm laughed out loud. "Warm your hands." "write

Jesus, Muldoon said, will return.

"Wait a minute," Wu said. "Okay. There are only two words here. Which mean
There are at least four others. We can go out and relax.”

" what ?

"Then Grant went to the dock and started the engine."


"And you're going to go back to the control room and start fighting?"

"really."

"There's no time," said Mildred. "There's no time."

“But if we can keep the conversation going here,” Wu said, “they might be gone.
The light of heaven. It might work. It's good to see."

"Dear," said Mildred.

"really."

Who will be the victim? I'm not good enough. I lost my leg. "disease

Do it,” Wu said.

"No," Muldoon said. "You're the only one who knows what to do with the computer. You have to
I’ve talked to Grant first.”

"Then I'll take care of it," Harold said.

"No," Ellie said. "Malcolm needs you. I'll do it."

“Hell, | He never thought about it,” Myrtle said. "There are deputies behind you, deputies in front of the house . . ."

But he was changing, putting his weapons away. "Just don't tell Grant," she said.
"That's what scares you."


The room is quiet, the heat is gone. For a few minutes, the radio went silent.
Tim says why don’t you call us?

"I'm scared," Leake said.

“They’re self-sufficient,” Grant said.

The radio crackled. "Grant, ynry Wu is calling. Is he here?" "am

Right here,” Grant said.

“Listen,” Wu said. "Can you see all the shops around you?"

Grant looked out the glass door and saw the green grass and flowers. "Yes," Grant

said.

“There’s a path through the woods that leads to the study area,” Wu says, “which .
Location of electrical equipment and cables. | Be sure to review your care manual carefully.
yesterday?"

"Yes," Grant said. Though he stopped for a moment. I just learned this morning.
room? That was the case a few years ago.

"Now listen," Wu said. "You think we can find all the exits around here, but we
Don't think so. So be careful. Give me five minutes.

"Okay," Grant said.

"You can leave the kids in the cafeteria for free. Don't take the radio with you
If you go.

"Good."

"Wake up before you go, or I won't make a mess outside. Let me know when you're ready."
Children's Hospital."

"Good."

Grant turned off the radio. Lex turned around. Are we going to a dinner party? She said.

"Yes," Grant said. And they stood up and began to walk peacefully through the air. "am

I want a burger,” Leake said.

"|Don't think you don't have fire to cook."

"Have ice cream."

"Tim, you need help."

"will."

"I have to go somewhere," Grant said.

"|I know."

They walked to the entrance of the cave. The door opened, and ​Grant saw that the living room was empty.
Then there are tables and chairs and metal doors. Next to the house, the change paper and the car, and
Gum and Bombay.

"Okay, kids. | You guys wanted me to stay here. Understood?"

“Put on the heart radio,” Lex said.

"| It's okay. | I need you. Just stay here. I'll be out in five minutes. Okay?"


"Good."

Grant closes the door. The restaurant was dark. Lex raised his hand, "Light."
His mind,” she said.

"It's not good," Tim said. "It's not love." Then he pulled out another nightlight.

"You're lovely. What can I say?"

"Just hold my hand." I’ll eat something. He allowed her to move forward. He saw the light.
Tables and chairs. On the right, watercolor painting of flowers and cake and
dog. He holds the coffee in his hand.

"|I told you," Lex said. "I like cream, not milk."

"Bring this."

"Stop, Timmy."

"No, no."

Tim put the shotgun in his pocket and took the Leica into the living room. He went
In your group. "I don't like the sun," he said.

"Just walk with me. Hold my hand."

"Then, a little later."

Behind the table and chairs are two sliding doors with a small window.
Maybe they went to the bathroom. He closed the door, and ​everyone stopped.


Ellie Sattler walked out the bedroom door, felt a smile on her face and
feet. His heart beat faster and faster, even though he knew he wasn't going to get hurt.
almost. Below, he saw powerful secrets written on the paper.

But he couldn’t see much of the ceiling. Twelve other cities around the world.
It is replaced by white milk. And he still hasn’t seen anything. Yes, there are forests and trees.
He almost smiled. "Hey!" She screamed into the pillow and tried.

Muldoon leaned against the door. “I think that’s a possibility,” he said. “You have to think.
noise. " He walked out and found a hat made inside. He threw
And the bars are like food for food. "Come get it! The food is ready!"

"It's amazing," Ellis said. He looked up at the sky in awe. He saw no response.

"They don't understand English." Mildred laughed. "And | we want them to get their full voice. . . .

He was still afraid and the thought of being killed made him sad. He visited the homes of those who had received them.
It’s almost over. Muldoon returned armed. At its height, it almost ended in 1914.
In the distance he saw a shadow. rept.

“It’s customers first,” Mildred said.

The cat disappeared and reappeared in the darkness, but no one approached.
He smiles, there it is.
You start thinking. If he can’t get the fans out of the building, Grant will suffer.

"You make a lot of noise," Ellis said.

"It's terrible," said Mildred.

"No, this."

"| You know these creatures-"

"You're right," he said. "Let me do it."

"And how do you do that?"

He didn't answer. He walked to the door. "They say retirees are straight."

"It's fine. Just a little, like champagne."

Are they okay?

"Yes, then."

"They can hear the music," he said and opened the door. Metal queue, but no.
The black one there is already screaming. He closed it again and opened it with another shot.

It leaves it open.

"|I don't do that," Myrtle said. "You can do that, stop. I'll take the revenge."

"Get the magazine."

He took a deep breath in thought. "Genard has bodyguards."


"Well, yes," he said. "Look." He went to the door.
Brushes. His heart was pounding and he could barely touch his feet to the ground. shift.
Suddenly he disappeared into the mist. He suddenly pulled away from his wife.

As you can imagine, Muldoon starts to get really upset about that. "God damn you, girl."
“Don’t do that,” he said.

"Don't say 'girl,'" he said.

"I'll ask you anything I want," Mildew whispered.

He didn't listen. He was stunned for a moment, his body twitching all over the place. heart
Just 10 yards from the bird, he could see snow falling like a snowstorm had passed.
leaves. He volunteered at the shelves. Like the dark side of the world. What is
His fingers and toes often suffer as a result. He was very surprised.

"Do you hear me?" cried Muldoon.

How much fat do these animals have? He looks around. Should I reschedule? nothing
I want a mountain, don’t I.

They were arrested.

There was no sound.

The first cat to return to the tree on the right. Go ahead and
He turned and ran away. The second attacks the other side, actually attacks
She jumps, flies through the air, kicks her legs and jumps, spins like a running track, and
And the beast fell to the ground. Now he was going and he couldn’t look back, l
The heat makes it hotter.
Muldoon knocked on the door, saw it locked, screamed, grabbed her arm and
He pushed so hard that his leg gave way and he fell to the ground. And then it changed
time for our first look, but both bree puppies were in the house relaxing.

“Good job,” Mead said. Now she is dog walking, running and walking
Their names. They jumped on the wall and ran forward, and one of them almost fell.
above. "Col, that was hard! These clowns can fly!"

He stood up, looking at the cuts and bruises, blood dripping down his legs. all
One can only assume: three clowns here. They are two-eyed. It means it has a purpose.
one side.

"Help me," said Mildred. Let’s keep them!


Grant left the club and headed straight for the bubble. He found his way.
It is flanked by palm trees to the west, and above it a fireplace rises from
cloud.

There was no door in sight. Focus all the way to the exit. in the head,
Grant is a truck driver. He stood up and faced her.
The front door, barred with iron bars, was locked. He turned and attacked.
In the middle of the room. Ahead, to the right, Grant saw the door. created
with men's hats.

Grant enters the room and sits in the dark. He heard, but he didn't listen. committed
His radio crackled.

"It's Grant," he said. "I'm going."


Wu looked at the light in the sky. Two hooks appear in Malcolm's room, however .
He seemed oblivious to the sounds outside. He went to the village window. Internally, the three
Squirrels hunt. Eli was going back and forth, well, back
Brushes. But it seems like the Raptors don’t have the nerve to say it. Now it’s a
She walked, walked up and down, jumped and screamed, then fell again.
Use the tool to complete the task. Those who did received the ultimate reward.
Not a problem.

"Like birds," said Mildred. "I'm making a movie."

Wu shook his head. "They're self-conscious. They see it as something they can't believe. They don't really try."

The radio crackled. "-around ."

Wu picked up the radio. "Tell me again, Dr. Grant?" "am

Inside,” Grant said.


"Dr. Grant, are you in the hospital?"

"Yes," Grant said. He added: “You can say that I am God.”

"Okay, my God. If you walk through the door, you'll see a lot of scratches and dents."
Wu narrowed his eyes and looked, “Because there is a big hole in the middle.
Two-storey house. To your left is the road and a shark.

"|Look at him."

"Go walk down the street."

"five." He had the radio on his phone.

"After 20 to 30 yards, you'll be in another right-hand turn." "am

Look,” Grant said.

"Go here."

"Good."

"If you keep going," Wu said, "you'll be on a right-hand turn. You'll be in the cave."

"|Look at him."

"Go downstairs."

There is a long rest period. Wu reached into his pocket and Muldoon rolled his eyes.

"Okay, I'll go," Grant said.

"Okay," Wu said. “Now, there should be two big black tanks in front of you.
It means 'Fire'.

"They say, 'Fire.' And there’s something at the end in Spanish.

“Yes,” Wu said. "Two fuel tanks. One of
It’s too cold so we have to switch to one. If you look below
tanks, you see a white bubble forming.

"PVSWS.- Four?"

"Yeah. PVC. Put the pipe in and it's gone."

"Okay. This will take... ah!"

"what happened?"

"No. | I'll lose my head." there

It’s a job.

"Are you okay?"

"Yeah, okay. It just blew my mind. It's funny."

"Follow the river."

"Okay, okay," Grant said. He looked furious. "Great. The tube fits into a large aluminum can
with their hands in their pockets. “Honda,” he said. It’s like a motor.

"Yes," Wu said. "He's an artist. If you go anywhere, you see a painting."
Two tables.

"|Look at them. Black and white?"

"That's it," Wu said. "First click on the red one, and ​ rotate it. Click on the red
A."

"good."

There is another job. It lasted about a minute. Wu and Mid looked at each other.

"God?"

"No," Grant said.

Did you take the red one first, then the red one? Wu asked.

« Yes, | I did," Grant said. He looked furious. "I'll do whatever you tell me. I was
A scream and a scream, a scream, very loud, and then the screaming stopped and there was nothing.

"Try again."

«|He does,» said Grant. "It doesn't work."

"Okay, just a moment." Wu rolled his eyes. "It's like the engine is trying to cut out and can't
For a few reasons. God?"

"I'm here."

"Go under the engine where the soap bottle goes."

"Good." In an example; Grant said: “The pressure goes into a black cylinder and that’s what it shows.
Fuel pump.”

"That's it," Wu said. "Yes. Fuel pump. Get a small ref
above."


"an?"

"You have to break it down, in the little bits you can."

"| I understood. But he was on the side, not in front."

"Okay. Stay."

"It's the wind." "good.

Wait until-”

"It's leaking now. It smells like gas."

"Okay. Keep the beard." Wu looked at the woman and shook his head. "The bomb went off immediately. Lord?"

"Whether."

“Throw balls again.”

A few moments later, Wie heard a clicking noise and a strong wind as the engine revved and
And a voice that sounded raised. "It makes sense," Grant said.

"Good job for God! Good job!"

"What now?" Grant said. His voice was stern. "The lights aren't on here."

"Go back to the court and I'll talk to you about what you've decided to do."

Is that | Should you do it now?

"Whether."

"Okay," Grant said. "I'll call you when I get there." His voice was hoarse and trembling.

"God?"

The radio was dead.


Tim walked through the front doors of the restaurant and into the kitchen. is
The large table in the center of the room had a large fireplace burning to the right, and
Larger portable refrigerators are also available. Tim started opening the fridge to make ice cream.
Smoke billowed into the air as each one opened.

How does the fire burn? Lex said letting go of her hand.

"It's not like that."

"They all have little red lights."

"That's the most important lesson."

What is a pilot light? They had fires in their houses.

"No problem," Tim said, opening another drawer. "But that's the point | I can do anything for you."
In another breath he sees everything, milk and wooden bottles and
Lots of T ribs, pork - but no cream.

"Do you want ice cream?"

"I told you, did you |?"

The other refrigerator is much larger. The door was a metal frame, and behind it was a piano key. fluent
He grabbed the bag, opened it and saw a squirming cat. A home for everyone.
A star is a star.

"Tim…."

Do you have a minute? She said she was furious. "I'll try to make your cream."

"Timmy…there's something here."

He finished with a smile, and for a moment the last two words were unpronounceable. Then Tim will take
Inside the freezer, I could see some white smoke. Lexi sat up.
Steel work table. He looks around the kitchen.

He let out a roar like a giant snake. His voice rose and fell. I was
It won't be long. It might have been raining, but she knew there was none.

"Tim," she said, "I'm scared."

He leaned against the wall and looked out. In the dark dining room,
A box with black buttons. And walking between them, he smiled.
Its breath matches that of its prey, a velociraptor.


In the darkness of the kitchen, Grant scanned the box and behind
ladder. Hard to find your way in the dark and how to find information
Product classification. She reached the exit and started walking as she stopped.
There was something else in the room besides the hum of the generator.

Grant stopped and listened.


Only one person was crying.

It was like Genoa.

"where are you?" Grant shouted.

"Here," Genaro said. "In the truck."

Grant couldn’t see any trucks. He stared into the darkness. He looked at her again.
eyes. He saw black things glowing in the darkness. Then he looked at the truck and saw
He shook his head.


Tim noticed the silence and smiled.

Velosraptor is 6 meters long, and ​ it is very heavy, even with its legs and arms.
It’s hidden amongst the padding. Tim could only see the cut on his shoulder which he covered with both hands.
Behind her body, her legs were spread. He could see the burning pain.
back. The Velliciraptor was on guard, shaking its head as it bit.
With the strength of birds. The head also moves up and down with a
His tail is on, letting the bird peck at his face.

It’s a big bad bird.

The dining room is dark, but it looks like the decor could use better lighting to illuminate
forward. Occasionally, he would shake his head and duck his head under the tables. Tim knows a
A kiss. Then it will raise its head and straighten up again like a bird.

Tim looked around until he realized the Velociraptor was coming from the building. Is this
What are their problems? Every book says dinosaurs are harmless, but this
It shows it can be done. However, what do the books know? That’s the truth.

And he approached.

Go back to the kitchen.

Is there anything here? Lex said.

Tim didn't answer. He put it under the counter in the corner, next to the big blue box. fluent
He hurried away and shouted angrily, "Stay here!" And put it back in the fridge.

He grabbed a black knife and pushed it through the door. He put it up first.
The meat was on the floor, and he took one plate and handed it to the other. ...

Out of the corner of his eye he saw Lex looking away. He was yelling after her. fluent .
Meat three, and ​ four, I went deep into the kitchen.

His voice rose, a finger locked on the door, and ​his big cock showed in her vision.
Take care of your body.

The Velliciraptor stood in the doorway of the hospital.

Tim was standing in the back of the house, near the blacksmith shop. but
He had no time to hide; His head and neck remain above the table;
He had control of the Velociraptor.

Suddenly, Tim dropped his body and crawled under the table. . . . Velostrator shook his head.
She turned, looking at Tim's face.

Tim smiled. He was, but he was thinking of changing it. What is

The velociraptor is at the door. A kiss.

It's too much in here," Tim said. It doesn't look good. This made him even worse.

But now she can get dressed and look in the mirror.
The dinosaur eats calmly, lifting its head to show its trunk. What is
the velociraptor looked at him again and cocked his head to the side. There’s a lot going on.
Broken bones.

Tim felt his heart skip a beat. In some ways, it’s hard to make a creature like this
Kitchen, close to the open garden. Which means, means, means, means.
breath...

It was probably more scary to bears than Tyransaurus. Tyrannosaurus was a
He was big and strong, but not handsome. The Velostrator is the fastest vehicle ever built by humans and is
He seemed quick and alert; Tim is afraid of search terms because of the importance of his research.

Cyclesport buried him. Then he left - from the current Lakers! You have to clean it.
right! Tim's heart sank.

Velocirapport was devastated. Somehow he became curious.


He had a dream.

Tim wanted to smile and look under the table, but he couldn't move. It’s done in black.
Frozen, he heard their words of curses. Eaten by a dinosaur. Bones and all.

Rator raised an eyebrow and looked around. frustrated. The second dream. fluent
He slowly walked forward. He looked at the ground.

attention.

He didn't eat the bread.

His head was cut off. Tim's face was wet with sweat, but he didn't move.

Why didn’t the dog eat the second piece of meat? Eleven thoughts run through his mind.
And he did not like the beef or the fowl, because it was bad.
My life, I love Jean, I love Lex, I love Tim, the Tim

The Velisiraptor is now running at full speed. He saw the third snack, tilted his head, and looked away.
We’re moving forward.

Tim held his breath. The dinosaur was only a few feet away, and now Tim could see the little
He’s stuck in the bones. He saw red blood stains on his hands and feet.
He could see strange lights in broken furniture and ragged clothes.
The soundtrack is below.

Cyclesport buried him. He shook his head and looked at Tim. Tim was almost disappointed.
afraid. Tim's body was raw and aching. He looked at the cats walking around the house.
Another love.

"He caught me," Tim recalled.

Then the head retracts and the animal enters the fifth stage. Tim
I mean, Lex, don't change, don't change nothing...

Velliciraptor cleared his throat and smiled. Now open the freezer door.
Tim picked up the smoke and placed it on the ground next to the creature. huge
He punched him with his left, then punched him again. The dinosaur comes in two sizes. It’s cold,” Tim said.
No more, devil, no more, no more….

The dinosaur came.

The head was gone, then the torso, then the tail.

Tim walked over and leaned against the metal door and opened it.
He’s focused on the first step! You can’t close the door! The velostrador shouted in disgust.
noise. Without saying a word, Tim removed the lock, closed the door, and
Listen to get caught! Closed!

Lex! Lex! She almost screamed. You hear the rapper knocking on the door, you hear him.
bed. He knew there was a piece of metal, and if he let go of the wheel, he
The door opened. They must be destroyed. "Lexi!"

Lex was next to him. "what do you want!"

Tim leaned against the door and closed it. There’s a pin! Pilpin! carry.
rock!

The Velostrator neighs like a horse, and ​its sound is like polished metal. Everything falls.
His body in her mouth.

I don’t see anything! Lexi yelled.

The pin is placed next to the door, mounted on a metal frame. "Good
there!"

I don’t see the point! She's crying, and ​Tim realizes she's not wearing pants.

Think about it!

He saw her small hand cup his cheek and squeeze it shut.
He could hear her panting, her breathing ragged as she held Pin.
And Velostrator knocked on the door and warned- God damn it- but no
Ignoring him, she turned to look at him again, and ​Tim closed the door.
further. Lex frowned and reached into the darkness.

"|There you are!" Lex yelled, grabbing Pin by the arm and pulling him into the corner. He pulled it out.
Take it out again.

"From above, below!"

He grabbed her again, lifted her up on the chain, and ​ dragged her over his arms and down. urban.

Closed.


The Velostrator shouted. Tim and Lex return to the portal and the dinosaurs attack.
Inside too. Each time they struck, the metal walls cracked, but they kept going. Tim didn’t.
You think the dog can open the door.

The monster was hiding.

He took a deep breath. "Come on," he said. fluent

He grabbed her hand and ran away.


"You should see him," Jannard said as he carried Grant to the hospital.
building. "It must be twelve. The committee. | must go by truck to .
Stay away from them. They were all up in the air. We hid there and waited like skeletons.
But they ran away when he arrived.

"The players," Grant said. “Don’t push something that looks and feels solid.
Attack a dead creature and it dies. No matter what, he's not going away."

Now they were climbing through the door.

What happened that made you jump? Grant said. "|Nothing

Find it,” Janrod said.


tour?
"| He's not. | He's gone, | I think because he's in pain. | I think Meade kneels down and
It’s blood, it’s here. so. . . | I do not know. You can go back outside. very good


Here he died. | I do not know.
"And you're welcome," Grant said.


Woo looks out the bedroom window. They watched as he walked.
I’m fighting for Ellie. This continued for a long time and reached 100,000.
Quite right. He gets them to accept the warning of Eli, the elder.
He wanted to help them.

Wu has always been fascinated by dinosaurs. And well:
It affects DNA damage, as well as protein synthesis. Don't think so.
However, creativity can only be measured in certain ways, such as creating an animal.
It is synthesized by a feed to control an enzyme. But overall, the most important
They can't understand. You don’t need to see the DNA test.
to explain his creation. That’s impossible.

It was Wu's degree in DNA. It’s just a shame that
Today, a mechanic can restore an old watch. He was doing something.
The past is a product of the past and follows old rules. We didn’t
Learn why it works the way it does, and it has been proven and disproven many times.
Evolutionary forces in time. Thus, as the operator is defined as
Checking that the clock is working properly, Wie adjusts it and checks that the animals
He asked her sternly. He just tried to hide his bad behavior:
Installation of electrical wiring or suspended wire pipe. These are the items that were sent.
Go to the website.

And the new study gives us a look at dinosaurs.
park. He didn’t know animals did that.
End of history or not. Were they doing the same things they were doing before? It was open.
This is an impossible question to answer.

Although Wu doesn’t say so, it seems like the dinosaurs evolved.
This is a great example of his work. Animal life matters.
In a spiritual sense; It turns out that Wu can play all the parts. eventually-
He created a million-year-old monster to replace the monster.
He is not in himself.

But, even as he watched the windows outside, he stopped their movement.
Raptors are smart, and even smart animals are easily fooled. Living organisms also increased
test, and

Harding walked out of Malcolm's room and into the living room. Where is Illy?

"right."

"Please. The guards are in the shadows."


"when?" Wu said walking towards the door.

"It's not for nothing," Harold said.

Wu opened the door. are! Now go home!

He looked at her, confused. "It's okay, everything is under control..."

"common!"

He shook his head. "I know what I'm doing," he said.

"Now, Ellie, no way!"

Muldoon didn't like facing the open door, he almost said;
And he saw a lightning from heaven, and now he knew what had happened. I
As he went to the door, Muldoon heard Ellie screaming. Mildred came to the door and
When he looked up, he saw Wu lying on his back, her body pressed against his chest.
And triumph rears its head when Wee’s spirit fades, even though Wee is still alive.
He reached up and opened the large bowl of food he ate when
Still alive, ​Ellie takes off her clothes and starts climbing the stairs, and
Muldoon closed the door and looked confused. That happened so fast!

Harding said, "Did it fall off the wall?"

Muldoon shook his head. He went to the window and looked outside and saw three menus.
Now he walks faster. But they did not follow Eli.

They covered it and turned around, in that direction.


Grant came to the dressing room door and looked out the window. can
I could hear the trees shaking and it sounded like they were screaming. Now he could see them.
People are moving forward. They walked to the meeting place.

He turned to Gennaro.

Gennaro shook his head, no.

Grant leaned forward and whispered in her ear. "There's nothing we can do. We have to get the computer working."

Grant got off the couch.

Eventually, Zener followed suit.


Eli didn't stop thinking. When the top of the hill, it fell into the w
He runs to the top. There is a five meter
The distance between the port and the housing. He ran, not paying attention to the animals following him, only
He heard her breathing. He turned on the flashlight and saw a tree growing in front of the house.
He sighed, took the staff, and stood up. epic. He sat down well because
He saw her legs, picked her up, and put her in a box.
Again, he grabbed her by the shoulders and stood up immediately.

He was twenty feet below and the Reapers were still below and
As he neared his break, he saw the first spider on the wall. are
He was covered in blood and bits of flesh were falling from his mouth. And he went and touched him.
To the right, maybe, you can see the wall. He looked at the ground.
further.

Two retorts climbed the tree.

Now from his house, he saw that the hill was only four feet high and .
Through the light at the top of the glass was the entrance to the city; can
Enter. With great speed, he jumped into the air and landed
hole. He rolled his eyes, but it was just a happy smile, like
The game he played, he wanted to win. He ran to the front door
A century later, he still hears the response of the twitching trees. They are still alive
In the tree.

She reached the door and knocked. The door was closed.

It took him a while to process the situation. The door was closed.
He was on a horse and refused to get off. The door was closed.

He knocked on the door with all his might, and ran upstairs, thinking .
Notice a downward trajectory, but only the water reflected by the wind
mist. The whole edge of the pond was white. Twelve layers of concrete. Then more
Your house is broken. There are no boxes to cover. There are no walls. There is no entry point for fire.


nothing.

Ellie smiled and quickly pulled the keys out of the box. flee.
He expected another door, but there was none.

People slowly approached and followed him, walking calmly along the glass boardwalk.
He looked at the ground. Ten feet from the edge of the bridge.

Quite right.

The answer came to him, and he thought: Isn't it always like this?
way? Small mistakes can ruin everything. She was always smiling, always happy and
As much as he didn’t believe this disaster was coming, he didn’t believe it was now
Your life is about to end. It seemed impossible. He’s in a good place.
cheerful. He couldn’t believe it was going to end.

The Raptors are ecstatic. Ellie turns around and drags him downstairs. He took a deep breath.
And he started running towards the door. Running to the side, he saw the dog.
The lake, he knew was deep but he thought, very, quickly.

And it fell.

And with a sigh of relief he felt it in the darkness of his soul. He was in the water. fluent
He will do it! He came to the ground, looked up and saw the windows of
And it fell. And he knew if he could do it, so could the Reps. The wind changed.
Water is water, can animals swim? But he was sure he could. Supposed
They traveled like pirates.

And the gatekeepers returned. And then you hear Harold calling
"Dad?" She realized he had opened the door. The cake is amazing.

She quickly climbed out of the pool and ran into her room.


Harding climbed the stairs twice at the same time and opened the door.
I thought. "Sather!" he shouted. And he thought. There is a hole in the firids in the ceiling.
No answers written.

"Sather!"

She is charmed by Stirling and quickly finds her feelings for him. fluent
He must see the monster in his mind. In the next hour, he broke a finger.
Near the door, he felt a pain in his shoulder;
He thought, closing the door with his hand and listening inside.
Muldoon said, "He's here. He's home."

On the other side of the door, a red bell rang, Harding opened the door again, and
He reached down, closed the door with a metal lock, and walked away.
below.


"Where are we going?" Lex said. They were watching from the second floor. glass-
The walls run the full length of the building.

"In the living room," Tim said.

Where is he?

"Over here on the side." Tim looked at the names on the doors as he walked by.
they. These are just like offices: public services come to Park Ward. .. general
Boss... Boss...

They come in a device with the following symbols:


Open Body
Only officials


For this reason.


There was a security card, but Tim just opened the door.
How is it done?
"It's over," Tim said.


Why go to court? he asked.

"To get a radio. We need to call someone."

Beyond the glass doors, the hall is quiet. Tim remembers this place and sees it.
He was there for the tour. Lex approached. They are far away.
inflammation. It was as if the wolves were approaching. Then Tim heard a noise.
The mirror is on the floor.

"They…" Lex said.

"last but not least."

"What are you doing here?" Lex said.

"Now."

Park Ranger... Responsibilities... Chief Conservation Officer...

"That's it," Tim said. He closed the door. The throne was exactly what he had always imagined.
before. In the middle of the room is a console with four chairs and four computer monitors. What is
The entire room was black, except for the television, which showed different colors.

"Where's the radio?" Lex said.

But Tim had forgotten about the radio. He stared at the computer screen.
The screens are on fire! This is bad -

"The power needs to come back... ."

"Ick," Lex said as he rubbed his stomach.

"in."

"|On behalf of someone," he said.

Tim wasn’t there when they entered. He looked down and only saw her ears.
He was on the ground.

“It’s very different,” Leake said.

"last but not least." It threatened the media.

Where are the others? She said.

"You can't be anything right now."

He looked at the television reluctantly. There is a collection of their work online:


"Well, don't worry about it, Tim," she said.

"Don't worry, | it won't hurt."

He used to find computers more expensive than sitting at home.
His father worked for him. These machines control everything from elevators to security and
Heating and cooling systems. They are visible - dots of different colors - but they are
It’s not hard to understand. And there is almost always some kind of backup, if needed.
Kenko’s legacy, however, doesn’t end here. He looked back to see her.

But then, he noticed something else: the numbers in the bottom right corner of the page. they
Read 10:47:22. Then Tim knew it was time. It was only thirty minutes.
the ship-but the people at home are worried.

There is a cross. He looked up and saw that Lex was holding a radio. He was sleeping.
Bottles are bottles. "What am I doing?" She said. "It's not working."

Give it to me!

"Mine! I've got it!" "as

For me, Lexi!" "I will.

first!"

"Lexi!"

Suddenly, Radio Fora. "What's going on!" Muldoon’s voice.

Suddenly, Lex turns on the radio.


Grant sighed and buried his head in the thick branches. Inside the animal could see.
the animals howled and roared and tore at the lions’ horns. but,
While crying, they opened their mouths and tilted their heads, as if to hear something from afar.
And then it makes a little noise.


What do they do? January said.

"It's like they want to get into the food scene," Grant said. "What's on the market?" "am

That’s where she left the children. . ." said Grant.

"Can they break this glass?"

"|Don't worry about it, no."

Grant looked around, and suddenly he heard the sound of a radio cable and horses neighing.
You’re running in the wrong direction. They ran into each other, until
When he saw the first one, he ran to the second floor and from
On the second floor of the hotel.


In the office on the fourth floor, Tim picked up Lex's radio. fluent
Close the file. "Thank you? Thank you?"

"-And you, Tim?" It was Muldoon’s voice.

"Me, yeah."

"where are you?"

"On the covenant. Fire!"

"Okay, Tim," Muldoon said.

"If someone tells me, I'll do it." There was silence.

"Hello?" Tim said. Do you hear me?

"Ahh, we have a plan for that," Mood said. "Nobody, uh, nobody here knows how to do this
What is. Computers are very different.

Tim said, "What, are you kidding? Nobody knows?" That’s another thing.

"I don't." I do. "I think he's a superstar. A superstar... you
Doing something on the computer, Tim?

Tim looked at the paper. Lex shouted. "Tell me, Tim," he said.

"It's definitely something. | They know something," said Tim.

"You might want to," Muldoon said. "Nobody knows what I do. And Grant doesn't know
in computers.

"Okay," Tim said. "I will." He turned off the radio and looked at the screen to read.

"Tim," Leake said. "You don't know what you're doing."

"Now | do it."

“If you know how to do it, do it,” Leake said.

"Just a minute." To begin, pull out the chair next to the keyboard and press
The fathers of the body. These buttons float around the circles on the screen. But that's not
done. Then he hit the other buttons. The code does not change.

"good?" She said.

"Something's wrong," Tim said, his eyes wide. "You

I just don’t know, Tim,” she said.

She looked back at the computer and looked at him. The keyboard has a top key.
On the lenses, like a computer monitor, the camera is big and heavy. but
The control room is not empty. Tim looked at the edge of the paper and noticed something wrong.
red light field.

Brown, nearly below the edge. .. what does that mean? He rolled his eyes.
He walked towards the light and saw a white light covering his body.

He touched the screen and listened for the beep.


Eventually, the screen went out and the primer lit up again.

"what happened?" Lex said. "What did you do? Touch something."

really! He thinks. He grabbed the paper. A captured text! red flames.
Pressure sensors should be located close to the wall. Tim had never seen such a screen before, but he had read about it.
about them in the book. He caught her.

WORD/WORD.

Suddenly, the tone changed. Updates have arrived:


The computer will now reboot.
Follow the instructions on the first page.


Screams were heard over the radio. "|I want to see you," Leak said. "You can do
Look at the prospect."

"No, Lexi."

"Well, | I want VIEW," he said. And before his hand could reach it, he grabbed VIEW.
The file changes.


"Ooh," she said.

"Lex, do you want to sleep?"

"protect!" She said. "It's over! Me too."

Throughout the production, viewers certainly notice the different parts of the park changing;
Most photos are obscured by fog outside, but one is shown outside
In the hallway, there was a frog on the wall.
It shows a ship in the sun.

"What's that?" Tim said as he leaned forward.

"in?"

"That's the picture!"

But the picture changes, they look at the ceiling, one.
At the edge of a room, she finally saw Malcolm sitting on the bed-

“Give it time,” Leake said. "| Look!"

Tim pressed the button several times and entered the side menus. and various menus.

“Take your time,” Leake said. "Let's see... ."

"I don't know about their computers!"

There is now a collection of icons on the screen. One of them is called THE SAFARI ROOM: LV2- .
4. REMOTE Mode: Port (VND). He updated the page several times.

Video feeds came from televisions around the room. One marked the tip of the mountain of good work.
It’s under the sea. In the distance, Tim could see the mud house on the beach, and the harbor. fluent
He spotted the mine from a helicopter flying over at the time. I was
terms. Looks like the train is only a few minutes away.

The video then moved to a second screen, showing the inside of the Safari building;
Black clouds. The goats were near the bodies, but turned their heads and
Below, in the shadows.

And, in the third episode, he sees it in the light. Malcolm was lying on the bed and
Eli stood beside her. They both looked at each other. As they watched, Mildred entered.
And he was joining them, looking deep in thought.

“They see us,” Leake said.

"|Don't worry."

The radio crackled. On the way, Muldoon raised a radio to his lips. "Are you okay, Timmy?"

"Here I am," Tim said.

"Oh, we don't have much time," Muldoon said irritably. “Turn on the lights.”
Tim then hears the doctor's voice and sees the skull fall.
Glass, in the photo above, is holding his hand.

Hurry, timmy!" Lex shouted. "Shoot!


network;
Tim quickly realizes he’s gotten himself into trouble and tries


Return to the main screen. Most systems only have a return or command prompt.
home screen, or go to the main menu. But these effects are unknown—or unknown. also,


He was pretty sure there was some helpful information written on his device, but he couldn't find it.
Also, when Leica screams and screams physically, the sound is pretty annoying.

In the end he won first prize. He didn’t know what he was doing, but he knew. fluent
she thought, searching for words.

"Do something, Tim!"

Will you stop him? I’m looking for help. He picked up the big bag. The page is open.
A very fancy table, with plates and buttons.

forbidden. forbidden.

Select the COMMON INTERFACE option. The text changes:


"What's that?" Lex said. "Why don't you pull the curtain, Tim?"
He didn't listen. The information associated with this information is called “data.” You have the INFO.


"Timee," Lex said, but he had covered FIND. It turned up another unused window. fluent
He returned it.


Over the radio, he heard Muldoon say, "How are you doing, Tim?" He didn't dare to answer.
Danger, throwing the balls at each other.
Suddenly, without warning, the main screen flashed again.


He glanced at the television. The main tree and SETGRIDS DNL can both be configured
There was something holding them back. It states that the maintenance/treatment and aggressive finish will make
It’s also important. She listened to the doctor. He had to make a choice. He put
SETGRIDS DNL, ​​and when it saw:


He didn't know what to do. The STANDARD PARAMETERS box is removed.


Yes, the opposite.


The B4C6 bus is located outside the C2D2 bus.
Reference solution BB07 Reference table R4R4.
Lori Tips F4D4 Mantle Tips E5L6.

Size C4G7 Structure D5G4.
The synthesis of AHB5 A from AlCl


An untested circle.
Safety nets are left alone.


Tim looked at him seriously. It took him a moment to realize he was .
Important words. At least you know some directions to go now! Press relay F4.


Force Level F4 (Safari Hotel)


DO NOT USE ADDRESSES. 505
(POWER is not associated with COMAND ERROR.
See pages 4,094.11)


"I didn't see it," Leake said.
"|I know!" He pressed another button. The screen popped up again.


D4 Power Room (Safari Room).

DO NOT USE ADDRESSES. 505
(POWER is not associated with COMAND ERROR.
See Table 4.094.1 1)


Tim tried to calm down and think things through. For some reason, it was always a big problem.
Each time the narrator tries to drop a bombshell. He said the government and
He gave orders. But what does that mean? Why are there health disparities?

"staff . . ." Lex said, crossing his arms.

'Not now, Lexi.'

"Now, now," he said, taking it out of his pocket and into his pants. And then a
She listened to the doctor.

He was walking outside.


The light above Malcolm's bed barely illuminated the second metal bar.
Now they can stick their head in any metal tray and jump up and down
People of the world. After a while, they separated and began to eat with their hands.
"It won't take long now, three or four minutes," Malcolm said. Click the radio button:
"Tim, where are you? Tim?"
There were no words.


Tim looked out the door and saw the Velociraptor at the end of the hallway, standing behind him.
The balcony, it seemed, was uncomfortable. How did it get off the ground?

Then, as he looked, another dog approached him, and he recognized it.
The message no longer appears. He was walking outside. He's going to heaven.
Come on, downstairs. The second leg fell straight down and landed on the carpet. Tim doesn’t
Believe him. The monster was flying ten feet in the air. More than ten feet. The moon should be there.
Very strong.

Lexi said, "I thought you said it was wrong-."

"Chhh." Tim wanted to think, but he looked at her with a curious look as the third
the raptor is going to the ballet. The animals walked down the road for a while and
They start on the same page. It gets closer and closer to Lex.

Quickly, Tim pushed the door behind him and returned to Mamr's cell. But here
He burned it. He finishes the story.

"We're trapped outside," Lex said calmly. "protect." He showed me the security card.
near the door. A red light appeared. In some cases, the security gates work.
"Damn, we're stuck outside!"

Tim looks out the window. He saw several doors, but they all had red lights.
beside. It means all the doors are closed. There was nowhere to go.

Then he noticed something down at the end of the hallway. The dead guard. is
His chest was covered with white security card.

"Come on," he whispered. They ran into the garage. Tim put the map down, and turned around. but
But when the people saw him, they shouted and blocked the way to the throne room.
They start pushing, venting and attacking Tim and Lex. Invited.
He started to fall into a rhythm.

They were waiting to fight.


Tim did as little as he could. Using the card, he opened the door closest to his room.
And he drives a Lexus. The door suddenly started closing behind them, screaming animals howling and
pay.


Manic


Lan Malcolm took a few deep breaths. He stared at the windows with wide eyes.

Harding swallowed the tears, rubbed his eyes, and put them back on. Ellie Sattler was buried in the cemetery;
He looks very sad and angry. Muldoon sat on the floor and leaned against the wall. Hammond is looking for

In front of him, there were no words. Everyone was listening to the radio.

What happened to Tim? Hammond said. "Is there any news?"

"|I don't know."

Malcolm said, "It's bad, no. It's really bad."

Hammond shook his head. "Who do you think you are?"

Ellie said, "As Malcolm said."

"|I've thought about that," Malcolm said. "I don't think so."

Hammond was ecstatic. "It wasn't so bad, after all. She said I told you a few hours ago. But I did."
Nobody wants that to happen.

"It doesn't matter if you like it or not," Malcolm said with his eyes closed. He calmly called
Drugs. "It's what you think you should do. When a corpse flies in the snow
into the forest to find food for his family, does he offer to take over the city? No, I think it’s very unlikely.
below. He was out of breath and couldn’t take it anymore. Pray for the people of all nations.
The nature of the mountain protects it. He prays because he knows he has no control over himself. is
His love.

"But I don't think you can be at the mercy of the state. I think you should challenge the government and get out."
Then you get in trouble, because you can't do it. However, he did take some steps.
Consider doing it. And it shouldn’t—and shouldn’t—or shouldn’t. You can’t help it.
issue. You can build a wall, but you can't tame the sea. You can build an airplane, but
The air is bad. You’re not as strong as you think you are.
believe."

"Caught me," Hammond smiled, "where's Tim? That's right.
The child was afraid.

"I believe he's trying to fix the problem," Malcolm said. "Just like everyone else."

"Grant too. What happened to Grant?"


Grant arrived at the door of the hospital, which he had been waiting for twenty minutes.
before. He looks at his hand: it’s locked. Then he saw a small black dot. check
The doors work too! damn! He ran upstairs and past
He opened the door, entered the section and confronted the guard where he stood.
I listen to your radio. He went to the poultry farm, looking for birds, though.
The restaurant was closed and the kids had left.

He climbed upstairs and finally reached the end of the room where the weapon was pointed at and there was a door.
Closed. He needs a security card to travel.

Grant couldn’t walk.

Somewhere along the way I heard the cries of rescuers.


A bucket of water caught Tim's face, his tail wrapped around his mouth, and ​Tim managed to pull himself up to his knees.
She screamed in shock.

"Timmy!" Lexi yelled.

Tim turned around again. The little velociraptor sat on his haunches and sighed.
She screamed in shock. Tim and Lex are in one of White’s rooms. There were animals on the ground: moving
Brown bottles, bottles and plastic straws.

"That was a baby," Lex said, pointing to the creature wrapped around Tim's chest.

The creature buried its head in Tim's shoulder. The poor guy probably kills Tim
thought.


Lex pulled him away and the boy smiled into his lap. He shook his head. "why
Can you do that? She said. "afraid?"

"|I don't know," Tim said.

He goes to the raptor to help Tim. The baby cried and screamed and screamed.
And she sat on his chest contentedly, watching his head bob back and forth. There is no hope.
This small difference makes sense and-

"Timmy," Lex said.

She closed the door as they entered the bathroom. Now, in the
about the next song. First, and second.

The baby was crying and crawling on Tim's shoulder. Tim knew he had to do it.
clingy. A child can learn from them. After all, he was a child. He put the child down.
The animal was removed and stabilized. The baby bounced between her legs.
Elders. The first goat opened its mouth and gently licked the baby.

Tim took Lex's hand and led him into the kitchen. He had to find a way to
leave-

There was a scream. Tim looked around and saw the child in the old man's lap. is
Another velostrator came along and grabbed the kid’s leg, trying to push
The first day. The two friends argued with the children during lunch. He was bleeding.
He fell to the ground.

"They eat it," Leake said.

Animals will fight with other children, bite each other, and attack each other. Tim
The door—opened—and he walked away, leading Lex behind him.

He was in another room, and he realized he was outside.
DNA Extraction Laboratory, High Resolution Acoustic Microscope
One page shows pictures of animals in black and white. His feet and legs are their own.
Dinosaurs ate plants for thousands of years and drained blood, and now blood is reinjected.
A dinosaur in the park. They ran into the lab and Tim could hear them screaming and yelling
The men followed, approached, entered the lab and passed.
There must have been a knock at the door, for in the chimney a loud knock occasionally.
he shouted, and the lights above their heads flashed. While walking, Tim fell.
He walked into the darkness and back into the darkness, the sounds muffled, he could hear the dogs barking.
he screamed as they searched him. Lex turned around and yelled. Tim sees another front door and
He opened the door, walked towards her, and ​ slowly.
Then something big happens and Lex screams in shock.

"Hello, kids," said a voice.

Tim looked at her in disbelief. Dr. Grant in the room. Next to Mr. Genaru.


In the darkness, it took Grant two minutes to realize the spy was dead.
You probably have a security card. He bent down and picked it up and placed it on top of him.
Cordova, so we can get directly to the Core. He followed their response and saw the soldiers.
They fight in the courtroom. She hoped that the children would go along with her and
Now go back to the crafting lab.

And that’s where he met the children.

Today the repertoire continues. The animals paused for a moment.
He was surprised that so many people showed up.

Grant took the children from Genora's arms and said, "Put them somewhere safe."

"but-"

“That’s it,” Grant said, looking over his far shoulder.
A house, if you can. You all need to be safe out there.

What will you do? January said.

People were standing in the doorway. Grant notices that all the animals are waiting for him.
We are together, and we move as a team. Passover servant. He was very surprised.

"|He's got a plan," Grant said. "Now open fire."

Gennaro sends them to the garden. The Russians quickly fly to Grant, it happens
The mainframe, not the hosts connected to the computer


code. People show up without thinking and defend the villages and come.
Invited.

Grant heard the door close behind him and looked over his shoulder. Everyone stopped
On the other side of the carved door, look outside. Genaro shook his head.

Grant knew what that meant. There is no door to the back lot. Genaro et al.
The children were engaged.

Now he felt alone.


Grant quickly turned around, walking towards the lab, away from Gennaro and
baby. There may be another door next to it that says OUR LABORATORY.
Whatever that means. He had an idea, and he thought it was true. The door with the green.
Biomarkers. The answers will come soon. Grant panicked, banged on the door and
He walked over, and ​ there was a commotion, a commotion.


He was very surprised.

Whether.

Where he wanted to be, where he wanted to be: under red lights, with lots of tables and bars.
Black and some black. The figures on the panels have their own shapes and colors.
Black rolls around their table and onto the floor, where it disappears.
difficult.

Grant ran down the hall and into a dark lab with walls that blocked out the light from his cell.
His eyes sparkled. He looked up and saw the tray, a bowl full of bread, bread.
plate . . . All laboratory work.

Retorts entered the room quietly at first, sniffing the air and looking away.
Sliding side panel. The dog wiped blood from his mouth onto the back of his hand. Cancel.
Images pass between large screens. The animals came from the house.
On a more subtle note, sometimes you stop to look at the notes.

And they were looking for him.

Grant took a look, walked around the lab, looked around, and looked at the equipment.
They are represented by their muscles and bones. The label says INSTRUCTIONS for A4 cats.
There is a lot of support. Grant thought the Regiment said they were in force.
poison. Only a few missiles were shot down. . . .

Kate was sitting on the operating table. Grant couldn’t put his hands in his pockets.
He tried to open it, but there was no door, no metal bar, and no way to see. . . . Ross the Great
All of a sudden, and you can see the whole room. Managers walk between tables.

He looked up at the captain. The silver cup is on the table. so
like a prison in the middle. He raised his head and saw a table.
He throws it away.

With a bang, Capone jumped up and down.

He saw in front of him glass and globes that looked like heads and horns. fluent
Try the following: CCK5 5... TetipaAlpha Release .. . Temolevin X1612. ... or
The water glows red in the candlelight. Nearby, he saw a bucket of water.
The layers are small, each containing a small amount of volume. It makes sense.
Light green, Grant reaches over and grabs the agent. The needles in the pills were white.
LIGHT. He rolled his eyes. He looked at the small chair.

He rolled his eyes. in their response.

He has studied dinosaurs his whole life. Now he saw what it really was.
A. Velociraptors were small predatory dinosaurs, similar to oviraptors and dromaeosaurs.
Animals have long been thought to steal hands. How some special birds bite the tongues of others.
With birds, Grant always thought velociraptors would eat dinosaur bones if they could.

He sat down at a nearby table. Suddenly, he raised his hand in the snow.
He brought a large potato to the table and sucked on it. The leaves can be used as foot cream.
It is decorated with a small rose petal. He picked up the drink carefully as he attached the rope.
and the removal of the joints. The blood glows red.

Grant fell again. He saw Retorts' feet under the table and the redhead smiling.
He left the table. And he cast it down to the earth, and gave it to the devil. What is


the raptors turn around, hear a loud hiss, and walk away.
Then they started running slowly.

The Fen stopped somewhere in the nearest Retort.

damn!

Grant did it all over again: picking up the drink before opening it, setting it down, and blowing his nose.
in their response. This time, the ball landed on the foot of a Velociraptor. He was very surprised.
Squeeze it with your foot.

The reporter looked in horror at the new business. He stopped and listened to his voice. fluent
He held his cock with his mouth on the floor for a moment.

And he's not surprised.

The Velociraptor is rebuilt and suddenly takes off, flying. fluent

It doesn’t work.

Grant brought in a third dish and made new burritos. He grabbed the steaming drink.
His hands, shaking again. Then he threw that one like a football. The fire goes out.
You have to go under the roof.

The hero hears her song, sees her coming and follows her.
Something moved, he shifted between the cushions, grabbing her hips and walking towards her. setting
And he took him up, and smote the rock upon his side, and brake it in pieces.

The sound disappears, and ​a white disc falls from his mouth. He opened his mouth and closed his eyes. is
and he fell to the ground, but he was not hurt. He was ready.
They also eat fish. Grant looked up to see what was going on. . . .

In another room, the Gnome nodded. He looked at her.

Velisiraptor yelled in shock. He glances at Grant, then stands in the room.
This is a very straightforward process. Grant was shocked to see the scene as he stood up.
The creature let out a loud roar, the monster screamed, and ​its massive body rose from the ground.
His head hit the ground with a thud. Data continues to drive the game.
It supports other things at certain times. Out of his mouth proceeded death. His head fell back.
And he went out. His skin was torn and torn.

That was it, Grant thought.

But it won’t die anytime soon. It seems that it will take a long time to die. Grant looked at him.
The stomach- and saw that the rest of the voices in the room had burned in half. They heard the story.
of a dying animal. One raised an eyebrow, then another and another. The first animal.
He turned to face the fallen journalist.

The fatal voice was now trembling, and ​the whole world trembled. She screamed innocently.
So much saliva was coming out of his mouth that Grant could barely see his head. Was
He threw it to the ground and screamed.

The second man saw the falling creature and looked at it. I'm sorry about that.
Death and he has covered fire and earth with his grinning mouth.
nerves and joints, .. .

And he took a long stick.

The dying man screamed and raised his head and groaned and planted his back on the sand.
Of his fears.

It was both, Grant thought.

And the beast stood still. Blood gushed from his head. He cleared his throat.
his tail, and ​with a sudden jerk, he touched the head of the fallen creature. The leaders
His bones were hanging like a lamb. The sound of our rta dying filled the room. hostile
He blinked, as if the attack had suddenly intensified.

He crossed the room and jumped on the floor! Grant noted that
the raptor snapped, the shiny object knocked out of his hands.

That makes two.

The second leg suddenly grew, straightened, and bent forward. It will be
He pulled out a table. There were a lot of rats running around everywhere. Grant was looking for them last year.
The game.

There was still a third wave.


Grant has two suits. If the center of the door faces the ground, it should be
Other men. He was trying to figure out what to do when the last monster scratched his back in anger. extend
The reporter turned away.

The last post won’t be long, just watch. And then there’s
forward. I’m not looking for that. He walked up and down, looking first at the corners of the tables, and ​ then at their heads. fluent
It’s pretty good, and ​ for the price, it’s not the best looking thing on the market. is
Now he’s a monster, he tells us. He ignored Grant. Grant stared for a moment.
There was nowhere to stay. I don’t do anything.

Grant's eyes were fixed on the raptor as it slowly moved sideways. Grant also survived. He decided
He kept some distance between himself and the reptile. smooth . . . smooth ...
Get on your hands...

His fingers pulled her face to his left. His breath came in gasps.
With networks.

Grant set the drink on his lap, the weight of it shifting over his shoulders. fluent
He listened, feeling for the button in his pocket.

radio.

He took it out of his pocket and put it on.

"Hi. This is Grant."

"God?" Eli's voice. "God?"

"Listen," he said. "Just talk."

"Alan, is that you?"

“Say it,” you say, slamming the radio onto the floor, further away from him.
statement made.

He crawled to the foot of the table and stood.

"Alan, talk to me, please."

Then with a smile and a brief nod. Radio silence. The speaker leaned forward and shouted calmly.
breath.

Radio silence.

“What’s wrong!” Don't you understand? In the darkness the knight approached her;

"... God?"

The sound of the radio was blasting from the creature. He sniffed the air, as if he could feel it.
There was another one in the room.

"Oh God, I am. I don't know if you can hear me."

Now he leaves Grant and goes to the radio station.

"God... please..."

Why didn’t he turn on the radio? The translation is close, but a bit more subtle.
The giant approached. Grant could see a flash of light and a flash of light.
They put dried blood on paper towels. It makes her body smell good.

"God, please... . God?"

The announcer paused as he turned back to the radio and looked at her. The picture changes.
of Grant. The bottle landed on Grant’s head. Grant sighed and crossed his arms over his chest.
from the poison of the snake, and remove the perfume.

The velostrador shouted and took off. He nodded to Grant, his hand.
wide. He leaned forward, resting his chin on the table leg and raised an eyebrow. The table turned.
Away, and ​Grant turned around, now very confused. Rotter should continue
His head flashed in the dim light, and he smiled like a doctor.

"God?"

The man turned around and raised his foot to face her. Grant stops and Sean turns him around.
Underneath, it was white. He felt a sharp pain in his chest, burning immediately.
Blood dripped from his clothes. He knelt on the floor, brushed his teeth, washed his hands, offered
forward. The man turned around, turned off the radio, and looked at the fire. He screamed in pain.
And when he struck a third time, Grant reached the wall, nothing went, and ​the creature disappeared.
Legs one last time.

And then he disappeared.

The animal sniffs. The breath came out of his mouth.


Gennaro and the boys enter the house. Grant tells them to stay put. The girl nodded.
The dog was dying and he said, "Wow."
Genaro defended Grant. Everyone smiles and walks to the courtroom.


ride


Tim smiled as he watched the screen in the control room go up and down. Lex said.
"what happened?"


Tim saw Drs. Grant watches television and touches the screen. "|
I don’t know about computers,” Grant said, shaking his head.

But Tim is already walking that path. He quickly took the stairs. In video
They looked up and saw the ship approaching Puntarnas. Now there are only two dozen.
A little way up the mountain. From the next row, he looked at the building, the windows down.
top. Over the radio, he heard a scream.

"You did something, Tim," Leake said.

It contains the SETGRIDS DNL function, ​ though it is deprecated.

the script was returned:


REFER TO: Standard Controls (AUX POWER MAINTENANCE)


"What does that mean?" Tim said.

Genaro raised his hand. "It's happened before. It means it's a complicated relationship. You."
You have to give it your best.

"| Will you?"

Take the ELECTRIC MAIN.


Tim shouted.

"What are you doing now?" Grant said. Every piece is clean.
Tim got MAIN.

Nothing happened. The screen lights up.

Tim took out the MAIN GRID P. He shook it nervously.


The light does not work / for backup lighting only.


The screen is still black. Includes NATIONAL SET 1 .


Save the energy.


Every light in the room was on. Everything loses its flavor. "Okay! Good!"
Tim decided to bring GRIDS back. Nothing happened for a while. He watched the video.
watch, then return to the main screen.


Grant said something that Tim didn't understand, he could just hear the pain in his voice. eventually
He looked at Tim and stood up.

Tim felt his heart pounding in his chest. Lex shouted at him. He didn't want to see it.
There is no TV commercial. They hear music in the room and
The dogs were howling. He heard Malcolm say, “Oh my God….”

He took over the LODGE.


Specify the GRID NUMBER to enter.


He somehow didn’t remember the numbers, but he
F4, and ​hold.


You will now find the F4 GRID LODGE.


In the video, flames were seen coming from the building.
The hotel room. The area glows red. Lex yelled "What did you do!" But it becomes apparent almost immediately.
The darkness returned, and ​they saw the rounds trapped among the smoke, moving.
And he screams into the fireplace and Mildred and the others scream, their voices.
On the radio of.

"That's it," Grant said and patted Tim on the shoulder. "That's it! You did it!"

Everyone stopped and smiled when Lex said, “How was the ship?”

"in?"

"A ship," he said, pointing out the window.


On the map, the houses in front of the hill are huge and go
To the right, as the ship turned to the left, she decided to move on. He saw the staff leave the side.
The action ends.

Tim returned to his room and looked at the wall behind him.

He glanced at the television. Mobile VBB and Mobile RSD are both based on
The same goes for smartphones. Turn off the TELCOM RSD.


There are 23 languages ​​and/or languages.
Want to buy them now?


He took NO.

“Maybe this group is an experiment waiting to happen,” Leake said. "You're good to go
phone number!"

He didn't listen.


Enter the desired code NUM13ER or press F7 in the DIRECTORY prompt.


He pressed F7 and the names and numbers appeared on the screen, which was
way. It’s not an alphabet, and ​it takes some digging to find.
He asks:


WC An B. (Cold) 7083902


Now, all he had to do was figure out how to find the phone. He threw a few balls on the floor.
monitor:


Are you going to bed now or are you going to bed later?


He pressed DIAL NOW.


We apologize that your order did not go as planned.
{error5981}
Please try again.


He looked at her again.

He heard a voice, and ​the pictures changed.
competition.

"What is?" Grant said.

"Okay, Tim," Lex said. "But they can get there." In the script, you can
First the boat stops at Puntarenas Port. They heard a loud bang and then
Ken said, "Uh, hey John, this is Freddie. Do you count me?"

Tim takes the phone out of the car, but all he hears is his phone ringing.

"Uh, hi John, is this Freddie?"

"Stop," Leak said.

Now they make phones, they call every phone there is, but they only listen to phones.
wait. Suddenly, Tim noticed a phone sitting in the middle of the console with a red glow.

"Uh, okay, Colonel. This is Freddy. Will you help me?"

Tim picks up the phone. "Hi, this is Tim Murphy, and ​ | need-."

"Uh, say it again, I don't understand John."

"Don't leave this mountain!" Do you hear me?

There was a silence. Then someone spoke, "It looks like a child.

Tim said, "Don't waste any time! Get back on the ship!"

The music was distant and inaudible. And Murphy? It's a different language.
"They didn't give me a name," he said.

Tim looked at the others. Genaro picked up his phone. "Let me do it. Please."
Do you know his name?”

There is a bad sense of humor in the show. "-maybe a song or - maybe a song
nothing."

Tim was doing the recording, so he probably knew who it was.
Freddy came over. . ...

"Do you hear me?" Genaro said into his phone. "If you haven't heard me, answer me now."

“Son,” he replied calmly, “we don’t know who you are, but you’re not well and .
We will succeed and we have work to do. Now, show up or get out of this
Chanel.”

Tim looks over at his desk where Farrell, Frederik and, (Captain) are reading.

"Do that again, Captain Fair," said Gennard. "If you destroy this ship
If you return to this island immediately, you will find that you have unlocked the 509 skin items.
Maritime Act, to reduce its fees, charges and fees by five millions.
$50 and up to five years in prison. Do you hear?

There was silence.

"How do you feel, Captain Fair?"


And then, in the distance, they heard the voice of one who said, “Yes, I will,” and another who spoke, “It is all before us.”
And the boat began to sink.

Lexus began to cry. Tim leaned back in the chair and wiped his tears.

Grant said, "What does the law of the sea have to do with it?" "Subject

Do you know what that means? Jannard said.

Everyone watches television with great interest. The ship was going a long way.
coast.

"|You think the worst is over," Gennard said. Grant shook his head. "Yes," he said.
He said it was just the beginning.


The seventh time


“To move forward, success will need to be strengthened.”
See what happens.”


Well done Malcolm
Destroying the world


They moved Malcolm to another room in the house and onto a white bed. Hammond emphasizes;
And he began to touch it, and ​he hesitated, "Well," he said, "at least the accident wasn't caused."

What does this mean? Malcolm said cheerfully.

"Well," said Hammond, "he doesn't sit and fall to the ground."

Malcolm sat in a corner. Are you worried about that?

"It definitely is," Hammond said. "These animals don't have teeth that can
Go, destroy all the people on the earth.

"You bastard," Malcolm said angrily. "You know what I'm saying?"
in? Do you think you can destroy the universe? "Oh my, you must be so strong."
Malcolm flopped on the bed. "Don't touch the ground. Don't move."

"A lot of people believe," Hammond said, "that the planet is in danger."

"No, it's not," Malcolm said.

"Every scientist agrees that our planet is in crisis."


Malcolm smiled. “Let me tell you about our country,” he said. “We have four and a half planets.
A million years. He lived a long time on this earth. Three eight million.
anniversary. The first battle. And then the first animals got a lot of land, and the first ice
art, at sea, on land. Then there are different animals - amphibians, and
Dinosaurs, plants, they all lived for thousands of years. Great Kingdom.
Matter mutates, decays, and dies;
And there are big earthquakes, big mountains rising and falling, meteorites, volcanoes.
Mountains, seas rise and fall, the whole earth moves. . . Timeless, timeless and powerful
change . . . Today, most of the world’s geothermal energy is in two forms.
The high altitude in the Himalayas has been around for thousands of years. What is
The universe was completely frozen in time. We will truly miss him.

Hammond rolled his eyes. “Just because a lot of time has passed,” he said, “doesn’t mean
always. If something bad happens to their ancestors. . ."

"Let's hope it's true," Malcolm said. “Let’s say there’s a water bad with all the plants and .
Animals died and the Earth froze for centuries. His life ten
Somewhere - underground or better in a passageway. And after all these years, yes .
The world is no longer safe and life is cruel again. progress
The process will resume. It may take several million years for life to return to normal.
and adopts the current system. But the land has become strong with war.
Life was at our mercy. Just us,” Malcolm said, “I don’t think so.”

"Well, the ozone layer is depleted," Hammond said.

"There's a lot of UV radiation reaching the surface. What happens to that?"

"No. It can cause skin cancer."

Malcolm shook his head. "Veterans are good for life. They're tough. They're tough
change. “Some kind of behavior can increase with increasing age.”

"And a lot of people die," Hammond said.

Malcolm smiled. Do you think this is the first time this has happened? You don’t know
With the wind?

"| Know that life is short."

"Now," Malcolm said. "And oxygen is toxic to proteins. The gas is obviously
fluoride, which is used to make glass. The first step in the production of oxygen is during the formation of beans.
The evolution of the plant cell — estimated to be at least three billion years old — has had a profound impact on every other form of life on Earth.
soul. These plant cells have high environmental and thermal integration. they
He took a defensive breath and took a deep breath. There aren’t many planets as big as a carnival.
percent oxygen. Globally, oxygen levels are going up — five, ten, stop.
Twenty-one percent! The air on Earth is filled with a pure poison! And life isn’t perfect! "

Hammond beamed. "So, what do you mean? Today's dust will be
also?"

"No," Malcolm said. “My point is that life on Earth can take care of itself.
Brothers and sisters, a hundred years is a long time. A hundred years ago, we didn’t have cars and
Planes, computers, hair. . . . It’s a different world. But for Earth, a
Less than a hundred years. One million years is not enough. This place lives and breathes simplicity.
A very large number. I’m not saying that his music is complex and intense, we’re not complaining.
are. We’re just here for what we do. If we left tomorrow, the world would go
We don’t forget.

And we have to go,” Hammond said as he took a deep breath.

"Yes," Malcolm said. "We can be."

"What are you talking about? Shouldn't we attack the area?"

"No, no."

"And what?"

Malcolm sighed and looked away. "Let's be honest. The world is not in danger."
We are all in danger. We cannot destroy the world and we cannot save it. But we can
We have the power to save ourselves.


in his kingdom.


It took four hours. the solar month; The sun is setting. The air conditioning came back on.
In the agreement, the computer works fine. Will they be coming soon?
Of the 24 people on the island, eight are dead and six are missing. Guest
Both the center and the safari lodge are poor, ​ the southern end is much better
Dinosaurs. The San Jose Police Department was called, for backup. Costa Rican National Guard
on the road, and ​the air ambulance takes Malik to the hospital. But on the phone,
The Costa Rican security forces are on high alert – not until the strikes come and go.
between San Jose and Washington before reinforcements could be sent to the mainland. And now
It’s going to take a long time—if the helicopters haven’t arrived yet, they’ll have to wait until they do.
tomorrow.

At that point, nothing happens. The ship was turning; The group has
Three miniature horses were found running close behind and killed.
Animals. On Isla Nublar, that was the case, and everyone was from both sides.
Visitor center or hotel. Tim did it on the computer and left.
A new body.





All Animals 292
Masters looked expectant.

Thyroid 2 1
41

Mysore 22 20
2?

Stegosaurus 4 1
3.9.

Trisyrup 8 6
3.1.

Procomycoagulant 65 , 64 .
2

Othniel 23 15
3.1.

War 37 27
2?

Page 17 of 12
3.1.

Hadrosaurus 11 5
3.1.

Dilophosore 7 4
43

Petersburg, 6 5
43

Hypsilophodent 34 14
2?

Chapter 16 9
4.0

Styrosaurus 18 7
3.9.

Calphosaurus 22 13
41
292,203


What am I doing now? January said. "Now you're saying animals aren't in abundance?"
Grant shook his head. "bridge."
“The Jurassic Museum would be great,” Ellie says.


What does it mean?

"Balance." Grant introduced the detectives. In one of them, the hypsolophodons swim.
Windmills like the Velociprit entered the western arena.

"The boats were out for hours," Grant said. "Animals mate
other. region of interest in the true Jurassic.

"|I don't think that should have happened," Genard said. "Animals shouldn't have
mess."

"No, no."

In the next episode, Grant watches a team playing a field
weighing about 4 tons for Hadrosaurus. Hadrosaurus tried to escape and attacked a walking animal.
In the corner, he grabs his head, and ​ another runs forward, kicking and kicking his leg.
They laughed at him and wiped his face with their kisses. Within minutes, it was six on six.
Feed large animals.

Grant looked at his wife.

Can you imagine that? Ellie said.

"|I don't know what to think," he said. He looked at the television. "No, not really."

Muldoon said calmly, "You know, it seems like all the men are out now."

Grant didn’t think much of it at first. He just looks at the people he sees, in their own way.
A big dog. To the east, a stygosaurus flails its tail, roars
The tyrannosaur, who was staring at him, was surprised, and ​occasionally kicked him in the leg.
notice. Forty Southerners volunteered.
He opened and closed channels. A scared animal.

"We've got an hour, Dr. Grant," Muldoon said. "If you want to try
Put your finger on it.

"Okay," Grant said. "am."

“|Certainly,” said Mildred, “if the Costa Ricans come, they will have to.
This area should be a problem for competitors. Something suddenly disappears.

"Okay," Gennard said.

"They're drawing in the air," Muldoon said. “Maybe napalm, maybe higher-powered gas, too.But.
It came from heaven.

"|You should," Jannard said. "This class is very important. Every animal should be in this class
Well, and ​so far so good.

"It wasn't fair," Grant said. He stood up. "Let's get started."

"|I'm not sure you understand, God," Janrod said. "I also think it's a lesson
bad. It must be destroyed. All animals on this planet are doomed to extinction, so
The Costa Rican authorities have done just that. | We think we should let them do what they want. Your
Do you not understand what I am saying?

"Okay," Grant repeated.

"So what's wrong with you?" January said. "It's a military necessity. Leave him alone."

Grant's eyes went up, to where the reporter was smiling. "No," he said. “We have to be careful
fluent."

"Leave it to the experts," Gennaro said.

Grant recalled seeing Gennaro drunk and frightened for about six hours in the 1990s.
The cab of the truck and the hm. He suddenly got angry and hit her.
The lawyer stopped and looked out the window. “Listen ma’am, there’s a reason for this.
stuff and start doing it.

"|Ken," Genora said softly.

"No, no. You forfeited your right from the start."

"hell-"

"He sold investors in a company you didn't like. We had a
The work is not done. You read the work of someone you know.
You know it’s a lie and you let this guy get away with whatever
Technology in human affairs. I think you should quit your job.

Genaro was rehired. "Okay, I'll tell you now."


"No," Grant said. "You're going too. You can't do it." made
Genaro smiled. Grant was furious with Muldoon. "What do we have?"
What weapon?

“We’re taking some profits and it’s not good,” Muldoon said.

"How cute are these shirts?" Grant said.

"They're like sharks. They have drivers that crash, run
take. More weight, less power. We can’t know, but it could be dangerous.

"It wasn't fair," Grant said. "Not on the board."

"What's good?" Genaro said as he turned around. "The dog's voice."

Ellie said.

"What does the Reporter think?"

Grant said, "Did you find a bad radio?" "am

Yes, said Mildred.

"Give me one. And is there anything else you can do?"

Mildred shook her head.

"Okay, you can have whatever you want."

Muldoon left. Grant was furious with Gennard. “Your theory is absurd, Mr. Gennard.
Theory is a problem. He needs to clean it up. But you shouldn’t do that until you know.
mess. And this leads to the construction of bridges over mountains. And then some things about the translation. Ur
negative. We need to find them, get to know them, and see what they do. We should read
All the animals were born in the land. Then we can save it. But first, we need to do some work.


Ellie looked at the map on the wall that showed where the animals lived. Do the work.
keyboard. He read the letter. “The mountain is to the east, where the
The mountainous region. Maybe they like fire.

Is there a place under the village where you can hide?

“There,” he said. "There's a lot of water that could be used to control the flooding."
western road. Lots of space. Water and honey.

Grant shook his head. "So that's where they'll be."

Ellie said, "I think there's an ocean." He controlled the consoles and
He said, "Tim, you're going to show us everything." Tim wasn't listening. "Timmy?"

Hide in the mountains. "Just a minute," he said. "|There's something."

"What's that?"

"It's a warehouse. I don't know what's in there."

"So he might as well have a gun," Grant said.


Everyone was inside the school, closing a door and locking it.
The sun, reflecting the shadows that fall on the city. "Arnold," said Mildred as
He walked down the aisle. "He needs to know I'm always here."

"Probably not," Grant said. "He didn't want to get here."

"Well, Hammond knows. Somebody knows."

Where is Hammond now?

"I'm still in the living room."

They reached the top of the building, near the electric gas lines that supported the roof.
In plastic cups. Shining their flashlights around the room, they see a lot of commotion.
glass cube, two feet high, with metal stopper. Grant could see the little blue dots on the cubes. fluent
It’s like walking into a house full of big cats,” he says.

Muldoon opened a body, reached in, and pulled out a parrot. 4 Switch to electricity.
His eyes widened. "I'm in pain."

"What's that?" Grant said.

"Mr.12," Muldoon said. "It's nerve gas. It's signs."
The bomb."

"Let's go," Grant said calmly.


"I like it," Leica said, laughing. park in neighbors’ garages near Fit
raptor that Grant put on his head. We lead the raptor towards the sandwich.
The monster waved his hand.

"I'll live in peace here," Muldoon said. "They must have made an honest mistake."

“I love it,” Leake said. "The name's Clarence."

"Clarence?"

"Yes," Leake said.

Muldoon caught the tip of her nose with a small smile. Keith Grant
Distant ringing in the ears. Is there anything wrong with loving an animal?

Lex continued to control the Raptor and reached the building. "I thought you'd let me do it," he said
said.

"|I didn't move," Mildred said. "They didn't do anything." "am

It's going to take me time,' he said.

So Muldoon gives the necklace to Lex, and ​he takes it off to play with. so
She said softly in Bengali. The conversation ended when Leica shook it off.
And he wrapped it around his waist. He then awakens the creature and transforms again.

"I don't know," said Mildred. "is

Truck,” Lake said.

"The other answers are not enough," said Mildred, smiling. "The beast
different. Later, she argued with Grant, "If everyone was born female, how could they survive?"
We didn’t write that in Bor’s DNA.

"It's not Born's DNA," Grant said. "It's animal DNA. But weird things happen."
Yes, it’s written in the animal manual. also animals of West Africa, with | delighted."

"What is this seed?"

"Sexy change," Grant said. "Yeah, just a change of clothes." Grant explains that a
Many ancient plants and animals change shape during their life cycle.
Orchids, some fish and plants, and now minerals. Chicks build their arms to lay their eggs.
He can change in a few months into a perfect human being. They took the game first.
The reproductive system controls male fertility, produces hormones and
Male hormones increase and then they can get pregnant.

“It looks amazing,” Gennard said. "What are you doing?"

These changes are shaped by the habitat of each species.
Men and women. Meanwhile, other pirates began to disband
A man with a woman.

"And you think that happened with dinosaurs?"

“That’s going to make the best decision, for sure,” Grant said. "I thought that was it. Today,
Will we get this one?


Once inside the Jeep, Lex pulls Raptor out of the trunk. The dog is happy.
He’s about to join their team. He gave her a final kiss on the head and left her.

The animals don’t move.

"Go, Ci!" Lex said. Go home!

And the man got lost and ran into the forest.


Grant grabbed the lever and pulled the trigger. Mildred whispered. The car is moving.
The main road, heading south. Genaro stopped Grant and said, “What about the bottle?

"Nobody knows," Grant said.

"But | I thought you'd bury it."

“I remember the smell of a dinosaur,” Grant said. "But all water changes under the influence of gravity
A thousand years. We did references, research, but nothing is known.
Their hair like that.

Grant hears the music and tells Muldoon to head west. It seems like a lot of u
According to Ellie: The north ends at the top of the south mountain.

Grant shook his head. "A lot of people don't know what a crisis is," he said. He found himself frozen.
It refers to certain animals such as rabbits and cats. Even their quality of life
It’s not visible. Indeed, American fisheries are highly studied and


Unlike animals, the mother is expected to take care of the baby alone, that is, until it is born. male
The crocodile spends much of the first month lying next to the second female, breathing fresh air.
experiences and added other examples of women who were made to feel uncomfortable.
peaceful, which made him scratch his head and scared her, while he slept beside her, she did
male. When he died two months later, the man was gone. and
Although women have three breasts, the
It turns out he didn’t think it through at the time and left his head in the moment.
The chicks begin to hatch and leave the nest. So, a little rock on Mt
He himself started breathing, so his body was filled with dirt.
Food on the first day.

"How come the older elves don't protect the younger ones?"

"It's not what you think," Grant said. “Both parents abandoned their children.
There is a reason for this. Young Alicorns are smart;
He would challenge anyone who would listen - human or not - and attack them with the fiercest attacks of all time.
It is not a sign of fear. All diseases.

"write." Gennaro smiled.

Grant said, "But this is a comeback in every sense of the word." "example,
The main problem facing the algorithm is egg clustering. Snakes are always in the dark. is
A temperature of ninety-eight degrees Fahrenheit will kill a duck, so the mother will go
It protects the beads from frostbite.

"But dinosaurs aren't our toys," Muldoon said.

"Okay. Dinosaur bones can move."
Which means animal-"

"So you said you didn't know," Janari said angrily. "You don't know what
What was that smell?

"No," Grant said. "I don't."

"No," said Gennaro. "Most of them are decades old."

Grant didn’t know. You can already smell the gas. and a variable named
Tacre’s body.


The ground is freezing, Genaro thought, as he walked forward. It was really burning. And here it is
The dust crashed to the ground. And that sweet, sulfuric smell is calling.
A good plum goes. It’s like walking in paradise.

He saw Grant walking with his head down, listening to the voice. Give
The kids’ colorful shoes and Hawaiian shirts looked adorable. Genaro didn’t remember.
straight. He is afraid to go to this country with the burning price, and ​the Velocitrators are somewhere
around. He didn't know how Grant would blame him.

Or a woman. Sattler. He was playing along, just watching with a kind heart.

Aren't you afraid? January said. "| So, are you sick?"

"We have to do it," Grant said. He didn’t say anything.

Everyone got to the tube. Genaro grabbed the cigarettes.
He had put it in his mind. He looked at Ellie. Why doesn’t he think about it?

"Okay," he said. "But think about that for the rest of his life."

Genaro shook his head and thought about what to do next. If anything he
He has been all his life. He thought it was nothing.


Grant squinted against the sunlight. In front of us, between the trees, a dog was running and screaming.
they. Then he ran away.

"Is it a tree?" Ellie said.

"| Think about it. Or. Kids, whatever."

And Elisha said unto him, Hast thou not sent me?

"bridge." Ellie told him how the bells were ringing on the wall to remind him when.
The other went home. If true, this shows good judgment.
Almost all forms of life exist in space. In the past, it was believed that the ability to develop and maintain software was
It only exists in three species: chimpanzees, monkeys, and humans. Now I have that.
Perhaps dinosaurs could have done something different.


The figure reappeared, leaped into the light, then disappeared again, screaming. Of course he did.
As he sent them.

Gennaro rolled his eyes. "Why are they right?" said.

"If you think it's birds," says Grant, "then you should be concerned. Recent studies show
Dark skin is champagne red. And chimpanzees can
Use words in a positive way. For now, researchers are focusing on its heart.
A three-year-old is developing, but their brain is not. People who sleep can
Good theory, yes.

"But I've never killed anyone in the kitchen," Genora said.


In the distance, they could hear the water rushing down the valley. Ships on ships.
They backed up a bit, and ​he was looking up at a rock wall. The girl disappeared over a rock.
And then he left.

"Where did he go?" Ellie said.

Grant heard a crash. The voice stopped. "eventually."

And as they went, they found a hole in the rock, like a bird's nest. I was
It could be on both feet. As they watched, the girl smiled and waved her hand in front of the
LIGHT. Then he ran away.

"It's not good," Genaro said. "I'm not going anywhere."

Grant said nothing. And she drank with Eli. Luckily, there was a little video about it.
The camera is connected to a handheld camera. He took the camera off his face, turned it on, and turned it on.
urban.

"You've never seen anything like this before," Gennard said.

“Give it time to adjust,” Grant said. There was plenty of light in the sky for them to see.
The walls were black, and suddenly, suddenly, the abyss opened. In the cloud,
He heard a voice. Then the storm came. More information for more people
Animals.

"As a farmer, for sure," Ellis said.

"But you don't see anything," Gennard said. He placed the ring in his hand.

"No," Grant said. "But | small." He listened to the timer for a moment and then pulled out the camera.
He threw it to the ground. "Let's get started." He leaned against the tree. Ellie went
Darkness and silence. Grant puts on a mask and disappears.
Instead, he steps back.

“You can’t go worse than that,” Jannard said.

Grant shook his head. "I don't like that. I'll go first, then Ellie, and ​ you'll come later."

"Now, wait a minute," Zener said. "Why don't we cover the bones?"
Where did the bombs fall, did you throw them first? Isn’t that what it’s all about?

"Ellie, do you have a lighter?"

He handed the gun to Grant.

"as?" January said. "What are you saying?"

"I don't want anything better," Grant said. And he followed her to the cave. "You never knew what
Did you die from lead poisoning?

"I don't..."

"Sometimes it comes in spasms. That's not good."

"No, I know you don't like it, but-"

"Look," Grant said. "We enter this cave looking for lost monsters. If
Kill the birds first, and ​ some fall into the birds in the skin, perhaps
That depends on the external environment. So we don't have to,

"but-"

"You're a dog, Mr. Gennard."

"|It's okay."

"Your money sucks. Your job sucks. You helped build it. Your bills. And you
You can’t kill them just because you’re currently active.

"I'm a little disappointed," Gennaro said. "I'm afraid of c-."

"Follow me," Grant said. Ellie raised an eyebrow at him. It cost over
Leaves, and leaves. "good morning."


Grant chuckled and ran his hands over his face, making him scream.
And he's walking.
The bat’s mouth was ugly and black.


"what happened?" Gennaro said, surprised.

Ellie looks into the kitchen and hears a noise. He put
radio, she said calmly, "Alan?"

There is a big difference. Then they heard the voice, "Here I am."

"Is everything alright, God?"

Another good point. When Grant spoke, his voice cracked
He disappeared.

"Everything is fine," he said.


Standard approx.


In town, John Hammond visits Malcolm’s house. Hammond was unfazed.
And it’s not good. When he wore the ring last summer, Malcolm did so with a smile.
coma, and ​now he sees Hammond who may actually die. Yes, the helicopter.
It is called, but only God knows when it will come. You thought Malcolm might die.
At the time, Hammadi was filled with anxiety and fear.

And, of course, Hammaud made all the mistakes because he didn’t like the president.
quite. It’s even worse if that person is your friend. Hammond recalls that Malcolm’s death
If that happens, it’s a last resort.

However, the smell in the room was too sweet. The game. Human foot
meat.

"Every ... shot.. ." Malcolm said and turned on his heel. "is

your experience? Harold said, shaking his head.

What did he say? What kind of monsters? "am

He didn’t catch it,” Harold said.

Hammond is always doing something. He lowered the window to let in some air.
Finally, he couldn’t take it anymore and said, “Do you want to go downstairs?”

"|Don't worry, no," Harding said. "I think this place is beautiful."

"Well, look, I'm just walking outside."

"Okay," Harold said. It regulates the entry of antibiotics into the bloodstream.

"I'll be right back."

"good."

Hammond stepped out into the sunshine, wondering why he was so upset.
The Harolds. After all, this man was his boss. Hammond did not explain himself.

He walked through the gates and looked around the park. It was almost midnight.
When the water cleared the air, and the sun came out again. Tonight, and
Hammond saw a problem. From what they said, he knew they had a secret about his park. and
Although the idiot Gennaro smashed it into the ground, it didn’t make a difference.
contrast.

Hammond knows on both sides of the station, there are many more in Palo Alto.
The children are adults. It wouldn’t be a bad idea to visit them again, on a different island, in a different place next year.
All over the world. And if there are problems here, they will be fixed next time
The game. That’s how the program came to be. To end injustice.

Upon reflection, he realized Wu was not the right man for the job. Of ten
He seemed very proud of his work. And Wu was shocked.
With a progressive learning curve. Instead of making dinosaurs, he wanted perfection.
in them. Hammond thought it was Parker’s fault.

we.

Also, it should be noted that John Arnold was unable to retain the position of Chief Engineer. Arnold
It was beautiful, but ultimately sad and annoying. fluent
He didn’t like it and didn’t care. This is very important.


In fact, neither Wu nor Arnold had a successful career, Hammond said.
The difference. It’s a great opportunity to build something.
place where kids ride the swings and enjoy the view and come
They were living in their own storybooks. The light of truth. They are looking to the future. storage type.
The tools to make those decisions are coming.

No, Wu and Arnold didn’t do the work.

And in this case, Eddie Regis is the bad guy. Harding did not respond.
choice. Mildred drinks... .

Hammond shook his head. Next time will be better.

He smiled and went to his room and followed the corridor to the east.
From the living room. He walked over to an employee who shook his head. Hammon was not
Keep your head down. He witnessed the destruction of Tikan's servants. To be honest, it really is.
This island near Costa Rica is stunning. I don’t do that kind of thing.
further-

When he arrived, the sound of the dinosaur was overwhelming. Hammond remained silent for a moment.
He stumbled on the road, and when he looked back.
He walked among the trees near the waterfall, and jumped into the trees.

What is T-Rex doing here? Why is it inside the wall?

Hammond felt a little annoyed: then he saw a servant, running to his rescue, and
Hammond took the opportunity to escape, running to the blind on the other side of the fence.
On the way. He was in the dark - rolling on the ground, his face covered in blood.
but the earth, a little at his feet, slipped forward, he fell again, and ​ then he ran again.
further. Now he was going down a steep hill, and he couldn't explain it. fall.
He couldn't stand up anymore and rolled over onto the floor barefoot before falling asleep.
assembly. They threw themselves face first into the deep, warm, surrounding water and ran over them.
nose.

He is dead in his bed with his eyes closed.

afraid! It's so hard! He should have been at your birthday party! Hammond said proudly.
His hands. When he woke up, he felt a sharp pain in his left side and tears welled up in his eyes.
He admits, though: it will burn. He was determined to combine all beliefs in
finish. Whether.

It didn't come out.


Back at the courthouse, Lex tells Tim, "I need a visit to the hospital."

"We're so happy, Lex," Tim said. "We need to be here. Listen to this." fluent
Press another button, and ​ a tyrannosaur will play on the speaker
park.

"Okay," Lex said. "Better than that."

"You can do it too," Tim said. "And when you take it out, it gives you a feeling of sadness."

"Let me go," Lex said. He pressed the button. The tyrannosaur regained its composure. "We can do
How long will it last?”

"Okay," Tim said. “We’re just changing the process here.”


Sitting at the bottom of the hill, Hammond hears the Tyransaurus grunting and growling.
Issue.

Jesus.

She smiled, hearing the words. He was afraid to scream to the whole world. He waited.
To see what happens. What does a Tyrannosaurus do? Did he find the servant?
Hammond waited patiently, listening only to the crackle of the cigars in the forest, until he knew he had it.
Calm down, take a deep breath.

Because of his severe knee injuries, he was unable to climb the mountain. He had to wait inside.
feet. When the Tyrannosaur arrived, he called for help. This time, he’s not surprised
here.

Then he heard a voice say, "Come on, Tim. | You saw it too. Come on. Let me
Copy the text.

baby!


The Tyrannosaurus slowly retreated, but this time there was a much stronger attack and it was
echo, which means complete.

''Good morning,'' said the girl. "Do it again."

These children!

Small children are not allowed. Only problem for them
beginning. Nobody wanted them there - Hammaud just took them because he thought
He tries to stop Gennaro from destroying the resort, but Gennaro does. and
Obviously the guys went into the control room and started causing trouble because they were allowed
What is?

He felt his heart race and his breathing quicken. He braced himself for a laugh.
relax. There was nothing. Although he couldn’t climb mountains, he couldn’t fly.
Hundreds of acres of forest and farmland. Hammond sat in the tub.
Downstairs, he hears music in the bushes next to him, and after a while, he starts to cry.
will help.


Malcolm’s voice was more than a whisper. "Things are different... on the other side,"
She said.

Harding approached. "How much more?" You think it’s Malcolm talking.
dying.

"It's changed...," Malcolm said.

"Poppies?"

Malcolm didn't answer. His left lip twitched. "Hell," he said finally.

"Have their plans changed?" Harold said. He knows the rules have changed. In recent years,
New ways of effecting educational change. “model” and another
Words mean symbols, but people say, words mean something, a view of the world. mother
Worldview. They say a paradigm shift happens when science makes a big breakthrough.
It changes the world. This change is slow and happens only once.
century, the breakthrough of Darwinism led to a revolution. Quantum mechanics fails
minor change.

"No," Malcolm said. "Not... the pride."

“Nothing… nothing… again.

Harding laughed. Despite all of this, Malcolm suddenly lost his composure. you
It’s too long, and they’re out of antibiotics.

What didn’t you think of?

"Everything," Malik said. "Because... there's everything... on the other side."

And he laughed.


perfect


"You're in trouble," Genaro told Ellie Sattler, looking over her shoulder.
closed, waving his hands in front of him. "You don't want to do that!"

She laughed. "Okay," he said. He folded his arms and
Stand to the right of the window. And he walks on it.

The line is red.

Gennaro began to smile. He shouted to Muldoon, who was standing next to the Jeep. "I don't
This, he said.

"You're right."

"|I can't. | It's not fair."

"I've been waiting for you," said Mildred. "You have to do it."

“Jesus knows what it’s like,” Gennaro says. "I'm telling you, I can't."

"You have to do it."

Gennaro sighed, looking out the window and looking down. "It's okay. I can't do it."

"|Don't," Mud said. It used waterproof plastic. Do you hear a sound?

"I don't," said Mildred. "It doesn't matter if you die. He'll bless you, after all
Your body feels good. But it always does nothing. It’s not just about religion. but,
So the population is very small.


Genaro looked at the script. "forbidden."

"| in my opinion you had better go take care of these animals," said Mud. "And you don't have to go."

Genaro returns to the cave, the door is on the ground. Then, a
Mildred, standing behind him, is tall and unsteady.

Gennaro smiled and started walking towards the exit. out
It’s a small road, but the closer you get, the bigger it gets.

"That's it," said Mildred.

Genaro returns to the pool, but is too dangerous to walk.
Sightseeing - The thought of going into the unknown had taken a toll on her - so at the last minute she went
He went upstairs and changed his hands and feet.
Because he had to see where it was going. You threw water on his face.

He ran, walking through the darkness, against the wall.
He stepped into the darkness behind him, the walls creaking and cracking.
He complains of increasing chest pain.
He tapped the air in his hands and she could feel the water change.
A few feet behind, he slowly adjusts his posture, while taking a deep breath, before checking the dots.
Face, great pain.

Then, suddenly, the ship stopped, rocking, and Genaro felt it.
Bad terrain, roads and air. Surprised by the freedom, she screamed and turned around.
concrete.

And he broke it.


The call is muffled. Their hands are clasped together, folded in front of him to make a gesture. What is
The air was as thick as a mountain.

"-Good?"

"Very well, yes." "is

My breath. ... ."

"straight."

His hands stroked his face. And Eli. Do you hear? He was breathing.

Why is everyone screaming? She said. "why." He left.

Genaro turned around, smiled, and quickly stood up. He looked down as he looked down at her.
Darkness. But the first thing he saw light up in the darkness were her eyes. Red Light
eyes.

Lots of fruit. all around.


It was in a hallway, a narrow door seven feet off the ground. huge
The steel boxes served as hiding places and protected them from the view of the defenders.
In front of them stood velociraptors, no more than five feet tall. The animals are black.
Black with ivory red stripes. They stand on their heads. they
They did, staring at him with brown eyes. baby feet men
The velociraptor huffed and puffed. Far from the light in the darkness, in the darkness, children are running, running.
provides less nutrients.

Genaro was not impressed and nodded.

Two monsters!

Just an inch or two above the dog’s head. The leaders
And they trembled, trembling with fear and anguish. Sometimes they are abused.
My pain. So they went and returned with a large crowd.

Rolling his eyes, Janrod knew they were now onto something big.
However, underground structures are man-made, and ​they have some differences;
Railroads. And there are many monsters in this great temple: xenora.
Imagine thirteen monsters. Maybe too much.

"Friendship is," Grant said, smiling. "Four or six men. The rest are babies and children. inside."
Only two. One last year and another this year. The puppies are about four months old.
Maybe in April.


One of their favorite children walked across the table and joined them, screaming. fluent
He was ten feet away.

"Oh Jesus," Genaro said. But suddenly an old man came up and raised his head.
And hold the baby. The boy was surprised and ran away.
Old man on his mother. The old man walked slowly, letting the boy hold his head
The mouth, the breath. In this scene, the boy is shocked and yells at the three men.
country.

The men don’t move.

"|He doesn't understand," Gennard said. Why don’t they go?

Grant shook his head. "You don't have to look at us. And neither side right now… ."
He gave them hearts.

"Are you okay?" January said. How long will we be here?

"His day is measured," Grant said.


The way Grant sees it, there are three schools, three teachers. Field Description
It was between their arms, though it looked like the children were kissing and playing.
Many countries. The adults are good with children and love children.
Sometimes, older animals are too weak to walk.

Suddenly a bottle came to Eli and hit him on the head. fluent
He looked down and saw a leather bag next to a black one. He was black everywhere. And that’s
He reached for the animal's tail.

The boy shouted.

On the roof of the house, one of the adults complains about the noise.

"Do you think | you can pull it off?" he asked.

"Just hurry up."

"Okay," he said, kneeling down beside the boy. He screamed again.

The men were shaking their heads.

Eli holds the boy in his arms to comfort him and stop him from crying. He pulled it out.
His hands moved over your skin, lifting and rubbing against your shoulders. The men were shaking their heads.
Invited.

Then one of them started walking towards him.

"Man," Genaro said under his breath.

"You can't go," Grant said. "shut up."

The old man walked towards them, his feet clicking on the concrete. The animal is protected.
To Ellie, who was left with a clothed baby on the floor. He was young.
She appeared, and ​Elliot's hand was still on her head. And the king lifted up his head, and bowed himself to the air.
The king’s head came closer to his hand, but he could not see it because he was blind.
box. One mouth was removed and cut open.

Grant picked up a metal pipe, pulled it out of his pocket, and placed his hand on the metal. January
He reached out and shook his head, looking at Ellie.

He wasn’t wearing pants.

Grant dropped the gun and shot Prady. Eli was an old man.

Ellie squeezed the skin. The stone hit the concrete. old man's head
He nodded briefly, then sat aside, breathing heavily. Go back
Find it, when the little girl squeals with delight, and runs away. The old man sat up.
of Eli. Then turn around and go to the edge of the platform.

Genaro took a deep breath. "Jesus. Can we go?"

"No," Grant said. "But | I think we can get some work done now."


In the dim twilight, Grant looked around.
In the doorway, examine the first box. Dirt and weeds.
A side-by-side view. He measured forty yards. Yes, it doesn’t work
The marriage itself is far from being suddenly violent and fractured
But he thought about the music on the floor. As a result, traders have
They build their nests before laying their eggs, and their eggs leave a permanent mark on the ground. fluent
It is also a sign that someone is confused. And he counted thirty animals.


The second leg was broken. But Grant thought he had nine drinks. What is
The third option has five pairs;

"What does all this mean?" January said.

"Thirty-four people died," Grant said. "And how

Have you seen anyone else?”

Grant shook his head. Animals scurried beneath the caves, buzzing
In and out of the shadows.

"I'm looking," Ellie said, lightly scribbling in the book. "You can go
Real pictures, but not all baby teeth are the same. My question is thirty-three.

What about children?

"Twenty-two. But God - did you see something wrong with them?"

"Like what?" Grant said.

"How do they behave over time? Do they fall into a pattern or
assignment."

Grant smiled. "It's really late," he said.

"No, look. Find out. Watch the kids. When they jump, they fall, they jump
All the way. But when the kids are awake, watch how they react.
This body. They looked at this wall and the other wall. That's what they'll do.

"| I don't know, Ellis. Do you think there's an island? Like honey?"

"No, not really," he said. "Well, rather. Just a theory."

"And children do that?"

"No. Everybody does it. Adults do it. Watch them. I told you they would."

Grant smiled. He seemed to be walking very slowly. Animals do all sorts of things but
In quiet, time when they are watching and relaxing, going about their business
In a remarkable way, there seems to be no limit to the world.

"He throws me," Grant said. "The air is so fresh..."

"| I don't know, God."

What do they do? Some kind of relationship called a physical relationship?

"That doesn't make any sense," he said. "Because everybody does that."

Genaro glanced at his watch. "I knew this would come in handy one day." below:
The face of the clock is small;

Grant said, "How much say do you have in court?"

"I don't." Genaro shook his head. "My wife gave it to me," he explains, "for my birthday." fluent
He looked at the bottle. “Well,” he said, “they don’t care to go anywhere else… | Think about it.
They were in the northwest — northwest, something like that."

"They must be hearing something," Ellie said, "they're trying not to hear anything . . ."

Grant smiled.

“Or maybe it’s just a ritual,” he says, “where animals are awakened.
They were together. But maybe it doesn't matter." Ellie smiled. "Or maybe.
They were good. Dinosaurs can be a problem. Or maybe it’s a silent thing.

Grant thinks so. A bee can communicate with its environment by
dance. You can do the same with dinosaurs.

Gennaro looked at them and said, "Why don't you leave the house?"

"That's the problem,"

"Yeah, but they hide."

Grant raised his hand. At that moment the children started screaming and jumping for joy. What is
The men looked at him curiously for a moment. And, with his breath and his voice he called out in the darkness
In the background, all the dinosaurs rode on wheels and rolled around, smashing through the side of the cave and into the cracks of the
First it’s dark.


Hammond


John Hammond lay on the ground at the bottom of the hill, trying to catch his breath.
For God’s sake, it burned, he said. Fire and smoke. That’s breathing.


Sponge.


He looked out over the river, 40 feet deep. A few hours passed.
And the water began to flow and began to rise over the mountain. Her tears trembled and turned red. fluent
I cannot comment on this. He was forced to climb a mountain on one leg, which is now
He was tired of pain and fear.

There is a flower. Before he got out of the river, he was drunk, but
He knew this was wrong. Now he has failed and the world is turning around once again. eventually
It affects his body. But he knew he had to climb the hill and get back on the road
above. Hammond thought he had heard his footsteps in the street many times in the past.
He kept screaming for help. But somehow the message didn’t go far enough;
It didn’t save him. Then, as night fell, he realized he was going
You have to climb a mountain, with or without your feet. And that’s what’s happening right now.

Kids want to know.

Hammond shook his head and sighed—he sat there for an hour and .
He just went up to third base from Mt. And he was as tired as an old dog. you
He folds his legs. He shook his head. Of course, he knew there was nothing wrong with that: there were
He was almost back to where he was, thank God - but he had to admit, he was tired. stay
At the top of the mountain, he realized he didn’t want to be alive.

And why shouldn’t it be black? He thinks. He was seventy-six years old. Not a year.
Look at the gates of the mountain. Although Hammond was fine that year.
In his lifetime, he hopes to reach a hundred. You really take care of yourself.
We see things as they come. Now he has more to live for. Other channels have
ride. More surprises are coming-

He hears music and some birds chirping.
The tree is very tall. He had been training the monsters all morning. There are all kinds of generations.
Here: animal, paper, snake.

The war is growing, and villages are growing in the mountains. some
It's coming. Then he saw a black bird fly over the hill behind him—and another.
And another.

Compys, he thought bitterly.

Dressmaker.

The comics suck. They are like sheep and they live
And walk with a little dignity like an animal. But he knew it was poison. Their structure
It has a unique antimicrobial and insecticidal properties.

He thought of lost animals and laughed.

And the first company stood at the foot of the mountain, and looked. Stay at least five feet away.
No, and ​he just stared. Others came and stood for a moment and stood side by side.
protect. They scream and yell and fight.

"Sabo! Get out!" he said, kicking a rock.

The celebrities followed, but they were only a foot or two away. Don't be afraid. That’s how they knew.
He couldn't do them any harm.

Hammoud angrily ripped off a tree branch and threw them with him. The committees are dissolved;
She licked her lips and cried happily. It seemed to go overboard.

He thought about the poison again. He remembered that he was a leader.
He was stabbed in the house. Officials said the poison is similar to heroin.
meat. It’s not a problem.

You just want to sleep.

What’s wrong with that, he thought. Hammond picked up a package, returned it and killed him.
She carried a pair of sex toys on her lap. The little creature screamed in terror and screamed.
Then, press the button. The other animals quickly followed.

improve.

Hammond got up and started down the hill again. His hands are held with both hands
With his hand, he rubbed his right leg, feeling pain in his leg. Not exactly eleven.
Somehow, someone kicked him in the shoulder. And he stretched out his hand and struck the beast.
But he went out of his house and threw himself on the top of the mountain. Since its formation, Company II.
He leans down and takes a small ball in his hand. He was shocked, seeing the blood flow
in his head. He sighed and started to head back to the gym.


He had sustained another cut on his head and felt a slight pain in his chest.
he shouted, thrusting the club at the creature. He sat on the tree, breathing heavily.
They stood up, trembling and shaking, and turned to look at him. the
He felt a burning sensation in his chest and neck.

He lay on his back at the top of the hill and began to grow, as it were, on her.
But he realized that nothing was happening. There is no problem. Malcolm was stunned.
Your question. Hammond whimpers like a kid in a park yearning for peace.
When another deputy arrived, he kicked her in the leg and tried to
clingy. The little creatures are getting closer. Then they all lined up and danced.
birds. He turned around as another landed on his shoulder, and ​ the creature scurried away.
and head. Hammond felt very little pain, much less pain, when the company fell and broke his neck.


beach;


Looking for dinosaurs, dodging cliffs and concrete hills, Grant quickly jumped
As he crossed a lake, he found himself standing on the beach, looking out over the Atlantic Ocean.
sea. All around him, young Velociraptors were jumping and jumping over the edge. but,
One by one, the horses lined up on the edge of the grass near the bus entrance.
the mangroves, and they stopped, sitting on their beds, looking out to sea.
They were heading east.

"|Not his father," Janrod said.

"|Same," Grant said, but they didn't like it. The sun doesn’t shine like that.
sea; A light wind was blowing and the sea was rough. Moreover, why did they fail in their work on the ground?
What brought all the warriors to the sea?

Genaro glanced at his watch and saw the butterflies flying around.
"Northwest-southeast. Same as before."

On the other side of the lake, deep in the forest, they heard the whistle of a fishing boat. “But we
You know what it looks like,” Ellis said.

Then they heard the sound of fire on the sea, and in the clouds they saw the ship on fire.
In the west. It was a large ship heading fast toward the east.

"Is that why they left?" January said.

Grant shook his head. "They should have known that was coming,"

As the whaleboat passed by, all the animals looked around, except for a few calls.
meaning or meaning. Grant was very impressed with their quality, professionalism and
Build a team. But that may not be the case. In his mind, a
The rest takes place in the cave.

At first, the children were neglected. So, the authors agree. And finally, all animals
They went to the water. This results in microorganisms with more energy.
He apparently found the hole first. And the elders took the soldiers to the shore. And how
Grant looked up and saw that the group had been around for years. There is a genetic correlation.
by the sea, and when the animals rested, they stopped moving and swam as they did
He was inside. But it’s still busy, it’s fine. Adults are called individually
Within a block or so, every adult walked among the children. The children stood up.
He is the only one among the great ones.

But Grant also says not all men are the same. There was a very beautiful woman.
on his head, and he was in the middle of the group to the sea.
He’s also stuck in the middle. You feel like something
The pig army, the pastoral order is composed of women, and this
The green cat is the alpha female of the island. The men, he gave their names.
With security in the middle of the club.

But unlike the feathers, which evolved quickly, the dinosaurs lost
They formed slowly- like a military unit. However, he also has a problem
oriented north-east-southeast. Grant followed. But on the other hand, a
It’s not a surprise. Paleontologists have been studying bones for so long, they’ve forgotten how
Very little information can be obtained for some clades. The bones tell you something.
The physical appearance of the animal, such as height and weight. They can tell you something about how


connected nerves but something about the state of the animal’s life cycle.
They can be the answer to some bone diseases. But the bathrooms are bad.
It’s one thing, of course, how to control the entire site.

Because fossils are human, paleontologists use fossils. Like other
A natural scientist, Grant became an expert at working with his hands. And in some countries
As a result, he began to discover what was never believed — that dinosaurs might actually exist.
Different animals that will live together and live with each other according to
A glimpse of the next generation of humans, because dinosaur
totems;

"Oh my God," Grant said.

He saw the pigs standing by the river watching
ship. And he knew what he was looking at.

“These animals love to run,” says Gennard.
here."

"No," Grant said. "They don't want to leave."

"Don't they know?"

"No," Grant said. "They want to go."


He approached the darkness.


"go!" Ellie said. "cute!"

"Yes ," Grant said. He was laughing.

Where do you think they want to go? Illis said.

"|I don't know," Grant said, as several helicopters hovered over the area, ​creating a fog as well.
There are many metals in the world. People are scattered.
As the whistle blew, one of the helicopters turned around, cleared the runway, and flew again.
to the river. The door opened and soldiers with assault rifles approached.
they. Grant overhears some conversation in Spanish and realizes that Muddy
On the boat with the kids. “Come with us,” a soldier says in English.
There is no time here.

Grant looked out to sea where there were waves, but they were gone. All this
Animals are missing. It was like they had never seen him before. The soldiers were fighting and
He allowed her to get under the covers and lean against the door.
Muldoon became furious and shouted in Grant's ear, "We need to get out of here now. Let's go
Do it now!

The soldiers drag Grant, Ellie, and Genord to the campsite and help them inside.
Hernias. Tim and Lex offered her a hand and she was shocked to see how young and
have. Lex shook his head.

An officer approached Grant and yelled, "Sexur: Are you the captain?"

"No," Grant said. "I'm not the boss."

Who is in charge, sometimes?

"|I don't know."

The king went to Janrod and asked: Are you the boss?

"No," Gennard said.

The officer saw Ellis, but said nothing. The door opens like a helicopter.
After leaving the ship, Grant was eager to see if he could contact
raptors, but by then the helicopter was above the pines, flying south over the mountains.

Grant leaned over Mildred and shouted, "What about the others?"

Muldoon shouts that Harding and some of the staff have been fired.
accident. He found it on the mountain near his house. It must fall.

" straight ?" Grant said.

"No. The comics found them."

"What's wrong with Malcolm?" Grant said.

Mildred shook her head.

Grant was afraid to reveal too much. He smiled, and looked at the door. fluent
It’s dark now.


She looked outside and saw the helicopter and screamed.
That's exactly what happened.

Suddenly they heard thunder and saw another helicopter.
As he walks through the rainwater, moments later, the building suddenly collapses.
He glows orange, and ​Lex starts crying, and ​Ellie puts her arm around him, trying to comfort him.
protect.

Grant looked down and saw the barrier in the sky again.
They moved like dogs, moments before another explosion exploded under their heads.
Their helicopter crashed and crashed into the ocean.

Grant sat back in his chair. He remembered dinosaurs standing in the ocean.
He wondered where he would go if he was taken, and he realized that he did not know and
I was fascinated and inspired at the same time.

The officer turned to him and looked him straight in the eye. Are you the leader?

"No," Grant said.

"You know, Sixer, who's in charge?"

"Nobody," Grant said.

The helicopter lost air as it approached the ground. Now it’s the moon and
And the soldiers shut the door. When they did, Grant came out again and looked at the island.
Against the blue of the sky and the sea, there was a great cloud in white pearls.
Suddenly, one by one, the entire island broke apart and fell into place.
The place glows in the darkness of the night.


initial:


St. Joseph


Time passed. He was arrested by the police, and taken to a luxury hotel in San Jose,... The
They had the right to go around and talk to whoever they wanted. But they did not give up.
department. Every day a young man from the American embassy visits and asks questions.
If you need something, and ​tell them Washington is doing everything it can to meet
Let them go. But the truth is that many people died in the same world.
Costa Rica. The reality is that climate change is preventable. What is
The Costa Rican government says it was duped and misled by John Hammond and his associates.
group. At the time, the government refused to release the survivors.
fast. They refused to bury Hammond and Lane Malcolm. They just put them on.

Every day Grant traveled from office to office to his
another government official asked. They let him go home.
Words, time and date. That’s how Grant met John Hammond. Here’s what Grant knows about the industry.
How Grant got the fax from New York. Why did Grant go to the island. is
It takes place on an island.

The message, again, is daily. One word.

For a long time Grant said they needed to believe they were being spoken to and that’s it.
That’s what they want you to say, but you don’t know any better. so,
As I thought.

Then, they sat by the hotel pool one night and saw Tim and
Lex splash, as an American enters the cockpit.

"We've never seen him before," said the American. "My name is Marty Gutierrez. I'm a teacher here
Bell Station.

"You are the first example of a Prochomygotes," Grant said.

Right, right." Gutierrez sat down next to him. "You should go home."

"Yes," Grant said. "|You only have a few days before it starts getting cold. In Montana, you have
You know, the first taste comes in August.

Gutierrez said, "Is that why the Hammond Foundation supports South Goose? Because it does."
Would we be able to return the intact species of dinosaurs to warmer climates?

"That's | spiritually, that's it."


Gutierrez shook his head. "Hammond is a smart guy."

Grant said nothing. Gutierrez sat on a pool table.

"The authorities won't tell you," Gutiérrez concluded. “Because they are afraid, and rightfully so.
I hate you for what you do. But something has happened.
country by country."

"Did you have the baby?"

"No, well, no. Just something else. Now, at Isma'aloya's house."
In the wild, animals unknowingly eat grass in an unsafe manner. they
It is usually caught in a straight line - like an oyster - from the shore
A mountain in the woods."

Grant sat up straight.

"It's like a job," Gutierrez said. "forbidden?"

What country? Grant said.

"No, it's fine. They only eat guava leaves and soybeans, and ​sometimes chicken pieces."

Grant said, "The food is high in lysine. What happened to these animals?"

"Well," said Gutierrez, "we're going into the woods. However, we don't
find. Yes, they are hard to find in the wild. A group of scientists can
For years on Mount Ishmael, nothing was certain.

"And we're stuck here because..."

Gutiérrez raised his hand. "The government is afraid. There may be other monsters. More
argue. They think about themselves.

Do you think there are too many ghosts? Grant said.

"|I can't tell you. Can you tell me?"

"No," Grant said. "I can't tell."

"But do you think?"

Grant shook his head. "Okay. Yeah."

"| That's fine."

Gutierrez climbed off the ground. He watched Tim and Lex as they played. "bridge
They send kids home.
glasses. "Come with us, Dr. Grant. This is a beautiful place."

“Are you telling me we’re not going anywhere?” Grant said.

“None of us are going anywhere, Dr. Grant,” Gutiérrez said, laughing. And he stood up and
He walked back to the hotel entrance.



   

Original article
is. Yes, they are hard to find in the wild. Researchers can pay
Expand this review
Your feedback will be used to improve Google Translate

Original article
the knet. Of course, they are hard to find in the wild. A team of researchers were able to
Check out this translation
Your feedback will be used to improve Google Translate

Original text
ⵜⵜⴰⵣⴻⵏ ⵉⴳⴻⵔⴷⴰⵏ ⵖⴻⵔ ⵓⵅⵅⴰⵎ.
Rate this translation
Your feedback will be used to help improve Google Translate
